MANUFACTURING  COMPETITIVENESS  IN  A 

HIGH–TECH  ERA 

S.  HRG.  109–1088 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY, INNOVATION, 

AND COMPETITIVENESS 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JUNE  8,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

61–908 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  TECHNOLOGY,  INNOVATION,  AND 

COMPETITIVENESS 

JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 

JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts,  Ranking 
DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 8, 2005  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Allen  .....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Ensign  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Prepared statement of Senator Lautenberg  ...................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Clough, Dr. G. Wayne, President, Georgia Institute of Technology  ....................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Frink,  Albert  A.,  Assistant  Secretary  for  Manufacturing  and  Services,  Inter-
national Trade Administration, Department of Commerce  ..............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Howell, Thomas R., Partner, Dewey Ballantine LLP  ...........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Murray, Sebastian, President/CEO, FPI Thermoplastic Technologies  ................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........
Murray, Sebastian, supplementary information  ...................................................

APPENDIX 

Page 
1 
14 
1 
17 
26 
22 

27 
29 

2 
5 
34 
37 
33 
34 

53 
54 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

MANUFACTURING  COMPETITIVENESS  IN  A 

HIGH–TECH  ERA 

WEDNESDAY,  JUNE  8,  2005 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY, INNOVATION, AND 
COMPETITIVENESS, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  9:30  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  John  Ensign, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN ENSIGN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEVADA 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Welcome  to  the  first  hearing  of  the  Sub-
committee on Technology, Innovation, and Competitiveness. I want 
to thank Chairman Stevens for the opportunity to chair this impor-
tant Subcommittee. I also want to thank Co-Chairman Inouye and 
Ranking  Member  Kerry  for  their  participation  in  this  Sub-
committee, and for their interest in manufacturing competitiveness. 
Manufacturing  competitiveness  is  a  critically  important  issue  to 
America  in  the  21st  century.  In  today’s  economy,  the  global  com-
petitiveness  of  America’s  manufacturers  is  impacted  by  rapid  im-
provements  in  computing,  communications,  and  distribution  tech-
nology, reductions in tariff and non-tariff barriers to trade, and liti-
gation—for  example,  asbestos  class-action  lawsuits  with  over 
730,000  claimants  have  already  bankrupted  73  American  compa-
nies and cost nearly 60,000 jobs. 

Unreasonable  medical  malpractice  liability  jury  awards  increase 
healthcare costs. I hope that we can enact medical liability reform, 
which  would  result  in  significant  savings  to  our  entire  healthcare 
system, and would help competitiveness in the United States. 

Frivolous  lawsuits  make  it  extremely  difficult  for  manufacturers 
of  all  sizes  to  function.  In  2002,  litigation  cost  the  U.S.  economy 
$233  billion,  which  is  greater  than  the  gross  domestic  product  of 
Greece. 

Taxation.  The  private  sector  pays  $250  billion  just  to  comply 

with our income tax laws. 

And on the regulation front, economists estimate that compliance 
costs  of  Federal,  state,  and  local  government  regulatory  mandates 
are  $1.2  trillion,  more  than  double  the  1988  level.  Complying  with 
Federal  regulations,  alone,  costs  manufacturers  nearly  $8,000  per 
employee, almost twice the average for all U.S. industries. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

Litigation, taxation, regulation, healthcare, and energy costs add 
approximately 22 percent costs to U.S. manufacturers, as compared 
to the rest of the world. 

American  manufacturers  are  a  cornerstone  of  our  economy.  The 
United  States  remains  the  world’s  top  producer  of  manufactured 
goods.  Making  one  dollar  worth  of  goods  generates  an  additional 
$1.50 in other economic activities. Nearly 15 million manufacturing 
jobs  create  an  additional  eight  million  jobs  in  non-manufacturing 
sectors, including retail, wholesale, and finance. 

A  healthy  manufacturing  sector  is  key  to  developing  better  jobs, 
fostering  innovation,  increasing  productivity  and  obtaining  higher 
standards  of  living  in  the  United  States.  In  addition,  the  United 
States cannot continue to grow and prosper in the new information 
economy if we cannot compete with countries like India and China. 
As private industry responds to dynamic market forces, the Federal 
Government should examine its appropriate role in this process. 

Today,  we  are  pleased  to  have  two  panels  of  witnesses  to  testify 
on the challenges and opportunities that confront American manu-
facturers today. Before the testimony begins, we’ll give the Ranking 
Member an opportunity to make an opening statement. Any of the 
other Senators can submit their statements for the record. 

In  addition,  we  have  received  full  written  statements  from  all  of 
our witnesses. We will include those statements in the record. But 
if  the  witnesses  could  summarize,  so  that  we  can  have  as  much 
time  for  give  and  take  questions,  and  make  this  more  of  a  discus-
sion  this  morning,  I  would  greatly  appreciate  it.  I’m  here  to  learn, 
and  I  know  that  the  Subcommittee  is  interested  in  hearing  the 
views of the panels. 

Our  first  witness  will  be  Al  Frink.  Mr.  Frink  is  the  Assistant 
Secretary  of  Commerce  for  Manufacturing  and  Services.  Prior  to 
joining  the  government,  Mr.  Frink  worked  for  30  years  in  private 
industry,  building  an  internationally  recognized  carpet  manufac-
turing company, Fabrica International. 
Mr. Frink, we receive your testimony. 

STATEMENT  OF  ALBERT  A.  FRINK,  ASSISTANT  SECRETARY 
FOR  MANUFACTURING  AND  SERVICES,  INTERNATIONAL 
TRADE ADMINISTRATION, DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 
Mr. FRINK. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. And good morning to you, 

Ranking Member, and members of this Subcommittee. 

I’ll begin by asking that my written testimony please be accepted 

into the record. 

Thank you for asking me to appear today and providing me with 
an  opportunity  to  discuss  the  current  state  of  manufacturing.  Like 
the  Chairman  said,  American  manufacturers  are  a  cornerstone  of 
America’s economy, and embody the best in American values. Man-
ufacturers  are  full  partners  in  the  effort  to  build  the  future  of  the 
country, with a thirst for new products and new opportunities. Sim-
ply  put,  a  healthy  manufacturing  sector  is  a  key  to  better  jobs— 
jobs  that  foster  innovation  and  higher  standards  of  living  for  our 
Nation. 

Strengthening  American  manufacturers  is  a  top  priority  for  the 
President,  Secretary  Gutierrez,  and  me.  That  said,  the  challenges 
facing  U.S.  manufacturers  raise  important  questions  for  both  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

dustry  and  government.  The  President  addressed  these  challenges 
by providing initiatives to help revive the economy. As a result, the 
manufacturing sector now has expanded for 24 consecutive months. 
And,  though  that  number  is  good,  we  will  not  be  complacent.  The 
domestic  and  global  economies  are  fiercely  competitive,  and  we 
need to work very hard to stay on top. 

Mr. Chairman, since taking office, I have made industry outreach 
a  major  priority.  I  have  visited  71  manufacturing  facilities,  ad-
dressed  35  associations,  chaired  57  manufacturing  roundtables.  In 
total, I’ve addressed over 14,000 manufacturers. And, I am pleased 
to report there is a renewed optimism in the manufacturing sector, 
as a majority of these firms have plans to increase investments and 
hire new workers. 

The  Manufacturing  in  America  report  was  released  in  January 
2004  by  former  Secretary  Evans,  and  it  represents  in  effect,  my 
marching orders. We are making great strides, in that we have im-
plemented  21  of  the  57  recommendations  in  that  book.  The  22nd, 
and  key,  recommendation  will  be  the  establishment  of  an  inter-
agency  workgroup  on  manufacturing.  This  is  vitally  important,  be-
cause manufacturers’ issues cut across numerous Federal agencies. 
As  such,  this  group  will  provide  a  coordinated  approach  to  chal-
lenges facing manufacturers. We expect to have this group in place 
within the next 2 weeks. 

Also,  to  enhance  the  government’s  focus  on  competitiveness,  we 
established the first-ever manufacturing council. This council plays 
an  integral  role  in  identifying  priority  manufacturing  issues  and 
providing advice to the Secretary. 

With  my  newly  created  position  and  this  council,  along  with  in-
dustry  associations,  manufacturers  now  have  the  strongest  voice 
they’ve ever had in Washington. 

One  of  the  many  issues  the  council  will  address  is  innovation. 
The U.S. must have a policy environment that promotes innovation 
and helps industry grow and prosper. President Bush’s 2006 budg-
et  addresses  that  need.  It  includes  a  record  $132  billion  for  re-
search  and  development.  This  represents  a  45  percent  increase 
from  the  budget  in  2001.  The  proposed  2006  budget  also  allocates 
13.6  percent  of  its  discretionary  funds  to  conduct  research  and  de-
velopment.  In  total,  this  represents  the  highest  percentage  dedi-
cated to R&D since the Apollo program 37 years ago. Furthermore, 
this  investment  does  not  include  nearly  $200  million  invested  by 
businesses,  and  $27  million  provided  by  states,  colleges,  univer-
sities, and other entities. 

But,  with  that  funding,  we  also  need  to  work  more  intelligently 
with what we have. To address that, we have established an inter-
agency  working  group  on  manufacturing  R&D.  This  group  will 
focus  on  the  development  and  implementation  of  advanced  manu-
facturing technologies. 

In  the  area  of  intellectual  property  rights  and  particularly  in 
view of all the recent technical advancements, intellectual property 
protection  must  be  provided,  especially  for  small  manufacturers. 
For  this  reason,  the  Commerce  Department  has  appointed  trade 
specialists  committed  to  protecting  U.S.  intellectual  property  in 
China  and  all  over  the  world.  In  total,  we  have  increased  intellec-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

tual property enforcement and compliance staff by 25 percent since 
2001. 

On  the  important  issue  of  maintaining  competitiveness,  we  con-
tinue  to  work  to  lower  the  costs  of  manufacturing  in  the  U.S.  As 
you  stated,  Mr.  Chairman,  the  United  States  faces  a  22.4  percent 
disadvantage,  relative  to  our  foreign  competition.  This  advantage 
comes from burdensome high taxes, frivolous lawsuits, high energy 
costs, regulatory excesses, and healthcare costs—all the things you 
mentioned.  This  has  its  highest  impact  on  small  to  medium-sized 
manufacturers, and they represent 98 percent of all manufacturing, 
and 70 percent of all new manufacturing jobs. 

To  maintain  our  cutting  edge  of  technology,  our  tax  policy  must 
support  innovation  and  entrepreneurship.  Simply  stated,  that’s 
why we needed to make the President’s tax cuts permanent. 

Streamlining  regulations  is  another  important  component  of  our 
economic agenda. Manufacturing and Services (MAS) is now work-
ing closely with OMB to find ways to achieve regulatory objectives 
that  minimize  cost  to  U.S.  manufacturers,  while  not  compromising 
the spirit of those regulations. 

In May, we launched an intensive 5-day training seminar for our 
analysts to develop expertise in the Federal regulatory process, and 
we  are  recruiting  skilled  economists  to  support  this  new  initiative. 
On  standards  and  services,  we  have  also  engaged  in  an  ongoing 
effort to address barriers associated with standards, which are now 
one of the greatest challenges in expanding exports. Our specialists 
are working diligently to address standards that affect competitive-
ness on both the domestic and the international fronts. 

CAFTA  is  another  vital  instrument  for  boosting  exports.  We 
strongly believe in free trade. Eighty percent of all the exports com-
ing into this country right now from that region are tariff free, and 
90 percent of all agriculture is coming in tariff free. Our U.S. man-
ufacturers do not currently share these benefits, but they will after 
CAFTA. 

From my travels, I have seen firsthand why education and train-
ing  are  clearly  critically  essential  to  ensure  our  workforce  is  fully 
equipped  to  compete  in  the  global  marketplace.  The  President  has 
a  number  of  initiatives  that  will  support  education  and  workforce 
needs. One example is the $250 million in competitive community- 
based  grants.  And  we  at  MAS  are  partnering  with  the  Depart-
ments  of  Education  and  Labor  to  strengthen  worker  training  in 
technical community colleges. 

Mr.  Chairman,  as  you  listen  to  my  comments,  you  can  see  that 
we have considerable work to do. But I should mention I’m also an 
optimist.  If  we  can  lift  the  burdens  from  our  manufacturers,  we 
firmly believe that their creativity, their innovation, and their work 
ethic  will  continue  to  make  our  economy  the  marvel  of  the  world. 
I am very committed to working closely with this Committee to ad-
vance our vital manufacturing sector. And I thank you very much. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Frink follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ALBERT A.  FRINK,  ASSISTANT SECRETARY

FOR 
INTERNATIONAL TRADE ADMINISTRATION, 

MANUFACTURING AND SERVICES, 
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Introduction 

Good  Morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member  and  members  of  the  Sub-
committee.  My  name  is  Al  Frink,  Assistant  Secretary  for  Manufacturing  and  Serv-
ices  in  the  International  Trade  Administration  of  the  Department  of  Commerce. 
Thank you for inviting me to appear today to discuss the current state of manufac-
turing and solutions to strengthen manufacturing. I look forward to working closely 
with you and the other members in the months ahead. 

Let me begin by reviewing the state of our very vital manufacturing sector. 

Current State of Manufacturing 

American manufacturers are a cornerstone of the American economy and embody 
the  best  in  American  values.  They  enhance  U.S.  competitiveness  while  improving 
lives domestically and internationally. 

Manufacturers  are  full  partners  in  the  effort  to  build  the  future  of  the  country 
in  the  marketplace  for  new  products  and  ideas.  Simply  put,  a  healthy  manufac-
turing  sector  is  key  to  better  jobs,  fostering  innovation,  rising  productivity,  and 
higher standards of living in the United States. 

The  United  States  is  the  world’s  leading  producer  of  manufactured  goods.  Stand-
ing  alone,  the  U.S.  manufacturing  sector  would  represent  the  seventh-largest  econ-
omy  in  the  world—nearly  equal  to  China’s  economy  as  a  whole.  The  U.S.  manufac-
turing  sector  also  leads  in  innovation,  accounting  for  more  than  90  percent  of  all 
U.S.  patents  registered  annually.  Investments  in  technology  create  new  industries 
and  careers  in  manufacturing  as  U.S.  firms  introduce  products  and  cutting-edge 
techniques. Perhaps most importantly, productivity in manufacturing has continued 
to rise significantly. 
Strengthening American Manufacturing 

Strengthening  American  manufacturing  is  a  top  priority  for  President  Bush,  Sec-
retary  Gutierrez,  and  myself.  We  are  taking  definitive  steps  to  ensure  that  U.S. 
manufacturers  remain  competitive  in  the  global  marketplace.  Manufacturing  is  an 
integral  part  of  the  U.S.  and  global  economies.  It  is  part  of  the  network  of  inter- 
industry  relationships  that  creates  a  stronger  economy  and  the  conditions  for 
growth.  The  sector  currently  accounts  for  roughly  13  percent  of  GDP 1 and  employs 
over 14 million workers. 2 The United States is the world’s largest economy and has 
the world’s largest manufacturing sector. 

That  being  said,  the  challenges  facing  U.S.  manufacturers  raise  important  ques-
tions  for  both  industry  and  government.  For  industry,  the  question  is  how  best  to 
reinforce the sector’s strengths and maintain its competitive edge in an increasingly 
competitive  global  economy.  The  competitive  pressure  on  U.S.  manufacturers  has 
forced them to cut costs, to adopt lean manufacturing techniques, and to implement 
quality  assurance  programs  that  guarantee  zero  defects  in  production.  Innovation 
in  products,  processes,  and  services  has  become  a  key  determinant  for  success.  The 
right  policies  in  Washington,  D.C.—and  across  the  Nation—can  unleash  the  great 
potential  of  the  U.S.  economy  and  create  the  conditions  for  growth,  prosperity,  and 
job creation. 

The  President  recognized  this  and  responded  quickly  with  an  economic  program 
of  tax  cuts  and  other  initiatives  soon  after  taking  office.  These  initiatives  are  con-
tinuing  to  help  revive  the  general  economy,  with  expansion  in  the  manufacturing 
sector beginning in mid 2003. Let me give you a few economic indicators to describe 
the current state of play in manufacturing: 

fourth quarter of 2001. 

• Manufacturing  output  in  April  2005  was  10  percent  above  the  levels  in  the 
• Manufacturing exports totaled $726 billion in 2004, which represents 63 percent 
of  all  U.S.  exports  of  goods  and  services,  and  grew  by  9.3  percent  from  a  year 
ago. 
• Manufacturing  profits  have  continued  their  upward  trend  since  the  recession 
• Manufacturing wages and benefits have increased since the fourth quarter 2001. 
Average hourly wages in manufacturing rose in May 2005 to $16.52, up 2.7 per-

low and rose by more than 57 percent in 2004 compared to 2003. 

1 Bureau of Economic Analysis, Department of Commerce. 
2 Bureau of Labor Statistics, Department of Labor. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

cent from a year ago. Benefits have increased 6.3 percent in the 12 months end-
ing March 2005. 

• Manufacturing  productivity  has  increased  83  percent  over  the  past  15  years, 

while productivity in the total non-farm economy has risen only 45 percent. 

• Institute for Supply Management (ISM)—data indicates that manufacturing has 

had 24 consecutive months of growth. 

At  the  Department  of  Commerce,  we  are  confident  that  the  outlook  for  manufac-
turing is good, but we cannot be complacent. The domestic and global economies are 
fiercely competitive and we will need to work very hard to stay on top. The Adminis-
tration is committed to furthering conditions for economic growth and improving the 
overall competitive environment for U.S. manufacturers. 
The President’s Plan 

President Bush is committed to policies that create the business environment that 
encourages  innovation,  lowers  the  cost  of  doing  business,  makes  our  economy  more 
flexible and promotes economic growth. For example, the President’s plan: 
• Allows families to plan for the future by making tax relief permanent. 
• Encourages  investment  and  expansion  by  restraining  Federal  spending  and  re-

ducing regulation. 

• Makes  our  country  less  dependent  on  foreign  sources  of  energy  through  a  com-

prehensive national energy policy. 

• Expands  trade  and  levels  the  playing  field  to  sell  American  goods  and  services 

• Protects small business owners and workers from frivolous lawsuits that threat-

across the globe. 

en jobs across America. 

• Lowers  the  cost  of  health  care  for  small  businesses  and  working  families 
through  Association  Health  Plans,  tax-free  Health  Savings  Accounts,  and  tax 
credits for employer contributions to Health Savings Accounts, Medical Liability 
Reform, and health information technology. 

• Prepares  workers  for  jobs  of  the  21st  century  by  improving  school  standards, 

reforming workforce training and increasing the number of people served. 

Implementing  Recommendations  From  the  Manufacturing  in  America 

Report 

Mr. Chairman, in order to advocate more strongly for the interests of U.S. manu-
facturers, my first priority was to learn what was most important to them. As such, 
since taking office in September 2004, I have: 

• Visited more than 71 manufacturing facilities; 
• Chaired 53 roundtable discussions; 
• Addressed 33 industry association groups; 
• Participated in five President’s Export Council meetings; 
• Presided over three Manufacturing Council meetings; 
• Attended 11 Chamber of Commerce meetings; 
• Led an eight-day trade policy mission to China; and, 
• Met with senior officials in Japan. 
In total, I have addressed over 14,000 manufacturers. 
I  am  pleased  to  report  that  there  is  a  renewed  optimism  in  the  manufacturing 

sector as the majority has plans to increase investments and hire more workers. 

We  are  making  great  strides  in  supporting  the  President’s  plan  through  imple-
menting  the  recommendations  of  the  Manufacturing  in  America  report  released  by 
Secretary Evans in January 2004. With over 21 recommendations implemented thus 
far, the Department of Commerce will continue making progress to ensure the com-
petitiveness of all U.S. industry. The recommendations are grouped in the following 
categories: 

1. Enhance Government’s Focus on Manufacturing Competitiveness. 
2. Invest in Innovation. 
3.  Create  the  Conditions  for  Economic  Growth  and  Manufacturing  Investment. 
4. Lower the Cost of Manufacturing in the United States. 
5. Strengthen Education, Retraining, and Economic Diversification. 
6. Promote Open Markets and a Level Playing Field. 

I would now like to discuss with you our progress in each of these areas. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

1. Enhance Government’s Focus on Manufacturing Competitiveness 
Establishment of the Manufacturing Council 

Secretary  Evans  established  the  Manufacturing  Council  to  provide  oversight  and 
advice on the implementation of the President’s Manufacturing Initiative. Secretary 
Gutierrez is working with the Council and values its input. In fact, his first domes-
tic  trip  as  Secretary  was  to  the  Manufacturing  Council’s  February  2005  meeting  in 
Dearborn,  Michigan.  In  addition,  most  recently,  he  hosted  a  Council  meeting  in 
Washington attended by Members of Congress. 

The Manufacturing Council plays an integral role in identifying priority manufac-
turing issues and advising the Secretary. We will continue to work very closely with 
the  Council,  which  has  prepared  reports  on  workforce  issues,  tort  reform  and  mar-
ket  access.  These  on-going  dialogues  provide  sound  information  regarding  needs  of 
U.S. manufacturing and the impact of Federal Government efforts. 
Establishment of the Interagency Working Group on Manufacturing 

Because  manufacturing  issues  cut  across  numerous  Federal  agencies,  Secretary 
Gutierrez  has  asked  fellow  cabinet  secretaries  to  name  a  manufacturing  liaison  to 
serve  on  an  Interagency  Working  Group  on  Manufacturing.  This  Working  Group 
will  facilitate  a  coordinated  Federal  approach  to  the  challenges  facing  this  sector 
both domestically and internationally. 
Establishment of the Office of Industry Analysis 

In  January  of  2004  the  Administration  launched  the  Office  of  Industry  Analysis, 
which is responsible for assessing the cost competitiveness of American industry and 
evaluating  the  impact  of  domestic  and  international  economic  policy  on  U.S.  com-
petitiveness, particularly in the manufacturing sector. 
2. Invest in Innovation 
Introduction to Innovation Challenges 

The rapid advancement in technology has presented challenges and opportunities 
to  U.S.  industry.  The  United  States  must  have  a  policy  environment  that  promotes 
innovation, and allows industry to grow and prosper. Success or failure will depend 
on our ability to support technology investment, research and development, and cre-
ate new industries, new processes, and important services—setting the stage for ad-
vancing  innovation.  A  partnership  between  the  Federal  Government,  industry,  and 
academia  can  accomplish  this  through  strong  support  of  research  and  development 
(R&D). 
Federal Research & Development 

President  Bush’s  FY  2006  Budget  request  includes  a  record  $132  billion  for  Fed-

eral research and development. 

• This represents a 45 percent increase compared to 2001’s $91.3 billion. 
• President  Bush’s  2006  budget  allocates  13.6  percent  of  total  discretionary  out-
lays  to  the  conduct  of  R&D—the  highest  level  in  37  years.  Not  since  1968  and 
the Apollo program have we seen an investment in R&D of this magnitude. 
• In FY 2006, the Networking and Information Technology Research and Develop-
ment  (NITRD)  program  is  budgeted  for  $2.2  billion,  including  research  directly 
related to broadband technology. 
• Since  2001,  funding  for  nanotechnology  R&D  under  the  President’s  National 

Nanotechnology Initiative has more than doubled to $1.1 billion. 

These investments are a reflection of the importance that President Bush assigns 
to  science  and  technology  to  enhance  U.S.  competitiveness  and  our  ability  to  solve 
challenges we face in health, defense, energy, and the environment. 

Even  in  an  environment  of  tight  budgets,  President  Bush  recognizes  that  one  of 
the best tools we have for ensuring that the United States remains the world’s inno-
vation  headquarters  is  to  lead  the  world  in  cutting-edge  fundamental  research  that 
industry can apply to its processes. 

The  Administration  also  recognizes  that  Federal  R&D  is  just  one  part  of  the  in-
vestment that keeps our Nation at the forefront of so many fields. Business and in-
dustry  invests  another  $200  billion  in  research—the  largest  source  of  R&D  funding 
in  the  U.S.,  providing  63  percent  of  total  2003  R&D  funding.  State  governments, 
universities and colleges, and nonprofit institutions invest an additional $27 billion. 
Interagency Working Group on Manufacturing R&D 

The  Interagency  Working  Group  on  Manufacturing  Research  and  Development 
was established as a result of the President’s Manufacturing Initiative in 2004. Par-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

ticipating  agencies  include  Commerce,  Agriculture,  Defense,  Education,  Energy, 
Health  and  Human  Services,  Homeland  Security,  Labor,  National  Aeronautics  and 
Space  Administration,  National  Science  Foundation,  the  Office  of  Management  and 
Budget,  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy,  Transportation,  and  the  Small 
Business Administration. 

The  goal  of  this  multi-agency  focus  is  to  lead  the  development  and  promote  the 
implementation  of  advanced  manufacturing  technologies  for  the  benefit  of  the  U.S. 
economy  and  the  U.S.  manufacturing  sector,  in  particular.  The  Group  will  also  im-
prove planning, coordination, and collaboration among Federal agencies in these key 
technology  areas  and  to  increase  the  effectiveness  and  the  visibility  of  the  overall 
Federal manufacturing effort. The working group’s objectives are to: 

• Identify and integrate requirements; 
• Conduct joint program planning; and, 
• Develop strategies for the Federal Government’s manufacturing R&D programs. 
Its functions are to: 
• Engage in interagency manufacturing R&D program planning and budgeting; 
• Identify opportunities for collaboration, coordination, and leverage among agen-
cies in specific technical areas related to manufacturing R&D; and, 
• Identify agency priorities within these areas and gaps among them. 

Protection of Intellectual Property 

In such an age where competitiveness is increasingly determined by access to new 
ideas, rather than ownership of physical materials or fixed assets, an innovative so-
ciety  must  have  sound  intellectual  property  rights  (IPR)  protection.  This  includes 
strong global enforcement, with faster processing of patents. This is of even greater 
importance today due to the convergence of nanotechnology, biotechnology, informa-
tion  technology,  and  cognitive  technology  that  will  create  new  industries  and  new 
jobs now and in the future. 

The  Commerce  Department,  through  the  U.S.  Patent  and  Trademark  Office,  has 
placed an expert IPR Attache´ in China to deal specifically with intellectual property 
rights  abuses  in  that  country.  We  have  increased  our  intellectual  property  enforce-
ment and compliance staff by 25 percent since 2001. 

Secretary  Gutierrez  is  committed  to  IPR  protection  and  enforcement.  He  high-
lighted  this  commitment  on  his  recent  trips  to  Russia  and  China,  where  he  sent  a 
clear  message  that  the  gap  between  IPR  laws  and  enforcement  needs  to  be  closed. 
He  stated,  ‘‘Violators  need  to  face  prohibitive  financial  penalties  and  real  jail  time, 
and  it’s  time  to  do  away  with  small,  insignificant  slap-on-the-wrist  suspended  sen-
tences that allow IPR violators to go back into business.’’ 

To meet these challenges, the Administration is committed to upgrading the U.S. 
Patent  and  Trademark  Office.  Policies  underway  will  allow  the  hiring  of  several 
hundred new patent examiners. This, in turn, will help ensure that the intellectual 
property rights of U.S. companies and innovators are upheld across the globe. 
Strategy Targeting Organized Piracy (STOP!) Initiative 

Commerce is a key member of the STOP! Initiative, which was announced in Oc-
tober 2004. The STOP! Initiative was created to coordinate government-wide activi-
ties to confront global piracy and counterfeiting. It seeks to: 

• Secure and enforce intellectual property rights in overseas markets; 
• Stop fakes at U.S. borders; 
• Keep global supply chains free of infringing goods; 
• Dismantle  criminal  enterprises  that  steal  America’s  intellectual  property;  and 
• Reach  out  to  like-minded  trading  partners  and  build  an  international  coalition 

to stop piracy and counterfeiting worldwide. 

In  order  to  provide  a  one-stop  shop,  we  have  established  a  hotline—(866)  999– 
HALT—which has received 300 calls since its inception in October of 2004, and set 
up a website, www.StopFakes.gov. 

With  this  initiative,  Federal  agencies  work  with  America’s  trading  partners  to 

crack down on global piracy and counterfeiting. 
3. Create the Conditions for Economic Growth and Manufacturing Investment 

If we wish to remain a nation of innovators, we do not want to over-tax industry 
and commerce and dampen the entrepreneurial spirit. There are key elements of the 
tax relief passed by Congress and signed into law by President Bush that will expire 
in a few years. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

The Administration has urged Congress to make these vital tax reductions perma-
nent so American families and businesses can make better decisions for their finan-
cial futures. 

The  President  has  proposed  to  make  the  Research  and  Experimentation  (R&E) 
Tax  Credit  permanent.  The  R&E  tax  credit  promotes  private  sector  investment  in 
research and the development of new advanced technologies. 
4. Lower the Cost of Manufacturing in the United States 

The National Association of Manufacturers has claimed that United States manu-
facturers faced a 22.4 percent overall cost disadvantage relative to our chief foreign 
manufacturing competitors as of 2002. 

The cost disadvantage comes from: 
• Higher corporate taxes; 
• Frivolous lawsuits; 
• Energy costs; 
• Unreasonable and excessive regulatory burden, and 
• Health care costs. 
This burden has had the highest impact on small to medium-size manufacturers— 
which represent 98 percent of all manufacturing firms, half of all the manufacturing 
jobs, and 70 percent of all new manufacturing jobs. 
Cost of Regulations 

High  regulatory  costs  have  a  negative  impact  on  job  creation.  As  mentioned  pre-
viously,  the  U.S.  manufacturing  sector  currently  accounts  for  roughly  13  percent  of 
U.S. GDP, employs over 14 million workers, and accounts for over 60 percent of U.S. 
exports.  It  is  also  still  the  largest  in  the  world.  However,  the  regulatory  regime  is 
substantial and compliance costs are rising. 

The  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  (OMB)  estimated  that  the  cost  of  regula-
tions  imposed  over  the  last  10  years  by  the  U.S.  Government  is  $35  to  $39  billion 
per year. 3 A 2001 study by Crain and Hopkins found that manufacturing firms face 
a  regulatory  burden  approximately  six  times  greater  than  the  average  firm,  and 
when  adjusted  for  the  number  of  employees,  manufacturing  firms  face  a  regulatory 
burden  per  employee  approximately  two  times  greater  than  the  average  firm. 4 In 
addition,  technology  advances  at  times  outpace  the  legal  and  regulatory  system. 
Regulators  must  support  innovators  by  incorporating  private  sector  input  in  rule-
making. 

Government-mandated regulations are designed to influence business behavior in 
favor  of  the  public  interest  and  focus  on  areas  such  as  environmental  protection, 
health  and  worker  safety,  national  security,  individual  privacy,  and  commercial 
competition. However, contributions to the public good must be balanced against es-
pecially  unnecessarily  burdensome  regulations  that  increase  business  costs,  reduce 
productivity, and hinder job creation. 

In  addition,  cost  estimates  often  address  only  the  direct  expense  of  regulation 
compliance, such as reporting requirements and factory retrofitting, but these rules 
can  also  lead  to  increased  prices,  lower  product  quality,  and  other  intangible  costs 
like  loss  of  business  freedom.  Most  importantly,  from  a  global  competitiveness  and 
economic  growth  standpoint,  regulations  can  reduce  innovation  by  inhibiting  new 
ideas,  constraining  product  development,  restricting  production  process  design,  or 
encumbering marketing strategies. 

Streamlining  regulation  is  an  important  component  in  the  President’s  economic 
agenda.  The  Administration  has  taken  several  positive  steps  toward  targeting  bur-
densome regulations for reform. The Office of Management and Budget’s Final 2004 
Report  to  Congress  on  the  Costs  and  Benefits  of  Federal  Regulations  outlined  189 
regulations nominated for reform through private sector input. 

After  a  Federal  agency  review,  including  the  Office  of  Manufacturing  and  Serv-
ices,  OMB  published  a  list  of  76  priority  nominations.  Manufacturing  and  Services 
(MAS)  is  now  working  with  OMB  to  assess  these  regulations  to  find  how  any  pro-
posed  changes  might  affect  manufacturers.  In  MAS,  we  are  focused  on  enhancing 
our  regulatory  expertise  and  will  continue  to  work  with  OMB  and  other  agencies. 

3 Draft  2005  Report  to  Congress  on  the  Costs  and  Benefits  of  Federal  Regulation,  available 

at: http://www.whitehouse.gov/omb/inforeg/regpol-reportslCongress.html. 

4 Crain, W.M. and T.D. Hopkins 2001. ‘‘The Impact of Regulatory Costs on Small Firms.’’ Re-
port  prepared  for  the  Office  of  Advocacy,  U.S.  Small  Business  Administration.  Available  at 
http://www.sba.gov. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

Tort Reform 

We must also be mindful of the effect that higher levels of expected liability costs 
have  on  innovation.  Due  to  the  higher  level  of  expected  costs,  firms  often  have  to 
limit  innovation,  withhold  a  product  from  the  market,  or  forgo  hiring.  If  we  are 
going to have an innovative society, we have to have a strong legal policy that sup-
ports  innovation,  entrepreneurship,  and  allows  business  to  allocate  risk  in  a  trans-
parent manner. 

The  President  has  proposed  measures  that  would  support  this  goal.  We  took  an 
important  step  when  Congress  passed  and  the  President  signed  legislation  aimed 
at  bringing  back  fairness  to  our  Federal  class-action  lawsuits.  We  need  to  keep 
working to address other important related issues such as asbestos reform and med-
ical liability. 
Health Care Costs 

Another aspect of competitiveness is health care costs. Healthcare costs represent 
the  largest  and  fastest  rising  cost  faced  by  U.S.  businesses.  In  order  to  maintain 
a  competitive  and  innovative  environment  where  business  and  job-creation  can 
flourish, we need to make health care more affordable and predictable. 

In  response,  the  President  has  proposed  Association  Health  Plans  that  would  af-
ford  small  businesses  greater  leverage  in  negotiating  the  cost  of  health  insurance 
with  providers.  This  proposal  allows  small  businesses  to  pool  together  to  purchase 
health  coverage  for  workers  at  lower  rates.  The  Administration  also  worked  to  es-
tablish health savings accounts to give workers more control over their health insur-
ance  and  costs.  The  Administration  believes  it  is  important  to  also  reduce  frivolous 
lawsuits against doctors and hospitals that drive up insurance costs for workers and 
businesses.  In  addition,  the  President’s  Health  IT  Initiative  is  designed  to  reduce 
errors, cut waste, and lower costs. The President’s goal is to make electronic medical 
records universally available for most Americans in the next 10 years. 
National Energy Policy 

Energy  costs  are  a  major  concern  for  manufacturers.  Manufacturers  consume 
about  one-third  of  the  U.S.  energy  supply—including  40  percent  of  the  natural  gas 
and 30 percent of the electricity. That is why the President’s energy policy is really 
a manufacturing jobs plan. 

President  Bush  believes  the  growing  U.S.  economy  requires  affordable,  reliable, 
and  secure  supplies  of  energy.  The  President  has  outlined  his  broad  vision  to  move 
America toward less energy dependence and urged Congress to enact a national en-
ergy policy. 
5. Strengthen Education, Retraining, and Economic Diversification 

Increasingly, sophisticated education and training systems are essential to ensur-
ing  that  our  workforce  is  fully  equipped  to  compete  in  a  truly  global  marketplace. 
A  talented  and  skilled  workforce  allows  manufacturing  companies  to  succeed  and 
drive  innovation.  Innovation  increases  the  role  of  high  value-added  work  to  sustain 
our economic prosperity. 

In  order  to  stay  competitive  in  the  face  of  rapid  technological  change,  we  need  to 
build the best skills and attract the best minds. Securing a high quality labor force 
requires an education system that is second-to-none and an effective worker training 
infrastructure  that  includes  vocational  training  as  well  as  worker  retraining  pro-
grams. 

To address these issues, the President has a number of initiatives that would sup-

port U.S. manufacturers’ education and workforce needs. 

For example: 
• The  President  has  announced  a  new  High  School  Initiative  that  will  allocate 
$1.5 billion in his Fiscal Year 2006 Budget to ensure that every high school stu-
dent  graduates  with  the  skills  needed  to  succeed  in  college  and  in  a  globally 
competitive workforce. 
• In the area of training, the President has provided $250 million in new competi-
tive  community-based  grants  under  the  Jobs  for  the  21st  Century  Initiative  to 
strengthen worker training in technical and community colleges. 
• He has also called for the creation of Innovation Training Accounts under which 
workers  would  have  more  choices  about  their  training  through  increasing  the 
use  of  personal  job  training  accounts  focused  on  instruction  in  high-growth  job 
fields. 
• Under the President’s High Growth Job Training Initiative for Advanced Manu-
facturing,  we  have  invested  more  than  $60  million  to  develop  model  partner-
ships between employers, training providers, and the workforce investment sys-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

tem,  in  order  to  identify  and  replicate  best  practices  in  workforce  development 
that  help  U.S.  manufacturers  retain  and  increase  their  competitiveness  in  the 
global economy. 

6. Promote Open Markets and a Level Playing Field 

Opening  export  markets  and  removing  trade  barriers  are  the  key  to  U.S.  manu-
facturing  competitiveness.  Free  and  fair  trade  provides  U.S.  companies  with  new 
markets and opportunities for our products and services. 
Free Trade Agreements 

As an example of our approach to opening markets, the President has signed into 
law several new Free Trade Agreements (FTAs) that will enable U.S. manufacturers 
to compete on a level playing field in these markets for the first time. 

The  Chile  FTA,  which  became  effective  on  January  1,  2004,  boosted  U.S.  exports 
to Chile by almost a billion dollars, and increased U.S. market share of Chilean im-
ports for the first time since 1995. 

Looking  at  another  example—the  U.S.-Australia  FTA—more  than  99  percent  of 
U.S.  manufactured  goods  exports  to  Australia  have  immediately  become  duty  free. 
Manufactured goods account for 93 percent of U.S. exports to Australia. 

CAFTA–DR is another vital instrument for leveling the playing field. Eighty per-
cent  of  all  exports  from  the  CAFTA  region  enter  the  United  States  duty-free.  U.S. 
manufacturers  do  not  currently  share  in  these  benefits.  However,  they  will  under 
CAFTA. With this agreement, remaining tariffs will be phased out over the next 10 
years. 

Bilateral  and  regional  FTAs  help  us  encourage  integration  to  meet  some  of  U.S. 
industry’s  most  important  goals—a  level  playing  field  for  exports,  intellectual  prop-
erty protection, and a single set of standards leading to a more cohesive, integrated 
trading environment for our exporters and investors in that region. 

The United States has concluded a total of ten FTAs—opening up the export mar-
kets  of  these  countries  to  American  industry  and  its  workers.  Of  the  ten  agree-
ments,  the  Bush  Administration  has  entered  into  force  FTAs  with  five  countries— 
Jordan,  Chile,  Singapore,  Australia,  and  Morocco  (Morocco  FTA  in  force  as  of  July 
1,  2005).  New  and  pending  FTA  partners,  taken  together,  would  constitute  Amer-
ica’s third largest export market and the sixth largest economy in the world. 

These agreements are meaningful for the United States. They are comprehensive 
and in many cases carry immediate benefits. They contain broad commitments that 
provide a predictable environment for our exporters and investors. 
Standards 

The  Department  of  Commerce  Standards  Initiative  launched  by  Secretary  Evans 
in  March  2003  underscores  the  need  to  have  consistent  technical  standards  world-
wide.  The  initiative  responds  to  strong  U.S.  industry  concerns  that  barriers  associ-
ated  with  implementation  of  foreign  standards  and  technical  regulations  are  now 
one of the greatest challenges to expanding exports. 

Increasingly,  technical  standards  are  being  mandated  around  the  world  through 
government  laws  and  regulations.  This  is  becoming  a  critical  issue  for  global  com-
petitiveness,  since  they  can  either  facilitate  or  impede  international  trade.  In  the 
United  States,  technical  standards  are  largely  voluntary  and  market-driven,  al-
though with strong government participation and support. 

Many  U.S.  companies  view  discriminatory  or  unnecessarily  trade  restrictive 
standards  as  the  primary  trade  barrier  today,  and  it  is  estimated  that  standards 
issues impact 80 percent of world commodity trade. Major impediments to free trade 
include the establishment of standards specific to a nation or region, redundant test-
ing and compliance procedures, and unilateral and non-transparent standard setting 
processes. 

Open  and  transparent  standards  adoption  generally  has  a  positive  effect  on  fos-
tering  innovation.  Vendors  that  adopt  the  standard  determined  by  the  marketplace 
are rewarded by greater sales and production efficiencies. This, in turn, provides ad-
ditional funding for new rounds of research and innovation. 

The  Department  of  Commerce  supports  the  adoption  of  voluntary  standards, 
whenever  possible  and  the  development  of  standards  in  an  open  and  transparent 
manner  with  industry  input.  The  Department  also  supports  a  policy  of  technology 
neutrality  in  government  procurement  and  other  public  actions.  Technology  neu-
trality  allows  the  market  to  decide  which  products  are  best  and  stimulates  tech-
nology advancement. 
Conclusion 

Prior  to  this  job,  I  have  spent  my  entire  career  in  the  business  sector  building 
a manufacturing company. One of the lessons I have learned is that business contin-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

ually needs to innovate to grow, produce new and better products, and remain com-
petitive.  Many  manufacturers  are  implementing  lean  production  procedures  to  re-
main  competitive.  While  improved  means  of  production  is  important,  I  continue  to 
convey  that  without  innovation  there  is  no  life  after  lean.  American  leadership  in 
innovation  and  the  development  of  new  ideas  and  technologies  holds  great  promise 
for our generation and the next. 

There  are  no  magic  formulas.  We  realize  there  are  many  challenges  facing  U.S. 
manufacturing,  and  while  we  are  making  progress,  there  is  much  more  to  do.  A 
strong  and  vibrant  manufacturing  sector  is  critical  to  providing  jobs  and  maintain-
ing a growing healthy economy. 

Like the President and the Secretary, I am an optimist. I know that when we lift 
the  burdens  from  our  manufacturers,  their  creativity,  their  innovation,  and  their 
work ethic will continue to make our economy the marvel of the world. 

I  look  forward  to  working  with  this  Subcommittee  to  meet  the  challenges  facing 
U.S. manufacturing and welcome any questions you may have. I am also very inter-
ested  to  listen  to  the  views  of  the  Subcommittee  on  how  we  at  the  Department  of 
Commerce  might  best  advance  these  efforts.  Together  we  can  work  to  ensure  that 
the  U.S.  continues  to  remain  the  technological  and  economic  power  that  it  is  well 
into the 21st century. 

Thank you. 

Senator ENSIGN. Thank you, Mr. Frink. We appreciate your testi-

mony. I have a number of questions for you this morning. 

You mention education. As I have gone around talking to various 
people,  one  of  the  statistics  that  comes  out  is  the  number  of  engi-
neers that we are graduating in the United States versus the num-
ber  of  engineers  that  are  graduating  in  China  or  in  India.  What 
specifically,  does  the  President  and  his  Administration  plan  to  do 
to get more children to become interested in science and math? We 
have some of the finest colleges and universities in the world. I re-
alize  that  the  President  believes  passionately  in  improving  K- 
through-12  education,  and  that  the  No  Child  Left  Behind  Act  is 
making  a  positive  impact  on  K-through-12  education.  But,  specifi-
cally,  what  are  the  Administration’s  plans  for  getting  children  in-
terested  in  science  and  math,  and  motivating  them  in  science  and 
math? 

Mr.  FRINK.  Well,  I  agree  with  your  concern,  and,  what  I  hear, 
with  regard  to  having  engineers,  is  that  China  is  producing  about 
five times as many as we are. I would say that, to put that in per-
spective,  they  also  have  five  times  the  population.  But  that  does 
not  minimize,  in  my  mind,  the  concern  for,  and  the  need  for,  engi-
neers. 

The  Administration  has  many  programs  that  are  in  place  to  ad-

Senator ENSIGN. By the way, they are not graduating fives times 

dress this. 

as many lawyers. 

[Laughter.] 
Mr. FRINK. No. And I’m very—— 
Senator  ENSIGN.  We’re  probably  graduating  five  times  as  many 

lawyers as they are. 

Mr.  FRINK.  I  am  very  pleased  to  be  a  part  of  an  Administration 
that’s  probably  short  on  lawyers  and  very  strong  on  business  peo-
ple. 

I can say what I’m doing in my area. I am very concerned about 
education.  People  who  have  gotten  to  know  me  from  my  speaking 
events  know  that  if  I  have  any  legacy,  it’ll  be  driving  education.  I 
see a big concern with marketing of opportunities in manufacturing 
with  regard  to  engineers—mechanical  engineers.  As  I  was  part  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

an awards ceremony on Saturday, one of the students accepting an 
award  mentioned  that  his  class  will  no  longer  be  available,  and 
that he will be the last graduate in mechanical engineering, which 
was  a  tragedy  to  hear.  And  I  think  that  part  of  it  is  a  bad  mar-
keting job. I’m a very big believer in marketing and what it can do. 
I  don’t  think  that  it’s  been  marketed  effectively,  in  terms  of  aca-
demics knowing the opportunities that are there. I have found that 
there  are  so  many  job  opportunities  in  the  marketplace  that  it  de-
fies  description.  Of  the  71  manufacturers  I  visited,  almost  all  of 
them  have  ‘‘help  wanted’’  signs  hanging  from  their  doors,  but  they 
need educated workers for the 21st century, workers with more ad-
vanced education, and they don’t have the people. So, there’s a de-
mand,  and  there  is  a  disconnect  with  the  chain  that  creates  the 
supply. 

So, one of the reasons I want to get together—well, I have gotten 
together,  so  far,  with  labor—Emily  DeRocco,  in  the  Department  of 
Labor,  and  Labor  Secretary  Chau,  and  will  with  the  Department 
of  Education,  as  well—is  to  form  a  committee,  or  a  group,  under 
the  interagency  working  group.  I  know  committees  are  not  exactly 
the best term to use, so we’re going to create a group that will seri-
ously  try  to  get  together  with  the  best  minds  of  academia  and  the 
business  community  to  come  up  with  solutions  for  how  we  can 
drive education, especially in engineering, because that is a critical 
concern. So, that’s a big part of my focus. 

Senator ENSIGN. Well, thank you. I would love to hear any ideas 
that  you  all  come  up  with,  especially  if  any  of  the  proposals  that 
you put forward involve the Congress. 

I  want  to  take  you  down  a  little  different  road,  toward  the  Na-
tional Science Foundation. The President had proposed—and we’ve 
doubled  funding  for  NIH,  and,  for  the  life  sciences,  we’ve  done  a 
good  job  on  increasing  funding.  Some  of  the  complaints  that  I’ve 
heard  from  the  private  sector,  though,  is  that  we  are  not  paying 
enough  attention  to  the  physical  sciences.  I  realize  we’re  in  tight 
budget  times,  and  I  am  certainly  a  fiscal  conservative.  But  there 
are  areas  where  it  is  important  for  the  Federal  Government  to 
spend  its  money.  One  of  the  areas  where  I  believe  we  get  pretty 
good  bang-for-the-buck  is  investing  in  basic  research.  Investing  in 
the  National  Science  Foundation  and  the  research  it  funds  in  the 
physical  sciences  helps  our  country  to  remain  competitive  in  the 
global  economy.  Does  the  Administration  think  that  we  are  ade-
quately funding NSF? 

Mr.  FRINK.  Well,  I  think  what  I  would  like  to  do  is,  rather  than 
give  you  an  inefficient  answer,  or  a  bad  answer,  I’d  like  to  come 
back with that in the form of an educated answer. 

I know that the President, as I mentioned in my report, has allo-
cated  $132  billion  to  research  and  development.  Where  it’s  allo-
cated  and  where  it  goes,  I  don’t  have  the  breakdown.  I  think,  in 
general terms, that program, like others, that drive manufacturing 
at the high-tech level or other levels, has been addressed in budget 
cuts.  And  I  don’t  have,  always,  the  good  answer  for  that.  I  know 
that  in  business  you  have  to  make  difficult  decisions.  And  some-
times,  unless  you’re  in  the  forefront  of  that  decision  process,  you 
may  have  a  reason  for  why  that  decision  was  made.  And  so,  my 
sense is that we should put some trust and faith in the people that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

made  those  decisions  for  having  had  a  reason,  but  I  also  believe 
that it’s our job to question them. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  I  would  encourage  the  Administration—you 
know,  I’m  a  big  believer  in  using  the  dollars  that  we  have  effec-
tively.  While  $132  billion  is  a  lot  of  money,  the  necessary  question 
is how is its usage prioritized. You know, up here in the Congress, 
we  have  a  lot  of  defenders  of  NASA,  but  NASA  is  one  of  the  most 
inefficient  bureaucracies  that  we  have  in  the  Federal  Government, 
and  a  lot  of  the  money  we  spend  on  NASA  development  could  be 
spent a lot better at the National Science Foundation in grants and 
research that encourage innovation. There is not a lot of innovation 
coming  out  of  NASA  these  days.  But  we  continue  to  spend  a  lot  of 
money there. 

We  ought  to  be  looking  at  the  dollars  that  we’re  spending,  and 
using good metrics to find out where we’re getting the bang for the 
buck.  The  Administration  started  doing  that,  and  I  realize,  with 
the  PAR,  that  they  are  about  60  percent  through,  of  the  dollars 
that  they’re  measuring  with  metrics.  But  I  would  continue  to  en-
courage  the  Administration,  in  this  area,  especially  when  the  dol-
lars  are  so  precious  and  when  they  can  be  stretched  so  far  if  we 
spend  them  correctly  to  use  metrics  in  order  to  determine  our  re-
turn-on-investment. 

I  have  some  additional  questions,  but  I  want  to  turn  it  over  to 

Senator Allen. 

Senator Allen? 
Mr. FRINK. Sure. 

STATEMENT OF HON. GEORGE ALLEN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM VIRGINIA 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I really want to com-
mend  you  for  holding  this  hearing.  You  and  I  both  are  very  pas-
sionate  about  the  technology,  but  competitiveness  is  absolutely  es-
sential for us, as a country. If we’re going to compete and succeed, 
we  need  to  embrace  the  advances  of  technology,  particularly  in 
manufacturing,  for  the  manufacturing  will  be  performed  with 
greater  efficiency,  better  quality,  and  less  waste.  It’s  the  only  way 
that we’re going to compete and succeed. We’re not going to be able 
to do it with lax environmental laws or low wages. 

And  I  was  looking  at  your  statement  here,  overall,  on—Mr. 
Frink—on the President’s plan, things that are important. Tax poli-
cies—absolutely  important  if  we’re  going  to  get  investment  in  this 
country.  We  can’t  have  taxes  that  are  so  high  that  it  prohibits  in-
vestment  here.  Same  with  regulations.  Regulations  need  to  be 
based on sound science, not political science. 

What  the  Chairman  talked  about  on  education—a  concern  that 
I  have,  as  well—is  that  the  engineering  graduates  that  we’re  ma-
triculating in this country, they will be the ones, in the future, who 
will  be  designing  and  developing  the  new  innovations,  inventions, 
and  intellectual  property.  And  when  you  look  at  the  numbers  that 
we  are  matriculating,  compared  to  China,  compared  to  India,  it  is 
very  worrisome.  In  fact,  40  percent  of  our  engineering  graduates 
are  from  overseas.  Now,  I  want  this  country  to  be  the  magnet  for 
the world’s best minds. I want them to come here. And we need to 
be the world capital of innovation, including manufacturing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

So,  most  of  the  things  you’re  saying  here—make  a  great  deal  of 
sense.  I  keep  this  insourcing  survey  from  the  Organization  for 
International Investment, and looking at their matrixes and things 
that  are  important  for  it.  And  I  know  my  Chairman  here,  and  I, 
worked  together  on  repatriation  of  profits.  If  just  U.S.  companies 
get their money back in here to invest in this country, that’s an im-
portant tax policy. Also, let’s get companies from France, Germany, 
and Japan to invest in the United States to serve the North Amer-
ican market, rather than go to Brazil or somewhere else. 

I’m  not  going  to  ask  any  more  than  the  Chairman  did,  on  the 
students getting interested in science and technology and engineer-
ing,  but  it  really  is  important  for  the  security  of  our  country.  The 
energy  bill  that  we’re  going  to  be  passing  in  the  next  few  weeks 
will be important for security and jobs, and also competitiveness of 
our country, because energy costs matter. 

Where  we’re  behind,  that  are  important  issues,  but  we  have  a 
weak  performance,  are  tax  system,  legal  system,  labor  costs,  and 
healthcare costs. So, those are important ones to address. 

One other thing on our trade agreements that I’d like to ask you, 
Mr.  Frink,  is  that  we  have  free  trade  agreements,  but  what  is  the 
Administration  doing  to  level  the  playing  field,  as  far  as  manufac-
turers, globally? China, in the past, for example, for the fabrication 
of semiconductor chips—they have a 17 percent value-added tax in 
China  on  microchips;  however,  if  they’re  designed  in  China,  they 
get  a  rebate.  And,  in  fact,  if  they’re  designed  and  fabricated  in 
China,  they  get  a  14  percent  rebate.  So,  if  you’re  a  manufacturer 
assembling  some  product  in  China,  and  you  get  a  choice  between 
microchips, semiconductor chips, fabricated in the United States, or 
elsewhere,  and  it’s  a  17  percent  tax,  where  it’s  a  3  percent  tax  if 
it’s  Chinese,  it’s  not  going  to  be  too  hard  for—you  know,  a  fourth- 
grader could figure this out, that, gosh, you’re going to go with the 
cheaper  chips.  And  so,  it’s  important  that  we  enforce  trade  agree-
ments so there’s a level playing field. 

Could  you  share  with  us  what  the  Administration  is  doing  to 
make  sure  that  there  is  a  level  playing  field,  that  other  countries, 
insofar as manufacturing, are living up to their agreements? 

Mr. FRINK. Well, thank you, first of all, Senator. I think we’re so 
totally  on  the  same  page,  especially  with  regard  to  education.  I’m 
so  very  pleased  that  both  of  you  feel  so  strongly  about  that.  It  is 
the single most important concern I have for the future of manufac-
turing.  And  that  was  addressed  in  my  marching  orders,  but  prob-
ably  not  with  as  much  emphasis  as  I’ve  learned  from  being  in  the 
forefront of manufacturers. 

As to the point about trade and what we can do to level the play-
ing  field,  we  provide,  in  our  office,  through  the  Office  of  Industry 
Analysis,  most  of  the  information  that  is  used  by  our  trade  rep-
resentatives,  USTR.  So,  the  input  that  we  get,  which  will  include 
what  you  just  mentioned,  is  what  we  will  provide  USTR,  in  terms 
of the areas that we need to be addressing when we get in negotia-
tions at WTO events, at the JCCT meeting, coming up in the Doha 
conferences.  These  are  all  the  areas  on  which  we  provide  informa-
tion. And I think their arguing points are only as good as the infor-
mation that we provide. And so, what we’re trying to do is, not only 
provide  the  best  information,  but  also  quantify  the  impact  so  they 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

can see what kind of impact they’re having on our economy, on the 
businesses.  And  I  think  that  is  such  an  important  area  within  my 
Department.  It’s  Manufacturing  and  Services.  We  have  Jack 
McDougall  behind  me.  He  is  our  new  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary 
for  Industry  Analysis.  Jack  comes  from  the  private  sector.  He’s 
going  to  take  that  department  and,  I  think,  bring  some  creative 
ideas  on  how  we  can  take  the  information  we  generate  and  make 
it  more  effective  at  the  point  where  it  will  be  delivered.  We  can’t 
personally deliver that, but we can provide the information. 

And  I  think  that  Rob  Portman,  in  this  new  position,  is  going  to 
be an excellent choice to become the lead spokesman for our trade. 
And  I  think  that  the  President’s  having  put  him  in  place  is  going 
to be a big factor in how we level the playing field as he leads our 
debates with regard to issues such as the one you mentioned. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Well,  thank  you.  And  I  think  that  the  evidence 
that you present is important, whether that’s in bedroom furniture, 
whether it’s in semiconductors, whether it’s in textiles, whether it’s 
in  protecting  our  intellectual  property,  or  other  areas  that  might 
arise in the future. 

Let  me  finish,  since  my  time’s  running  out  here.  The  other  as-
pect,  in  addition  to  the  tax  and  regulatory,  energy,  and  education, 
which is important is research in key areas of the future. I actually 
do  think  that  you’re  all  misallocating  a  priority,  insofar  as  NASA 
is  concerned,  and  that’s  in  aeronautics.  The  previous  Administra-
tion  cut  aeronautics  research  and  development  by  half.  The  pro-
posals  of  this  Administration  are  to  cut  it  in  half  again.  For  the 
first time in history, our sales of aircraft in the United States were 
not  first  in  the  world;  the  Europeans  were  number  one.  The  Euro-
peans  have  a  strategic  plan  to  dominate  by  the  year  2020  in  aero-
nautics, and they’re on their way to doing it. And I think it’s short-
sighted to—for our military capabilities, as well as civilian aviation 
and  aircraft,  to  not  have  the  next-generation  or  the  new  vehicle 
systems  for  lighter,  faster,  quieter,  less-polluting  aircraft,  or 
hypersonic  flight,  as  well.  And  so,  that’s  the  normal  differences  I 
suppose one would have between an Administration and legislative 
branch, but there are those of us who think that that is an impor-
tant aspect for the future. 

The other is nanotechnology. Senator Wyden was once a Member 
of  this  Committee,  and  I  have  moved  forward,  and  the  President 
signed,  the  Nanotechnology  Research  and  Development  Act.  It  is 
the  largest  increase,  and  I  want  to  commend  you  all  for  following 
along with it, the largest increase in basic scientific research since 
the  space  program.  And  the  nanotechnology  area  is  a  very  multi-
faceted  one.  It’ll  affect  life  sciences,  materials  engineering,  and 
microelectronics.  And  it  is  important  that  this  country  stay  in  the 
lead  there.  And  I  want  to  commend  the  Administration  for,  in  a 
very  tight  and  taut  budget,  making  nanotechnology,  which  will  af-
fect  manufacturing,  particularly  in  materials  engineering.  Nano-
technology  will  affect  everything  we  use,  whether  that’s  a  vehicle 
or  whether  it’s—especially  the  advancements  in  some  of  the  bio-
technology areas. So, I want to commend you all there. And, where 
you can, make sure that where we’re investing in research and de-
velopment,  in  coordination  with  the  universities  and  the  private 
sector, that we look at the competitiveness of this country, in com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

parison  to  what  other  countries  are  doing,  whether  it’s  in  aero-
nautics or whether that’s in nanotechnology. 

Mr. FRINK. Thank you, Senator. 
I  have  been  in  this  new  position  a  little  over  8  months,  and  I 
have to say I’m still in the learning curve. One of the benefits I will 
have  to  help  my  education  process  will  be  the  fact  that  I’m  going, 
in  a  couple  of  weeks,  to  the  biennial  Paris  Air  Show,  where  I  will 
be interacting with all the leading individuals that drive aerospace, 
and speaking about every area you were just talking about. And I’ll 
walk away with a better sense of where we need to be. I get much 
more  passionate  in  how  I  promote  anything  when  I  get  to  learn 
how  it  affects  our  economy.  And  I  look  forward  to  that.  I’m  going 
to  ask  hard  questions.  I’m  always  dubious  of  trips  and  how  much 
effect  you  get  from  those.  I’m  going  to  walk  away,  hopefully,  with 
a  strong  sense  of  that  trip  being  worthwhile,  and  that  I’ll  have  a 
better  understanding  of  where  our  limited  dollars  are  going.  And 
if  I  see  there’s  a  need,  I  will  not  hesitate  to  speak  up  and  provide 
my recommendations as to where I see the need. 

Part  of  my  job  is  to  provide  advice—to  take  what  I  see  from  my 
front-line experience and move it up through the chain. So, I expect 
to do just that. 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you, Mr. Frink. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator ENSIGN. Senator Kerry? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator KERRY. Mr. Chairman, thank you very much. I apologize 
to  the  witnesses,  and  to  you,  for  not  being  able  to  be  here  earlier. 
I  had  a  meeting  off  campus,  so  to  speak,  which  took  longer  than 
I expected. 

I  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  today.  I  think  this  is  per-
haps  the  most  important  topic  before  the  nation,  frankly.  And  the 
outcome of the subjects that we’re talking about here today is real-
ly  linked  to  a  whole  series  of  issues  which  aren’t  in  the  sole  juris-
diction  of  this  Committee,  but  which  are  critical  to  the  Congress, 
itself—our  tax  policy,  our  budget,  our  fiscal  policy,  and  our  trade 
policy. They’re all linked. 

But what disturbs me, candidly, Mr. Frink—and I say this to the 
Administration,  in  absentia,  in  a  sense—is  that  we  really  don’t 
have  a  national  plan.  We’re,  sort  of,  drifting  around  on  this  topic. 
In  the  last  4  or  5  years,  we’ve  lost  one  out  of  every  six  manufac-
turing jobs. We’ve lost 2.7 million, total. There still was not one net 
new  job  created  under  this  Administration  in  the  last  four  and  a 
half  years.  And,  again,  last  month  I  think  it  was  something  like 
70,000  or  so  lost.  I’ve  forgotten  the  exact  figures,  but  you  have  to 
create about 300,000 just to stay even. And we’re not. 

You  guys  are  cutting  at  least  90  percent  of  the  Manufacturing 
Extension Program, which is hard for me to believe. I don’t under-
stand  the  rationale  of  that.  Ask  any  small  enterprise  that’s  been 
involved  with  the  Manufacturing  Extension  Program,  and  they’ll 
tell you it has helped them take products to market, it helps them 
take  them  from  laboratory  to  shelf.  There  are  all  kinds  of  upside 
benefits.  But  it’s  being  cut.  Why?  So  we  can  give  the  wealthiest 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

people in America another tax cut? You know, as a Senator you get 
the  privilege  of  meeting  with  some  of  these  wealthy  people  all  the 
time, and, I’ll tell you, I’ve sat with them, and not one of them has 
said  to  me,  ‘‘I  need  this  cut,’’  or,  ‘‘I  want  this  cut.’’  They’ll  take  it. 
It’ll put more cash in their pocket, and they’ll sit there and tell you 
that,  but  it’s  not  going  to  change  their  investment  decisions.  How 
they invest money, what they invest it in, is going to be the same, 
with  or  without  the  tax  cut.  It’s  going  to  be  based  on  the  prospect 
of  a  return-on-investment.  It’s  going  to  be  based  on  how  fast  they 
will  earn  money,  and  how  well  the  marketplace  is  working.  And 
our marketplace is not working very well, for a lot of different rea-
sons. 

Now, you know, astoundingly, when you measure, California lost 
353,700  manufacturing  jobs  in  the  last  4  or  5  years;  Michigan  lost 
210,000.  My  home  state  of  Massachusetts  lost  about  110,000.  And 
we’re  pretty  good  in  our  state,  as  they  are  in  California  and  some 
other  states  in  the  country,  at  using  technology  to  its  advantage 
and  making  new  jobs.  There  has  been  a  slight  upward  tick  in  pro-
ductivity. But, just this week, the Institute for Supply Management 
reported that the manufacturing sector is again losing momentum. 
That’s their quote. They note that the rate of growth in new orders 
continues to decline, the employment index has failed to grow. And 
they  openly  question  whether  the  manufacturing  growth  cycle  is 
coming  to  an  end.  This  economic  slide  has  hurt  businesses,  inves-
tors, workers, and communities. 

Now,  I’m  not  suggesting  to  you—and  I  would  never  suggest 
this—that  the  government  can  control,  completely  by  itself,  the  di-
rection  of  the  slide.  We  all  know  it’s  much  more  complicated  than 
that, and there are other things that play in it. But all of us under-
stand that we set an overall framework within which private inves-
tors  make  choices  and  have  the  availability  of  making  those 
choices. 

I  had  the  President  of  Massachusetts  Institute  of  Technology 
come to me the other day, the new president, and talk to me about 
their  decline  in  the  numbers  of  people  of  caliber  who  have  been 
coming  from  abroad,  partly  because  of  9/11,  but  also  other  transi-
tion  that’s  taken  place,  the  lack  of  American  students  going  into 
science, math, biology, technologies, and basic sciences, in addition 
to  the  lack  of  commitment  of  the  Federal  dollars  that  used  to  be 
there in many of those areas. And so, there’s a just general decline. 
In  Asia,  they  are  catching  up  to  us  in  areas  of  innovation  where 
we  have  traditionally—in  software  and  other  things—been  the 
leaders. They’re turning out 300,000 engineers a year in China and 
India. We’re going downwards. 

That’s the future. That is the future. And, you know, when some-
body like Bill Gates tells us that American schools, even sometimes 
when they’re working very effectively, are obsolete, we’d better stop 
and  worry.  I  honestly—I  don’t  see  the  Administration  grabbing 
onto  this  with  the  kind  of  urgency  and  energy  that  it  ought  to  be. 
We  have  the  PCAST  but  many  of  the  Council’s  own  recommenda-
tions  have  been  ignored,  certainly  not  implemented.  I’ve  heard 
from  executives  at  mid-sized  manufacturing  firms  who  say  they’ve 
cut  costs  dramatically,  but  they  still  can’t  compete.  Healthcare 
costs  are  the  biggest  drag  on  our  economy.  The  only  proposal  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

this  Administration  are  association  health  plans,  which  will  affect, 
at  maximum,  maybe  two  million  people.  But  we’ve  got  47  million 
without  healthcare,  and  we’ve  got  GM,  Ford,  with  the  equivalent 
of  junk  bonds.  GM  is  now  moving  people  to  China  for  manufac-
turing.  I  mean,  this  is  so  much  more  serious  than  I  think  the  Ad-
ministration seems to grasp or be willing to deal with. 

Tom  Howell  is  going  to  point  out,  in  his  testimony  today,  what 
Japan  and  the  EU  are  doing  in  a  large-scale,  long-range  R&D 
project  that’s  aimed  at  developing  all  leading-edge  technologies. 
And  these  projects  that  they’re  engaged  in  are  way  beyond  what 
we’re doing, or even thinking about. 

The fact is that the focus of some entities has been almost exclu-
sively on tort reform, and, while all of us accept that we need some 
tort reform, and there’s a reasonable place, with respect to tort re-
form,  to  wind  up,  it’s  such  a  larger  playing  field  than  just  tort  re-
form that it’s, sort of, astonishing for me to see the lack of planning 
and implementation. 

So,  maybe,  Mr.  Frink,  you  want  to  respond  to  some  of  what  I’ve 
just  said,  but  I  specifically  want  to  ask  you  why  it  is  that  the  Ad-
ministration  is  cutting  funding  to  these  essential  technology  incu-
bator  efforts,  like  the  Manufacturing  Extension  Program  or  even 
some of the basic science and research programs. 

Mr. FRINK. Thank you, Senator. There’s a lot on the plate there. 
Senator KERRY. Yes, there is. But there is a lot on the plate. 
Mr. FRINK. Yes, there is. Speaking to that specific program, there 

have been a lot of cuts in the budget, overall. I—— 

Senator KERRY. Why? 
Mr.  FRINK.  Well,  this  year’s  budget  has  required  cuts.  And—— 
Senator KERRY. Why? 
Mr. FRINK. I’m not the economist or the person who—— 
Senator  KERRY.  What’s  the  priority?  What  is  the  priority  of  this 

Administration? What’s the top priority? 

Mr. FRINK. Jobs. 
Senator KERRY. OK. And how are they going to create those jobs? 
Mr.  FRINK.  Well,  one  of  the  things  is  my  job,  which  itself  was 
newly  created.  This  is  the  first  time  in  history  that  we’ve  had  a 
person,  an  individual,  a  lead  advocate  to  help  manufacturing.  And 
I came from—— 

Senator KERRY. It’s the only manufacturing job created in Amer-

ica. 

Mr.  FRINK.  Well,  it’s  a  good  one.  It  has  the  potential  to  make  a 

difference. And we also have a manufacturing council. 

Senator KERRY. But the top priority of this Administration, if you 
say  it’s  jobs,  why  are  they  cutting  the  Manufacturing  Extension 
Program? Why are they reducing investment in the sciences, in the 
grants?  Why  is  it  harder  for  kids  to  go  to  school?  Pell  Grants  are 
down. 

Mr. FRINK. I think, first, with regard—— 
Senator  KERRY.  So  we  can  have  a  tax  cut?  That’s  the  priority— 

is a tax cut. 

Mr.  FRINK.  Well,  I’m  not  a  politician.  I  can’t  speak  to  what  you 
might view as a priority. I can only tell you that my firsthand expe-
rience in the front lines—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

Senator KERRY. But if you’re going to come and tell me we don’t 
have the money, why don’t we have the money? It’s a simple ques-
tion. 

Mr.  FRINK.  I  don’t  know  that  we  don’t  have  sufficient  money  to 

meet our objectives. I think that a lot of what—— 

Senator KERRY. Well, why are you cutting it, then? 
Mr.  FRINK.  Well,  if  I  can  finish,  I  would  like  to  just  say  that  I 
think,  to  some  degree,  government  may  be  learning  what  business 
learned  a  long  time  ago,  and  that  is  how  to  get  by  with  less  and 
still  produce  great  results.  I  don’t  know  that  we  didn’t  have  fat  in 
many of the programs we’ve had. I don’t know. 

Senator KERRY. Fat in the Manufacturing Extension Program? 
Mr.  FRINK.  I  think  that  program  was  not  intended  to  be  dis-
banded.  The  support  that  was  given  was  intended  to  keep  all  the 
centers up and running—— 

Senator KERRY. It’s a 90 percent cut, Mr. Frink. 
Mr. FRINK. I—— 
Senator KERRY. A 90 percent cut. That’s—— 
Mr. FRINK.—believe the cut was 46 percent. 
Senator KERRY. It was 90 percent. 
Mr. FRINK. Well, the numbers I have show otherwise. 
Senator KERRY. Well, what’s the justification for 46 percent? The 

money doesn’t go to people; it goes to a project. 

Mr.  FRINK.  That’s  one  area  with  regard  to  a  bigger  picture  of 
what’s  being  done  to  support  manufacturing.  I  never  look  at  one 
targeted  area.  You  could  say,  ‘‘This  is  what  we’re  not  doing,’’  but 
then  there’s  also,  ‘‘What  are  we  doing?’’  I  think  the  position  that 
I have, the fact that we have a Manufacturing Council that’s work-
ing  at  lowering  the  barrier  costs  for  manufacturers  around  the 
country is a move forward. 

Senator  KERRY.  The  Manufacturing  Council’s  report  deals  en-

tirely with tort reform. 

Mr. FRINK. That’s—— 
Senator KERRY. That’s what they’ve done. 
Mr. FRINK. No, that’s only one of the Subcommittee reports. The 
subcommittees  have  reported  on  tort  reform,  on  the  issue  of 
healthcare. On energy, we’re working on innovation. It provides ad-
vice.  It  just  so  happened  that  that  one  document  was  used  by  the 
President, almost verbatim, when he discussed the issue of tort re-
form,  and  the  group,  itself,  felt  very  pleased  that  their  work  was 
responded to, which I think is—— 

Senator KERRY. How was it responded to? 
Mr. FRINK. Well, as—— 
Senator KERRY. How has it been—— 
Mr.  FRINK.—I  said,  the  information  that  they  put  in  their  white 
paper,  the  President  just  about  used  their  points  in  the  white 
paper—— 

Senator  KERRY.  How  has  it  been  translated  into  the  budget  and 

into policies? 

Mr.  FRINK.  Well,  in  the  policies,  I  think  that’s  what  drove  that 
decision  recently  with  regard  to  tort  reform,  the  first  step  in  tort 
reform, that took place—was it in January, February? 

Senator KERRY. I’m asking beyond tort reform. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Mr.  FRINK.  OK.  We’re  on  another  subject.  What  was  it—I’m 

21 

sorry—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  I’m  saying,  how  has  the  Council  contrib-
uted to the budget or to any policy that’s been implemented or that 
we’re working on today? 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Mr.  Frink,  after  you  answer  this—I’m  sorry, 

Senator Kerry—I’m going to have to go to Senator Pryor. 

Senator KERRY. Absolutely. 
Mr. FRINK. One thing I can tell you is this. I learned a very good 
lesson  from  Senator  DeMint  when  I  spent  some  time  with  him  in 
South Carolina. He said, ‘‘Do not get discouraged with what you do 
and the fact that it doesn’t show immediate results. Think of what 
you do as a big ship, and you move the wheel slightly, and perhaps 
the  trajectory  of  how  your  decisions  or  what  you  influence  moves 
down  the  line  will  show  up,  and,  two  secretaries  from  now,  some-
body might be taking the bows for what you accomplish.’’ 

I  know  that  we  are  moving  things  in  the  right  direction,  and  I 
have  confidence  that,  down  the  line,  a  lot  of  what  we  do  will  show 
results. The Manufacturing Council is relatively new. It’s less than 
a year old. It has just had its fourth meeting. It is still up and run-
ning.  I  am  very  optimistic.  And  the  14,000  manufacturers  that  I 
have  seen  in  the  short  time  I’ve  been  in  this  position  have  been 
bursting  with  optimism  over  how  they  feel  the  economy  is  moving 
in their behalf. Certainly, some of them have had some issues and 
areas of concern, but part of my job is to work on those areas, and 
I intend to do that. And I do have a passionate concern for people. 

Senator ENSIGN. Go ahead, Senator Kerry. 
Senator KERRY. I thank the Chairman for his indulgence on this, 
but let me just say to you, Mr. Frink, I know you’re new to the job, 
but  what  I’m  trying  to  emphasize  is,  there’s  a  lot  of  frustration  in 
a  lot  of  sectors  of  our  economy.  I’m  not  speaking  for  myself,  and 
I’m  certainly  not  putting  a  party  label  on  this.  I  have  talked  to 
manufacturers, to business people all over the country, and to edu-
cators  across  the  country.  The  2006  budget,  unfortunately,  has  4 
percent less than the 2005 level for Department of Labor’s training 
programs. It has 89 percent less for the Department of Education’s 
vocational and adult education program. It has $104 million in cuts 
to  the  National  Science  Foundation’s  education  and  human  re-
sources  account.  I  mean,  I  can  go  down  a  long  list,  where  there’s 
just  a  departure  from  the  stated  goals,  or  even  the  Council’s  find-
ings, and what is really happening. And I think that’s the frustra-
tion. And I ask you, take the time to go look at this, and be an ad-
vocate  within  the  Administration  for  the  reality  here.  Because  the 
reality  that  most  people  feel  out  in  the  sector—I  was  just  out  in 
Silicon  Valley,  I  was  out  talking  to  people—they’re  deeply  frus-
trated  and  deeply  concerned.  And  these  are  Republicans,  Conserv-
atives,  Democrats,  Independents,  they’re  just  business  people  try-
ing  to  compete  in  an  increasingly  difficult  world.  And  we’ve  got  to 
do a better job of helping create a framework for them to do it. 

Senator ENSIGN. Senator Pryor? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Let  me  ask  this,  Mr.  Frink,  if  I  may.  Your  position  was  created 
as a response to the growing concern in this country that we’ve lost 
about 2 million manufacturing jobs in 4 years. My question for you 
is, what would you consider to be your accomplishments to date in 
your new post? What have you been able to accomplish? 

Mr. FRINK. Well, as I mentioned in my opening statement, I have 
reached  out  to  and  visited  a  considerable  amount  of  the  industry 
that  I  will  be  serving.  There  is  a  report  that  was  written,  called 
‘‘Manufacturing  in  America,’’  which  represents  my  marching  or-
ders. That report has 57 recommendations. We have, to date, since 
I’ve been onboard, accomplished 21 of those recommendations. That 
report  was  a  byproduct  of  roundtables  that  took  place  around  the 
country,  asking  manufacturers  what  their  concerns  were  about 
their  ability  to  be  competitive.  And  that  report  also  included  the 
recommendations  to  create  my  position,  a  manufacturing  council, 
and  many  other  recommendations,  the  total  being  57.  We  have  21 
completed.  We’ll  expect  to  make  that  22  in  the  next  couple  of 
weeks, because we’ll have an interagency group on manufacturing. 
We have also put in a new Deputy Assistant Secretary for Industry 
Analysis, and a Director for Economic Analysis. We’re going to con-
tinue  to  build  a  team  that  will  ensure  that  the  concerns  of  manu-
facturers are heard and addressed. We established the fact that the 
Council  will  play  an  integral  role  in  identifying  priority  manufac-
turing  issues.  They  organized  a  task  force  addressing  a  lot  of  the 
issues. 

We’re  8  months  into  this  new  position.  I  admit  to  the  fact  that 
I still have a lot to learn. But, I think that we have made progress. 
I’ve been on an 8-day trade mission, and I think that our best work 
is ahead of us, without a doubt. 

Senator PRYOR. I will—— 
Mr.  FRINK.  And  I  think  that  for  the  period  of  time  that  we’ve 

been in place, we’ve made some measurable accomplishments. 

Senator  PRYOR.  All  right,  well,  let  me  ask  that.  You  talk  about 
measurable accomplishments. In the Manufacturing in America re-
port  that  you  cited  a  moment  ago,  it  calls  for  you  to  lead  a  bench-
mark  analysis  to  measure  your  progress.  Have  you  done  that  yet? 
Have you done a benchmark analysis? 

Mr. FRINK. We’re working on that. 
Senator PRYOR. OK. When will that be completed? 
Mr. FRINK. Well, I think at the end of the first year. I think Sep-
tember  8th  or  9th  is  when  I  was  sworn  in,  so  around  the  8th  or 
9th, I think we should have that ready to show where we were and 
where we are now. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And  you  said  there’s  57  recommendations  in 

Manufacturing in America. 

Mr. FRINK. Correct. 
Senator PRYOR. And you’ve completed 21, soon to be 22. 
Mr. FRINK. Implemented. 
Senator PRYOR. Implemented. 
Mr. FRINK. Yes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

Senator PRYOR. And does that mean those 21, soon to be 22, are 

done—right? They’re done. 

Mr. FRINK. Well, the work’s started on those, for example, my po-
sition  is  not  finished.  I’m  one  of  those  21  recommendations,  so 
there’s a lot of work I will be continually doing—— 

Senator PRYOR. No, I guess that’s what I’m asking you. You talk 
about  these  21,  soon  to  be  22.  Does  that  mean  that  they  are—you 
said  implemented  or  done  or  completed—I  mean,  does  that  mean 
that they’re done, or they’re all, sort of, works in progress? 

Mr. FRINK. Works in progress. 
Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  So,  you  still  have  30-some-odd—35,  36  rec-

ommendations to go. Do you have a timetable on those? 

Mr. FRINK. No, sir. 
Senator PRYOR. Will that be done—— 
Mr. FRINK. A lot of those require legislation. That’s an area that 
I’m  going  to  be  working  on.  One  of  my  targets  right  now  is  to  get 
more  familiar  with  the  Hill  and  the  people  that  will  be  able  to 
make  the  decisions  on  a  lot  of  the  legislative  parts  of  those  rec-
ommendations  so  that  I  can  advocate  on  behalf  of  manufacturers, 
where I view legislation needs to be moved. 

Senator  PRYOR.  All  right.  One  thing  that  Senator  Kerry  asked  a 
few  moments  ago  was  about  this  Manufacturing  Council  Sub-
committee  on  the  U.S.  Workforce.  As  I  understand  what  you  all 
said  in  that,  and  your  response  to  that,  was  that—basically,  you 
were  talking  about  one  subcommittee  report,  right?  Not  the  entire 
effort, but one subcommittee. 

Mr.  FRINK.  No,  we  actually  have  three  subcommittees,  but  I 

think he was referring to the one on tort reform. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Right.  And  you  mentioned  the  President  had 

cited that—— 

Mr. FRINK. Yes. 
Senator PRYOR.—correct? 
Mr. FRINK. I think that in all councils there is a bit of frustration 
as to the work they do and whether or not it gets used, and I think 
it  was  a  big  triumph  for  our  council  to  know  that  the  President 
cited its report on tort reform, with many of the recommendations, 
and  used  a  lot  of  the  facts  contained  in  it  to  build  a  case  for  tort 
reform. 

Senator PRYOR. As I understand—maybe I’m wrong about this— 
as  I  understand  the  work  of  that  subcommittee,  you  looked  at 
issues facing manufacturers, and the focus was healthcare and ris-
ing  healthcare  costs.  And  I  would  say—and  I  wonder  if  you  would 
agree—that  there  are  more  challenges  facing  the  manufacturer 
than  just  healthcare  and  healthcare  costs.  Would  you  agree  with 
that? 

Mr. FRINK. Absolutely. 
Senator  PRYOR.  And  as  part  of  the  Subcommittee’s  work,  they 

seemed to focus on medical liability and tort reform—— 

Mr. FRINK. And energy and innovation. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Right,  but  they  seemed  to  focus  on  these  two  as 
part  of  the—as  the  solution  for  healthcare  and  rising  healthcare 
costs.  And  I  would  say—and  I  wonder  if  you  would  agree—that 
healthcare  and  rising  healthcare  costs  is  more  complicated  than 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

simply  tort  reform  and  medical  liability.  Would  you  agree  with  me 
on that? 

Mr. FRINK. I do. I would. 
Senator PRYOR. What are—if you could list out the top—say, the 
top  five  challenges  that  American  manufacturers  are  facing  today, 
what are their top five, or maybe ten—I know I’m about out of time 
here—but what are the top five, or maybe top ten, things that we, 
in the Congress, should be focusing on to try to help our manufac-
turers? 

Mr.  FRINK.  There  are  the  big  concerns.  Probably  number  one 
would be healthcare costs, when you know of the automobile indus-
try  having  cited  as  much  as  $1,700  per  car  is  what  healthcare  af-
fects,  in  terms  of  a  single  automobile.  Tort  reform:  the  Chairman 
referred  to  the  $230-some  billion,  I  think  it’s  almost  900-or-so  dol-
lars  spent  per  person  in  the  United  States  as  a  result  of  frivolous 
lawsuits.  Energy  is  a  big  factor.  The  manufacturing  industry  uses 
about 30–35 percent of all energy, so the issue of affordable energy 
is huge, to the majority of the manufacturing world. 

We have, in America, a 22.4 percent higher cost of doing business 
than  our  foreign  counterparts.  These  are  the  areas  I  have  to  work 
on.  But  the  area  that  I  have  seen,  the  one  that  Al  Frink  has  seen 
from  his  private-sector  experience,  is  a  critical  concern  for  edu-
cation.  As  I  entered  into  this  world  and  into  a  kind  of  very  politi-
cally charged election—and a lot of it had to do with offshoring and 
jobs  going  away—I  visited  71  manufacturers  in  a  relatively  con-
densed period of time, and every one of those companies had help- 
wanted  signs  hanging  from  the  door:  ‘‘Need  help,’’  ‘‘Desperately 
need  help.’’  The  first  company  I  visited  was  Benson  Trucks.  They 
produce one of the finest truck beds in the business. They couldn’t 
find  welders.  They  would  hire  50  tomorrow,  the  head  of  the  com-
pany,  Gary,  said.  Mack  Truck,  if  it  could,  would  hire  100  drivers 
tomorrow. Can’t even find qualified drivers. And he said, ‘‘Twenty- 
five  percent  of  our  drivers  are  women.’’  I  said,  ‘‘What  did  the  job 
pay?’’ He said, ‘‘It starts around $45,000. In a couple of years, with 
a  good  route,  you  could  make  $100,000.’’  There’s  a  tremendous 
shortage  of  qualified,  educated  help.  Jobs  are  plentiful,  but  there’s 
an insufficient number of trained people out there. So, I think edu-
cation  is  probably  the  single  most  important  area  that  manufac-
turing faces, moving forward. 

Second  is  innovation.  As  I  work  on  trying  to  lower  the  barrier 
costs  for  companies  around  the  country,  I  think  there’s  such  em-
phasis placed on lowering barrier costs. I’m concerned about raising 
value.  Manufacturing  Extension  Partnership  teaches  Lean  and, 
perhaps,  Six  Sigma.  That’s  important.  But  what  I  say  is,  what 
about life after Lean? What if that isn’t enough? My answer to that 
is, without innovation, there is no life after Lean. We need to drive 
innovation to raise value. 

And  then,  last,  there  are  companies  that  can  build  a  good  prod-
uct,  that  have  innovation,  but  that  don’t  know  how  to  get  that 
product  on  the  market.  The  issue  that  doesn’t  get  discussed—and 
it  probably  wasn’t  in  the  report  on  manufacturing  initiatives—is 
marketing.  It’s  part  of  what  allowed  me  and  my  company  in  Cali-
fornia  to  be  successful.  We  built  a  marketing  story.  We  created  a 
value  such  that  people  paid  more  for  our  products  due  to  the  fact 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

that  we  were  innovative,  due  to  the  fact  we  differentiated,  due  to 
the  fact  we  had  a  great  marketing  brand,  due  to  the  fact  that  we 
didn’t  sell  to  one  or  two  markets,  we  sold  to  seven,  so  we  weren’t 
affected such as a company, for example, that supplies the auto in-
dustry  and  loses  a  big  customer,  and  now  they’re  crippled.  They 
need greater marketing—that needs to be taught. Small companies 
need  to  be  taught,  not  just  to  lower  their  costs,  but  how  to  raise 
their  value.  How  we  get  there,  I  haven’t  quite  figured  out,  but  I 
know  it’s  a  desperate  need.  So  many  problems  can  be  solved  by 
good marketing, for example, education, and the fact that we don’t 
have people getting into engineering in the schools, and the schools 
are cutting classes that used to help drive our manufacturing edu-
cational needs. They don’t see the need. Manufacturing hasn’t done 
a  good  job  in  conveying  the  needs.  Education  is  disconnected  with 
manufacturing. I want to work to connect those dots, to drive edu-
cation,  and  try  to  see  if  we  can  fill  the  educational  needs  for  the 
future. I am desperately concerned about that. 

Those  are  the  areas  where  I  see  a  tremendous  need  for  govern-
ment to provide help. I know education. I know innovation. I know 
how we can drive marketing, and the skills required for great mar-
keting  strategies.  I  think  MEP  possibly  should  be  doing  a  job.  I’m 
going to look into finding out more of what they do, and see if they 
have  a  good  marketing  strategy.  I  know  that  good  marketing  can 
overcome a lot of barrier costs. 

China  does  not  have  a  brand.  Their  brand  is,  ‘‘Made  in  China.’’ 
We  have  brands  in  America.  We  can  drive  these  brands.  And  I 
want  to  push  American  companies  to  recognize  who  they  are,  and 
not be afraid to compete. 

Senator ENSIGN. Thank you, Mr. Frink. We appreciate your testi-
mony.  I  want  to  call  the  second  panel  to  the  table.  And,  as  they’re 
coming  forward,  let  me  reiterate  that  it  was  very  helpful  to  us  to 
receive your testimony. I know you’re new in this job, and it is dif-
ficult  coming  to  Capitol  Hill.  So  I  appreciate  what  you  went 
through. 

Just  as  the  next  panel  is  coming  forward,  Senator  Kerry  men-
tioned that he has visited—he has gone out to Silicon Valley. And, 
you know, depending on our audiences, we all hear different things, 
and  one  of  the  top  concerns  that  I  hear  from  people  is  litigation. 
I  mean,  from  almost  every  business  sector  I  hear  that  the  cost  of 
litigation,  the  frivolous  lawsuits,  and  the  number  of  lawsuits  are 
major  problems  that  hinder  the  ability  of  American  manufacturers 
to  remain  competitive  in  the  global  economy.  But  of  the  other 
issues  that  we  talked  about  today,  education  is  a  major  concern, 
huge  to  our  industries  out  there,  whether  they  are  manufacturing 
or not manufacturing. It’s a huge problem. 

On  taxation,  the  way  that  we  treat  our  companies—especially  if 
they  are  investing  overseas—compared  to  the  way  the  other  gov-
ernments treat their companies is problematic. Ireland fostered its 
entire high-tech industry by setting up a business-friendly tax code 
and  regulations.  In  the  United  States,  by  contrast,  excessive  regu-
lation  is  maybe  the  biggest  tax  that  we  impose  on  corporations.  I 
don’t  know  how  many  of  you  have  been  hearing  about  section  404 
of  Sarbanes-Oxley,  but  a  lot  of  public  companies  are  now  talking 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

about going private. The cost of compliance with Sarbanes-Oxley is 
huge, especially for small and mid-sized companies. 

In  addition,  healthcare  is  another  major  concern  for  companies 
and their employees. All the things that we are talking about today 
are very important topics to discuss in this Subcommittee. The last 
word in the title of this Subcommittee is ‘‘competitiveness,’’ and one 
of  the  reasons  that  I  was  really  happy  that  we  got  that  word  on 
there  is  because  all  of  these  things  affect  how  we’re  going  to  keep 
jobs  in  America.  And  I  know  Republicans  and  Democrats,  alike, 
want  to  do  that,  and  that  is  one  of  the  reasons  for  the  hearing 
today. 

Senator  KERRY.  Mr.  Chairman,  I’d  ask  unanimous  consent  that 
Senator Lautenberg’s statement be put in the record, since he was 
not able to be here. 

Senator ENSIGN. Without objection. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Lautenberg follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Mr. Chairman: 
I  am  sorry  I  am  not  able  to  attend  today’s  hearing.  But,  I  want  to  acknowledge 
one of my constituents, FPI Thermoplastics, and this company’s extraordinary story. 
Just 5 years ago, FPI lost a major client to a Chinese supplier that could provide 
its product more cheaply. FPI was threatened with bankruptcy, with dozens of jobs 
on the line. 

In order to compete with the low-cost, Chinese supplies, FPI needed to modernize. 
FPI had the will and the work ethic to change, but it lacked the expertise to trans-
form its operations. 

Working with Robert Loderstedt, President of New Jersey’s Manufacturing Exten-
sion Partnership (MEP) program, FPI was able to find savings it never thought pos-
sible—MEP  showed  FPI  how  it  could  use  acquisitions  to  diversify  its  client  base, 
save  money  by  closing  an  offsite  warehouse,  find  unneeded  assets  it  could  sell  off, 
implement lean manufacturing techniques, and reduce its cost of debt. 

Today,  FPI  is  competing  with  China  and  winning,  and  it  is  growing  rapidly.  By 
investing  about  $210,000  in  FPI,  the  MEP  program  helped  FPI  to  produce  millions 
of  dollars  in  economic  growth  and  dozens  of  manufacturing  jobs  that  allow  middle- 
class  New  Jerseyans  to  provide  a  good,  stable  and  healthy  living  for  their  families. 
FPI is just one of MEP’s success stories. It is a shining example of the important 
role an active government can play in improving our manufacturing competitiveness 
and  strengthening  our  economy.  We  must  preserve  vital  programs  like  MEP  that 
give businesses the tools they need to be competitive. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Now,  I  will  introduce  the  second  panel  of  wit-
nesses. Dr. G. Wayne Clough is the President of the Georgia Insti-
tute of Technology. Dr. Clough is also a member of the President’s 
Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology.  Dr.  Clough  is  the 
Co-Chair  of  the  National  Innovation  Initiative.  Sebastian  Murray 
is  the  President  and  CEO  of  FPI  Thermoplastic  Technologies.  His 
company  provides  injection  molded  plastic  products  to  companies 
like  McDonald’s  and  Bed  Bath  &  Beyond.  Thomas  R.  Howell  is  a 
partner  at  Dewey  Ballantine,  LLP.  He  has  specialized  in  inter-
national trade matters for more than 20 years. In that capacity, he 
has represented several clients from the semiconductor industry. 

Dr. Clough, we’ll start with you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

STATEMENT OF DR. G. WAYNE CLOUGH, PRESIDENT, 

GEORGIA INSTITUTE OF TECHNOLOGY 

Dr. CLOUGH. Thank you, Chairman Ensign and other Committee 
Members. It’s a pleasure to be with you to talk about a very impor-
tant  subject.  And  I  would  like  my  written  testimony  entered  into 
the record. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  All  of  your  written  testimonies  will  be  entered 

in the—— 

Dr. CLOUGH. Thank you. 
Senator ENSIGN.—record. If you could summarize in 5 minutes or 

less, we’d appreciate it. 
Dr. CLOUGH. Will do. 
The  ability  of  our  high-tech  manufacturing  sector  to  compete  in 
a  rapidly-evolving  world  economy  is  linked  to  broader  issues  of 
competitiveness of our businesses and industries at large. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  If  you  could  just  pull  that  microphone  a  little 

closer to you, it would be appreciated. 

Dr. CLOUGH. Manufacturing is a special case within a larger con-
text, where all our businesses will have to be willing to compete in 
the  landscape  that  has  changed  as  other  nations  target  our  tech-
nology-based economic sector with greater vigor and resources than 
ever before. 

I’ve  been  fortunate  to  serve  in  a  number  of  leadership  positions 
in national and regional efforts. Some of these the Chairman men-
tioned,  such  as  the  National  Innovation  Initiative,  which  just 
issued  a  report  in  December  on  this  broad  topic.  And  I’ve  had  the 
chance  to  chair  the  Engineer  2020  Project  for  the  National  Acad-
emy  of  Engineering  and  serve  on  PCAST  and  as  a  member  of  the 
National Science Board. 

I  also  have  the  great  good  fortune  to  be  President  of  Georgia 
Tech, which is one of the top-rated manufacturing programs in the 
country,  and  also  operates  a  statewide  business  incubator,  as  well 
as a manufacturing technology extension program that assists local 
manufacturing  companies  and  is,  in  part,  funded  by  the  MEP  pro-
gram.  Our  activities  range  from  those  found  in  traditional  indus-
tries,  where  we’re  trying  to  help  our  food  processing  and  pulp  and 
paper  industries,  as  well  as  introducing  new  areas,  such  as  nano-
technology, into what we’re doing in manufacturing. 

Now, we’re all aware of the issues facing the manufacturing sec-
tor,  in  terms  of  growing  global  competition  with  nations  that  have 
significantly  lower  wages  than  ours.  We’re  also  learning  to  appre-
ciate  that,  as  we  improve  productivity  and  mature  the  manufac-
turing sector, this can lead to a decline in employment, even as the 
business is succeeding. 

The key to employment seems to be a combination approach that 
seeks  to  keep  the  high-end  jobs,  where  productivity  is  increased, 
but creates new manufacturing sectors or value-added propositions 
with  it.  So  new  jobs  come  and  create  jobs  related  to  service  and 
support for the manufacturing sector, such as logistics. 

Every  3  or  4  years,  Georgia  Tech  conducts  a  survey  of  manufac-
turers in Georgia, and I’ll give you a few points that we’ve learned 
from our most recent survey. 

Those  companies  that  are  successful  exhibit  a  willingness  to 
adapt and improve their customer focus. They need to work on new 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

product  development.  They  have  to  have  a  record,  typically,  of  fil-
ing patent applications. They need to sustain innovation as part of 
their  culture,  utilize  upgraded  computing  and  communications 
technologies,  and  have  access  to  information  resources  and  assist-
ance in training their employees. And, obviously, these characteris-
tics are likely to become more, not less, important in the future. 

Because  small-to-medium  manufacturing-sized  companies  are 
often  unable  to  afford  some  of  the  technical  advice  that  the  bigger 
companies  would  get,  that  they  need  to  innovate.  Initiatives  like 
the Manufacturing Extension Program, we think, are important. 

Now,  the  National  Innovation  Initiative  looks  at  this  issue  at  a 
much  higher  level,  and  it  looks  to  the  future  health  of  all  of  our 
high-tech industry sector. These are some of the findings in the re-
port,  which  is  now  on  the  website  of  the  Council  on  Competitive-
ness. Some 200,000 copies of it now have been downloaded since it 
was published. 

We need to find a balance in the Federal funding for R&D areas, 
like  engineering  and  the  physical  sciences,  to  help  form  the  ideas 
that  will  form  the  basis  for  new  products  and  businesses.  These 
areas  have  seen  flat  funding,  or  even  a  decline  in  the  past  decade. 
And  we  need  to  balance  that  portfolio  in  the  future  if  we’re  going 
to succeed, even in areas like health. 

Second,  we  need  initiatives  to  encourage  U.S.  students  to  major 
in  engineering  and  sciences  to  address  workforce  needs.  And  I’m 
very  pleased  to  hear  everyone  express  their  concerns  about  these 
issues, because, in fact, our graduation numbers in science and en-
gineering  peaked  in  the  1980s,  declined,  more  or  less  holding 
steady  today,  but  certainly  the  competing  nations  that  we’re  look-
ing  at  are  outproducing  us,  including  the  European  Union,  as  well 
as  China,  India  and  others.  And  this  gap  will  continue  to  grow  if 
we  don’t  do  something  to  intervene.  Added  to  this,  recent  studies 
show  international  students  coming  to  work  in  our  companies—or 
to  get  degrees  at  places  like  Georgia  Tech  have  declined  substan-
tially in the past couple of years. 

Also,  we  need  programs  for  workforce  training  and  support  for 
transportable benefits for workers who are displaced by changes in 
technology.  As  you  know,  technology  is  changing  at  a  very  rapid 
pace, and we need to help those adjust as the job needs change. 

And,  finally,  I  would  also  encourage  my  fellow  university  presi-
dents and university faculty members that it’s time for universities 
to  do  this—to  undertake  innovation,  to  help  our  graduates  better 
understand the new culture that they will be involved in. 

Other  recommendations  also  are  included  in  the  report  that  was 
published  at  the  Summit  for  the  National  Innovation  Initiative. 
They  are  important,  but  in  the  interest  of  time  I  won’t  go  through 
them here. 

We’ve  decided  that  there’s  no  way  one  entity  can  get  this  done. 
Multiple approaches to improving the innovation sector are needed 
if we’re going to succeed. And the National Association of Manufac-
turers is one of our significant allies in this. 

We’re  going  to  have  a  number  of  regional  meetings,  that  are 
starting  almost  as  we  speak,  to  talk  about  local  innovation  strate-
gies,  talk  about  local  conditions  in  different  states,  and  about  how 
we  move  forward.  And,  in  addition,  in  October  we’re  going  to  have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

a national meeting with the Business Roundtable, the National As-
sociation  of  Manufacturers,  the  American  Association  of  Elec-
tronics, and the Council on Competitiveness. 

We’re  also  working  with  the  Departments  of  Commerce,  Labor, 
and Energy, and with businesses, like IBM, who are taking leader-
ship  positions  as  we  move  forward.  It  has  to  be  a  public/private 
partnership, I think, if we’re going to succeed. 

So, in summary, the future for manufacturing in high-tech indus-
tries  is  not  going  to  be  secured  by  doing  things  the  same  old  way. 
Competition  for  high-tech  manufacturing  is  increasing  rapidly  as 
nations like China, India, and Korea build and invest in their edu-
cational  and  R&D  programs.  To  succeed—and  we  are  still  in  the 
position  to  succeed—we  need  to  sharpen  and  support  a  national 
strategy  for  innovation  that  will  allow  us  to  maintain  our  share  of 
this important market segment. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Clough follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. G. WAYNE CLOUGH, PRESIDENT, 

GEORGIA INSTITUTE OF TECHNOLOGY 

Manufacturing  is  an  essential  part  of  our  economy.  Not  only  are  manufactured 
goods  the  currency  of  world  trade,  but  manufacturing  is  what  creates  wealth.  It 
adds  value  to  resources  by  making  them  do  something  more,  which  is  something 
that services cannot do. 

For most of the 20th century, manufacturing was based on the Henry Ford assem-
bly  line  model.  Each  worker  carried  out  the  same  small  task  over  and  over,  and  a 
standardized product rolled off the end of the line, each one identical to the one be-
fore. Few of the workers in those manufacturing plants had more than a high school 
diploma—if  they  even  had  that.  Then,  about  three  decades  ago,  global  competition 
for manufacturing jobs began to heat up. Many companies realized that large pools 
of unskilled labor willing to work for much lower wages than those in the U.S. could 
be  accessed  by  moving  plants  overseas.  This  led  to  a  large  scale  shift  of  jobs  out 
of  our  country.  In  part  due  to  this  out-migration  of  jobs,  manufacturing  accounted 
for  only  14  percent  of  the  U.S.  Gross  Domestic  Product  in  2001,  down  from  27  per-
cent  in  the  middle  of  the  twentieth  century.  Manufacturing  jobs  declined  from  30 
percent of our workforce to less than 15 percent. 

However, these numbers mask a second major shift that occurred in the manufac-
turing  industry  in  the  1980s  and  1990s.  The  manufacturing  processes  themselves 
began to be fundamentally changed with advances in technology, and this was accel-
erated  with  the  invention  of  the  microchip.  Manufacturers  rapidly  adopted  new 
technology  that  reduced  the  need  for  manpower  while  at  the  same  time  they  inte-
grated  new  management  techniques  that  called  for  more  sophisticated  and  adapt-
able workers. This led to a vast family of production tools that offer unmatched pre-
cision,  quality,  and  efficiency—rom  CAD–CAM  to  ‘‘just  in  time’’  and  ‘‘demand-pull’’ 
manufacturing. The new technology that has infused manufacturing is capital inten-
sive  rather  than  labor  intensive.  Robotic  arms  now  assemble  products.  Automated 
guided  vehicles  (AVGs)  move  supplies  and  products  around  the  plant.  Real-time 
communication feeds information back into the process in time to reduce the margin 
of defects to virtually zero. Salespeople with cell phones and laptop computers cover 
more  territory  in  less  time,  and  sophisticated  logistics  systems  speed  the  products 
on their way. The entire process, from designing the product to shipping it, has been 
computerized.  The  skill  levels  expected  of  workers  are  now  far  beyond  that  of  the 
earlier era. 

The remarkable changes brought about by new technology have enabled manufac-
turing  to  outpace  other  sectors  of  the  U.S.  economy  in  productivity.  Between  1977 
and 2001, overall U.S. manufacturing output, measured in constant 1996 dollars, al-
most  doubled.  While  productivity  for  the  U.S.  economy  as  a  whole  increased  by  53 
percent,  manufacturing  productivity  rose  109  percent.  Over  the  course  of  the  past 
25  years,  overall  prices  rose  by  140  percent,  but  productivity  increases  held  the  in-
crease in the cost of manufactured goods to 60 percent. 

The  combination  of  increased  automation  and  greater  productivity  meant  manu-
facturers could meet market demand with fewer employees, so that instead of mov-
ing overseas as they had during the 1970s and 1980s, many manufacturing jobs ac-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

tually  began  to  disappear  entirely.  What  has  been  happening  in  manufacturing  is 
analogous to what happened previously in agriculture, which saw an ever-shrinking 
number  of  farmers  feed  an  ever-growing  world  population.  Backing  this  theory  up, 
manufacturing has been shrinking not just in the United States but everywhere. Es-
timates  are  that  22  million  manufacturing  jobs  disappeared  worldwide  between 
1995  and  2002.  A  new  buzzword  appeared  in  the  manufacturing  community— 
‘‘lights-out’’ plants—referring to facilities that are so automated that there is no one 
around  who  needs  to  see  what  they  are  doing.  Even  though  advanced  technology 
caused them to shed jobs, recent research indicates that had American manufactur-
ers  not  moved  rapidly  to  incorporate  new  technology  and  improve  their  competitive 
posture,  the  U.S.  manufacturing  sector  would  have  lost  even  more  jobs  as  more 
manufacturers closed their doors entirely. 

At Georgia Tech, we see these factors reflected in the detailed survey of the state’s 
manufacturers  that  we  conduct  every  few  years.  We  are  presently  in  the  middle  of 
the 2005 survey, so 2002 is the latest for which we have final data. However, when 
you compare the 2002 data with the 1999 data, about half of Georgia’s manufactur-
ers  underwent  major  changes  in  strategy  or  structure  during  that  three-year  time-
frame. Most of these changes involved innovation and/or technology, and were aimed 
at quick delivery, adapting to customers, and providing value-added services. 

The 2002 survey showed that companies with new-to-the-industry products, value- 
added service offerings, and substantial employee use of computers had significantly 
higher  growth,  profitability,  and  productivity  than  those  who  did  not  engage  in 
these  practices.  About  60  percent  of  Georgia’s  manufacturers  do  some  type  of  new 
product  development,  and  more  than  one  in  five  are  developing  products  that  are 
new to their industry. These companies who are innovating have significantly high-
er  growth,  profitability  and  productivity  rates.  Manufacturers  filing  patent  applica-
tions—another measure of innovation—also had significantly higher return on sales. 
Those  who  introduced  new  processes  experienced  significantly  higher  return  on 
sales and growth in value-added per employee, and firms with Web-based customer/ 
supplier  linkages  or  ordering  capabilities  had  significantly  higher  returns  on  sales. 
We  have  traditionally  thought  of  factories  as  dusty,  greasy,  and  full  of  rows  of 
people  operating  clanking  machinery.  However,  while  manufacturing  of  that  sort 
may  still  be  needed  to  make  some  products,  it  will  fall  at  the  lower  end  of  the  eco-
nomic  spectrum,  which  we  will  cede  to  others.  American  manufacturing  of  the  fu-
ture  will  need  to  be  focused  on  the  high  end  of  the  economic  spectrum  if  we  want 
to maintain our standard of living. We will need to pioneer new manufacturing tech-
niques  and  focus  on  the  highest-possible  leading-edge  precision  technological  work 
that  it  is  not  possible  to  do  in  other  parts  of  the  world.  The  strategies  even  of  the 
latter  part  of  the  last  century—cost  control,  ‘‘total  quality,’’  and  continuous  produc-
tivity  improvement—will  not  be  enough.  To  win  in  the  21st  century  will  require 
flexibility, collaboration, customization, precision, global market savvy and speed. To 
quote  a  recent  statement  on  ‘‘Ensuring  Manufacturing  Strength  through  Bold  Vi-
sion’’  by  the  leaders  of  the  National  Science  Foundation,  ‘‘The  big  winners  in  the 
increasingly fierce global scramble for supremacy will not be those who simply make 
commodities  faster  and  cheaper  than  the  competition.  They  will  be  those  who  de-
velop talent, techniques, and tools so advanced that there is no competition.’’ 

During  2004,  I  was  privileged  to  serve  as  co-chair,  together  with  IBM  CEO  Sam 
Palmisano,  of  the  National  Innovation  Initiative,  sponsored  by  the  U.S.  Council  on 
Competitiveness. We involved 400 of the Nation’s best minds from academia, indus-
try,  and  government  in  developing  an  action  agenda  designed  to  help  the  United 
States  create  an  economy  based  on  innovation.  The  National  Innovation  Initiative 
generated  30  recommendations  that  we  grouped  under  three  broad  topics:  talent, 
which  is  the  human  dimension  of  innovation;  investment,  which  is  the  financial  di-
mension  of  innovation;  and  infrastructure,  which  provides  the  enabling  framework 
for innovation. All three of these have a bearing on the competitiveness of American 
manufacturing, so I will touch briefly on each one. 

High-tech  manufacturing  operations  require  employees  with  a  much  higher  level 
of  skills.  For  example,  technology  and  processes  at  the  Timken  Company,  which  is 
the  world’s  leading  manufacturer  of  roller  bearings,  have  become  so  sophisticated 
that  the  company  now  looks  for  workers  with  bachelor’s  degrees  for  many  of  its 
entry-level positions. Georgia Tech’s survey of Georgia manufacturers has identified 
human  resource  problems  as  their  foremost  worry.  Yet  the  United  States  is  falling 
behind  in  the  education  of  technology  workers.  China,  India,  and  the  European 
Union  each  graduate  more  engineers  than  the  United  States  and  the  gap  will  con-
tinue  to  grow  based  on  present  trends.  Also,  our  past  ability  to  rely  on  ample  sup-
plies  of  international  science  and  engineering  graduates  will  be  tested  as  more  of 
these  students  are  enticed  to  take  jobs  in  the  growing  technology  businesses  at 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

home,  and  as  increasing  numbers  simply  choose  not  to  study  here  because  of  con-
cerns about post-9/11 visa and export control policies. 

One  of  the  primary  investments  in  innovation  is  R&D.  In  January  of  2004,  the 
Department  of  Commerce  released  the  results  of  a  series  of  roundtable  discussions 
held  with  manufacturers  around  the  Nation.  Among  the  areas  that  manufacturers 
believe  require  immediate  attention  is  a  commitment  to  sustained  and  balanced 
R&D to ensure that the Federal Government reinforces rather than hinders innova-
tion and bringing new ideas to market. 

About  the  same  time  the  Department  of  Commerce  published  its  report,  another 
report was released by the Subcommittee on Information Technology Manufacturing 
and  Competitiveness  of  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology (PCAST), chaired by George Scalise, President of the Semiconductor Industry 
Association. The PCAST report pointed out that as the speed of technology develop-
ment  accelerates,  the  linkage  between  research  and  manufacturing  becomes  much 
closer. Locating a manufacturing plant close to an R&D operation that is generating 
new  process  and  product  ideas  facilitates  the  human  interchange  that  speeds  ideas 
from  the  lab  to  the  marketplace.  As  a  result,  places  with  both  strong  R&D  centers 
and manufacturing capabilities have a competitive edge. The good news is that some 
semiconductor manufacturers have remained in the United States rather than mov-
ing  overseas  despite  the  cost  benefits  of  off-shoring,  because  they  want  to  be  close 
to  the  university  R&D  that  is  driving  new  developments.  The  not-so-good  news  is 
that the level of R&D being conducted in countries like China and India is improv-
ing and many U.S. and global companies are building R&D facilities in these coun-
tries.  This  means  competition  may  increase  for  more  sophisticated  manufacturing 
jobs as well and if this is so, the United States may end up with a security problem 
as well as an economic problem. 

The  present  technological  superiority  of  the  United  States  has  flowed  from  the 
strong investments we made in scientific research since World War II, and that les-
son has not been lost on those who aspire to compete with us. We need to not only 
consider  improving  investment  levels  in  R&D,  but  also  how  they  are  distributed.  A 
recent  PCAST  report  showed  that  funding  for  research  in  key  areas  of  engineering 
and physical sciences have declined while levels in other areas increased. In a world 
where  future  manufacturing  developments  will  come  from  interdisciplinary  re-
search, care must be taken to support an appropriate funding portfolio. 

As  a  part  of  the  third  topic,  infrastructure,  the  National  Innovation  Initiative 
looked specifically at strengthening America’s manufacturing capacity. We were con-
cerned  because  while  the  United  States  remains  the  world’s  leading  nation  in  the 
production  of  manufactured  goods,  our  rate  of  growth  in  manufacturing  production 
has  remained  virtually  flat  over  the  past  4  years.  During  the  same  time  frame, 
2000–2004,  Asia  (excluding  Japan),  Central  Europe  and  the  Balkans,  and  Latin 
America experienced strong growth in manufacturing production. Our high-end com-
petitors—Western Europe and Japan—also outperformed us. 

The National Innovation Initiative calls for the United States to design and imple-
ment a new foundation for high-performance manufacturing production. That means 
new  human,  organizational,  financial,  and  policy  models  must  be  developed.  New 
designs,  processes,  and  materials  need  to  be  introduced  and  new  manufacturing 
technologies should more rapidly be brought to the production cycle. We are moving 
in  that  direction,  with  flexible  automation,  complex  numerically  controlled  tooling, 
precision  engineering,  distributed  manufacturing,  e-commerce  to  connect  and  man-
age supply chains, materials databases, and shared-use facilities for R&D and pilot 
production, which lowers the risks and barriers to entry. Technologies like these will 
not only increase productivity even further, but will also help to offset lower wages 
in other countries. 

As  a  technological  university,  Georgia  Tech  has  a  wide  range  of  experts  devoted 
to evaluating what is happening in manufacturing, divining future opportunities for 
this  core  industrial  sector,  and  developing  the  manufacturing  technologies  and 
methodology of the future. Several important themes are emerging from their work. 
First,  manufacturing  technologies  of  the  future  will  include  molecular  and  nano- 
manufacturing,  bio-materials  and  bio-processing,  micro-electro-mechanical  systems 
(MEMS),  free-form  fabrication,  and  new  software  control  technologies.  Ideas  that 
will come more strongly to the fore include innovation, knowledge management, cus-
tomer  relationships,  and  waste  reduction—not  only  in  the  manufacturing  process, 
but also over the life of the product. 

These  technologies  and  ideas  are  expected  to  be  expressed  in  the  context  of  sev-
eral  inter-related  trends,  including  movement  away  from  mass  production  toward 
semi-customization; shifts away from centralized production locations to distributed 
sites; and the transformation of centralized business control toward collaborative re-
lationships between distributed sites. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

We  can  already  see  the  trend  toward  customized  manufacturing  in  the  ability  to 
order  customized  clothing  from  manufacturers  like  Land’s  End  or  L.L.  Bean,  and 
the opportunity for customers buying a car to send their specifications to the factory 
online rather than compromising on what a dealer happens to have on the lot. The 
next  stage  is  expected  to  be  ‘‘additive  manufacturing,’’  which  enables  end-users  to 
participate  in  the  design  of  more  sophisticated  products  like  hearing  aids,  dental 
restorations,  eye  glasses,  and  joint  replacements.  Additive  manufacturing  holds  po-
tential  to  embody  an  entire  manufacturing  system  within  a  single,  small  machine. 
That has led some to predict that additive manufacturing machines for certain pur-
poses will be introduced for use in the home within the next decade or two. 

Even as manufacturing machines become smaller, so will the scale on which man-
ufacturing takes place. Already the United States has seen a significant drop in ma-
chine tool production, which paralleled a significant decline in R&D spending in this 
area,  as  attention  has  shifted  to  microscale  tools  and  machining.  Nano-manufac-
turing  is  the  place  where  nanotechnology  will  transform  from  an  exotic  research 
field  to  something  that  reaches  out  to  touch  all  human  civilization.  Nano-manufac-
turing addresses not only work on the nano-scale, which is one-billionth of a meter, 
but  also  the  engineering  of  new  materials  at  the  atomic  and  molecular  level  that 
have  novel,  unique,  and  improved  physical,  chemical,  and  biological  properties. 
Nanoscale  engineering  can  greatly  expand  the  range  of  performance  of  materials 
and chemicals, as well as creating microscopic machines and systems. 

Nano-manufacturing  has  the  potential  to  impact  virtually  every  human-made  ob-
ject,  from  automobiles  to  electronics,  from  advanced  medicine  to  energy  production. 
Three specific areas where we are working at Georgia Tech are nano-computers that 
utilize  nanotubes  as  interconnections  instead  of  transistors;  disease  diagnosis  and 
controlled  drug  delivery;  and  optoelectronic  materials.  But  successful  implementa-
tion of nano-manufacturing will require standard measurements at the atomic level, 
special  manufacturing  environments,  and  micro-scale  technologies  and  quality  con-
trol  mechanisms.  It  will  also  require  the  involvement  of  experts  in  a  much  wider 
range  of  disciplines  than  traditional  manufacturing—including  electrical  engineers, 
physicists, chemists, biologists, and biomedical engineers. 

Even as the leading edge of American manufacturing moves to unprecedented lev-
els of sophistication, there are segments of the industry that cannot and should not 
be left behind. America’s traditional manufacturing industries still have a relatively 
strong presence in our Nation’s economy, and attention must be given to their com-
petitiveness. The U.S. pulp and paper industry, for example, generates $100 billion 
of shipments a year—30 percent of the world’s production. Technological innovation 
is important to keep such traditional industries competitive. 

The growing need for the rapid development and deployment of very sophisticated 
manufacturing  technology  and  techniques  is  particularly  challenging  for  the  Na-
tion’s 350,000 small and mid-sized manufacturers, who employ more than seven mil-
lion people and comprise nearly half of the U.S. manufacturing base. These compa-
nies  often  lack  the  information,  expertise,  time,  and  money  required  to  engage  in 
the  constant  innovation  and  upgrading  required  to  do  well  in  today’s  competitive 
marketplace.  However,  with  some  timely  assistance,  they  can  also  succeed.  For  the 
past  40  years,  Georgia  Tech  has  operated  a  state-supported  network  of  industrial 
extension  offices  that  serve  Georgia’s  small  and  mid-sized  manufacturers,  and  as 
part  of  our  surveys  of  Georgia  manufacturers  we  have  tried  to  assess  the  benefits 
of that service. What the 2002 survey showed was that companies assisted by Geor-
gia  Tech  had  comparatively  higher  productivity—an  average  value-added  increase 
of $3,000 per employee. 

Finally,  changes  in  manufacturing  processes  have  significant  logistics  implica-
tions. The U.S. trucking industry transports more than three-quarters of the freight 
in the country, and changes in the manufacturing process have major consequences 
for  the  logistics  of  moving  those  loads.  The  trucking  industry  has  already  had  to 
make significant adjustments to facilitate the implementation of just-in-time manu-
facturing,  which  requires  greater  load  and  time  precision  and  more  recently  just- 
in-case  policies  designed  to  prevent  and  address  unexpected  disruptions  in  the  in-
creasingly  tightly  engineered  supply  chain.  Future  changes  will  require  even  more 
logistical sophistication. 

The  competition  for  manufacturing  jobs  and  new  applications  and  technology  is 
going to grow in the future. We have to adjust to a changed landscape, and re-com-
mit  ourselves  if  we  are  to  compete  with  nations  that  will  have  larger  technological 
workforces  and  wage  advantages  for  some  time  to  come.  Fortunately,  the  U.S.  still 
has  an  edge  and  our  society  supports  entrepreneurism  and  risk  taking.  However, 
the window of opportunity will be open only so long and we need to take action now 
if we are to succeed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

Senator ENSIGN. Thank you. 
Mr. Murray? 

STATEMENT OF SEBASTIAN MURRAY, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

FPI THERMOPLASTIC TECHNOLOGIES 

Mr. MURRAY. Thank you for the opportunity to speak, Mr. Chair-

man and Senators. 

A quick background on FPI Thermoplastic Technologies. We’re a 
plastic  injection  molding  company.  We  serve  three  primary  mar-
kets:  fire,  safety,  and  security—our  major  account  is  Siemens; 
point-of-purchase  display—our  major  account  is  Revlon;  and  food 
service—our major account is McDonald’s. We have 120 employees, 
presently, and we are now adding 40 more jobs, to increase our em-
ployee  count  to  160.  Our  sales  volume  is  $15  million  in  sales,  and 
our  sales  are  increasing  to  $25  million  in  2006,  which  is  a  66  per-
cent  increase.  Our  major  competition  is  Asia,  primarily.  We  also 
have  competitors  in  Canada  and  the  United  States.  FPI’s  competi-
tive  advantages  are  low-cost  production,  presently,  superior  design 
capabilities, and time to market. 

A  critical  threat  to  U.S.  manufacturing  is  low-cost  competition 
from Asia, as we all know. Solutions for strengthening U.S. manu-
facturing  are  the  MEP  program,  number  one,  and  low-cost  loans, 
through  the  SBA,  for  example,  to  help  companies  like  ‘‘myselve’s’’ 
invest in technology. 

FPI  faced  dire  financial  circumstances  in  the  year  2000.  We  lost 
a  third  of  our  sales  with  a  major  U.S.  retailer  to  Chinese  competi-
tors.  FPI  was  introduced  to  the  MEP  program  regional  office,  NJ, 
New  Jersey,  MEP,  and  to  Robert  Loderstedt,  its  President,  in  the 
year  2000.  The  MEP  program  helped  us  develop  a  multi-pronged 
turnaround  strategy.  MEP  implemented  an  acquisition  strategy, 
which  helped  us  add  $3  million  in  annual  sales  volume,  with  two 
acquisitions.  MEP  helped  us  implement  inventory  management 
and  control  methods,  which  saved  our  company  $480,000  per  year 
in  distribution  expenses,  and  freed  a  million  dollars  in  cash-flow. 
MEP  implemented  a  lean  manufacturing  program,  where  we  in-
vested  in  automation  and  robots.  We  now  have  a  robot  at  each  of 
our  30  machines,  with  three-  to  six-months  paybacks,  and  yielding 
dramatic  gross  margin  increases.  And  MEP,  last,  helped  us  refi-
nance  our  debt,  and  we  reduced  our  annual  interest  expenses  by 
about $100,000 per year. 

In  terms  of  the  future  of  U.S.  manufacturing,  the  future  of  FPI. 
Today,  FPI  is  profitable  and  growing.  We  are  securing  new  busi-
ness  through  Internet  auctions  that  include  global  competitors. 
Consequently, we are a low-cost global competitor successfully com-
peting with Asian sources. We owe our survival and our success di-
rectly and completely to MEP. And we believe it is critically impor-
tant that the U.S. Senate continue its support of MEP. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Murray follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SEBASTIAN MURRAY, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

FPI THERMOPLASTIC TECHNOLOGIES 

Samuel  Murray  and  I  are  50/50  owners  of  a  plastic  manufacturing  business  lo-
cated  in  Morristown,  NJ.  We  employ  120  people  and  we  have  sales  revenue  of  ap-
proximately $15,000,000. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

Five years ago our business was on the verge of bankruptcy. A major U.S. retailer 
that  accounted  for  a  third  of  our  sales  changed  its  source  of  supply  from  FPI  to  a 
Chinese  supplier.  Since  our  sales  had  plummeted  literally  overnight  and  without 
warning  we  were  in  dire  financial  circumstances.  We  began  to  lose  money  and  our 
cash-flow was hemorrhaging. Shortly thereafter our bank placed us in the work out 
group and we were heading down a path to liquidation. 

We  are  a  successful  enterprise  today  primarily  due  to  NJMEP,  the  New  Jersey 
unit  of  the  Manufacturing  Extension  Partnership  (MEP)  of  NIST.  In  our  hour  of 
need  we  were  introduced  to  NJMEP  by  the  Morris  County  Chamber  of  Commerce. 
Together  with  Robert  Loderstedt,  President  of  NJMEP,  we  implemented  a  multi 

pronged turnaround strategy to revitalize FPI including; 

1. Acquisitions—NJMEP worked with us to roll up and acquire 2 smaller plastic 
injection  molding  companies  to  replace  lost  sales  and  to  diversify  our  customer 
base. 
2.  Inventory  Management  and  Control—NJMEP  suggested  we  close  an  outside 
warehouse,  which  we  did  that  saved  us  the  $40,000  dollar  monthly  operating 
costs which resulted in a $480,000 annual savings which we used to implement 
the other phases of the turnaround strategy. Additionally, we sold excess inven-
tory  totaling  approximately  $1,000,000  improving  cash-flow.  Plus  we  imple-
mented  an  MRP/MPS  system  and  cycle  counts  to  improve  inventory  manage-
ment and control. 
3. Lean Manufacturing—We engaged NJMEP to implement lean manufacturing 
techniques  which  lower  our  costs  of  production  and  increased  our  manufac-
turing efficiencies through the use process changes and automation, using robot-
ics.  Consequently  we  have  raised  our  sales  per  employee  from  $80,000  in  2000 
to $125,000 in 2005. Our goal for 2006 is $150,000 per employee. 
4.  Banking  Relationship—NJMEP  worked  with  us  to  refinance  our  debt  by 
changing  banks  and  lowering  our  interest  expense  with  reduced  rates  and  an 
extended term. 

Today  FPI  is  profitable  and  growing.  Our  sales  volume  is  over  30  percent  ahead 
of  last  year.  In  2006  we  expect  our  sales  to  exceed  $25,000,000  an  increase  of  60 
percent over 2005. 

We  are  no  longer  intimidated  by  Asian  competition.  We  have  used  this  threat  to 
spur FPI to become a global low-cost producer. None of this would have been attain-
able without MEP. 

MEP  is  an  essential  asset  and  lifeline  for  American  manufacturing.  It  is  vitally 
important that the U.S. Senate continues its support of programs such as MEP that 
aid and strengthen American manufacturing companies. 

Thank you for your time. 

Senator ENSIGN. Thank you. 
Mr. Howell? 

STATEMENT OF THOMAS R. HOWELL, PARTNER, 

DEWEY BALLANTINE LLP 

Mr. HOWELL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman and Senators. 
I’d like to devote my remarks to one topic I’ve raised in my testi-
mony,  which  is  the  factors  that  are  driving  the  offshore  movement 
of the semiconductor industry from the United States. 

From  where  we  stand  now,  the  U.S.  semiconductor  industry  is 
the  world  leader.  We  have  about  50  percent  of  total  global  sales. 
Technologically, we lead in most areas. And we’re in a very strong 
position.  And  at  the  moment,  about  77  percent  of  all  the  manufac-
turing in the industry is still here in the United States. 

The  thing  is  that  most  of  those  wafer  fabrication  facilities,  or 
fabs,  as  they’re  called,  are  current  generation,  which  will  become 
obsolete in the next 5 to 7 years, and that with respect to the next 
generation that’s planned, the ratios are much different. We heard 
recently from an executive at Applied Materials, which is one of the 
companies  that  supplies  the  equipment  for  fabs,  that  forecast  that 
there will be 30 fabs built in China in the next 3 years. During the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

same  time  frame,  6  new  fabs  will  be  started  in  the  United  States. 
So,  there’s  an  enormous  proportional  shift  in  the  direction  of  in-
vestment that’s underway right now. 

That’s  often  seen  as  just  a  reflection  of  the  fact  that  the  market 
is  growing  for  semiconductors  in  Asia,  that  the  devices  are  being 
consumed  in  increasing  proportion  there.  That  doesn’t  explain  the 
entire shift. There is a need to locate some production near a mar-
ket,  but,  in  fact,  a  country  like  Taiwan  can  serve  markets  all  over 
the world with fabs built in Taiwan. So, just the fact that the mar-
ket is moving to Asia to some extent does not explain the shift. 

The  most  common  explanation  is,  there’s  a  cost  advantage  in 
Asia.  And,  in  fact,  if  you  take  the  effective  government  measures 
away  and  set  that  aside  and  look  at  just  the  cost  of  building  a  fab 
and operating a fab, the fact is, there isn’t much cost difference be-
tween  the  United  States,  on  the  one  hand,  and  Taiwan/China,  on 
the  other  hand.  Most  of  the  costs  are  associated  with  equipment. 
It’s  an  automated  process.  The  equipment  is  the  same  equipment 
used  in  every  area.  It’s  produced  by  the  same  companies,  and  it 
costs  the  same.  The  input  cost  differentials—there  are  some,  but 
there  are  not  that  many—are  not  that  great.  The  labor  costs  are 
substantially  lower  in  China  and  Taiwan,  but  they  don’t  make  up 
a  very  large  portion  of  the  total  manufacturing  costs.  With  a  300 
millimeter  fab—that  is  the  current  state-of-the-art—if  the  United 
States’  costs  were  seen  as  a  factor  of  a  hundred,  Taiwan  might  be 
93; China, 90—which is really not enough to warrant a shift of all 
your production base from one region to another. 

When  you  factor  in  the  effect  of  government  measures,  however, 
the  picture  changes.  And  consider  that  we’re  talking  about  invest-
ments  now  that  are  $3  billion  for  a  single  fab,  and  moving  to  $6- 
to-$10 billion in the next generation. A company has to think very 
carefully  about  making  those  kinds  of  investments,  and  where 
they’re going to make them, and where they’re going to pay off the 
best. 

One  differential  between  China,  Taiwan,  and  the  United  States 
is that a fab built in those areas will not pay any taxes. A company 
that operates a fab there is operating in, essentially, a tax-free en-
vironment—a permanent tax-free environment. 

Another  factor  is  that  the  land  and  structures  are  located,  typi-
cally,  in  high-tech  industrial  parks  that  have  been  built  there.  We 
have  them  here,  too,  but  the  fact  is,  the  incentives  in  the  parks 
over  there  are  more  dramatic.  A  company  building  a  fab  in  China 
right  now,  many  of  them  are  reportedly  getting  their  land  and 
structures provided for free. There are also the utilities, which are 
things  like  high-purity  water,  specialty  gases,  electricity,  that  sort 
of  thing,  are  provided  at  concessional  rates.  And  all  that  has  a 
downward effect on operating costs. 

Then  you  look  at—there  are  also  tax  incentives  for  individuals. 
An individual who is a very talented engineer or production worker 
can  get  rich  very  quickly  working  in  one  of  these  countries,  based 
on  the  tax  structures.  And  I  could  explain  that  more  in  detail, 
maybe, if there’s an interest in it. 

Then,  finally,  there’s  the  phenomenon  of  the  foundry,  which  has 
developed,  really,  in  East  Asia.  And  the  notion  there  is,  given  the 
rising costs and risks associated with building a fab, countries, be-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

ginning  with  Taiwan  and  now  moving  to  Singapore  and  China, 
have said, essentially, ‘‘Don’t bother. We’ll build the fab here. We’ll 
take  the  risk.  We’ll  absorb  all  the  costs  and  risks  of  building  that. 
Send  us  your  designs,  American  companies.  We’ll  make  them  here 
for a service fee, and you can sell them under your own label.’’ And 
that’s  turned  out  to  be  a  very  dramatically  successful  business 
model. A lot of U.S. companies have become fabless and essentially 
have  gotten  out  of  the  business  of  making  semiconductors.  They 
just  design  them.  The  designs  go  to  Asia,  where  they’re  manufac-
tured in foundries that are located there. 

The  upside  of  that  is  that  the  U.S.  producer  no  longer  has  the 
cost  or  risks  and  all  the  other  messy  stuff  that’s  associated  with 
manufacturing. The downside is, the manufacturing, the skills, and 
the jobs are not in the United States anymore, they’re on the other 
side of the world. 

The  first  foundry  was  built  with  a  large  investment  from  the 
Government  of  Taiwan.  It  was  considered  too  risky  for  the  private 
sector  to  undertake  that.  Most  foundries,  if  not  all  foundries  oper-
ating  in  Asia,  that  I’m  aware  of,  receive  substantial  government 
support.  Essentially,  the  risk  has  been  socialized  in  Asia.  And  so, 
what we see is a long-term trend toward more and more foundries. 
Most  of  these  30  fabs  that  I  referred  to  that  are  being  built  in 
China will be foundries, and they will essentially be looking to take 
over  the  manufacturing  functions  of  semiconductor  companies  out-
side the United States. 

Senator  Allen  referenced  the  VAT  tax,  which  China  used  very 
successfully  to  capture  inward  investment  from  other  countries, 
particularly  Taiwan.  That  was,  essentially  a  violation  of  inter-
national  trade  rules  used  very  successfully  to  capture  inward  in-
vestment from other countries that would have occurred elsewhere, 
but  for  the  tax.  The  Administration  has  successfully  challenged 
that  tax.  It  has  been  revoked,  as  of,  I  think,  this  April.  And  it’s  a 
good  model  for  dealing  with  other  kinds  of  distortions  like  that, 
that  distort  investment  patterns.  However,  we  have  to  recognize 
that many of the measures that I have described are not clearly in-
consistent  with  international  trade  rules;  and  so,  those  rules  have 
got  to  be  strengthened  if  we’re  going  to  get  a  handle  on  this  prob-
lem. 

Two other recommendations I would make: One is that there’s a 
need  to  study  differentials  in  tax  policy  between  various  markets 
and how they affect investment patterns. That issue is not well un-
derstood, and it is driving a lot of these investments. 

Finally,  there  is  a  need  for  greater  Federal  spending  on  R&D. 
Senator Kerry referenced the large programs that are underway in 
Japan  and  the  EU,  in  terms  of  spending.  They  dwarf  anything 
that’s underway here. And we’re cutting back, and some of our pro-
grams, like the advanced technology program, are being zeroed out. 
So, I think all those things would be excellent points of departure 

if we’re going to try to address this problem. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Howell follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THOMAS R. HOWELL, PARTNER, DEWEY BALLANTINE LLP 
Mr. Chairman and members of the Subcommittee, my name is Thomas R. Howell. 
I  am  a  Partner  in  the  Washington  D.C.  law  office  of  Dewey  Ballantine  LLP,  where 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

I  specialize  in  international  trade  matters.  Over  the  past  20  years  I  have  rep-
resented a number of organizations representing U.S. semiconductor manufacturers, 
and in the course of that work I have prepared a series of studies of foreign indus-
trial  and  R&D  policies  and  their  effects  on  international  competition  in  microelec-
tronics.  The  most  recent  of  these,  which  I  have  provided  to  the  Subcommittee,  ad-
dresses  China’s  emerging  semiconductor  industry.  I  am  also  a  contributing  author 
to a study recently published by the National Academy of Sciences, Securing the Fu-
ture:  Regional  and  National  Programs  to  Support  the  Semiconductor  Industry.  My 
testimony  today  is  my  own  and  not  presented  on  behalf  of  any  client  or  organiza-
tion. I appreciate the opportunity to appear before you today. 

The  semiconductor  industry  plays  a  vital  role  in  the  U.S.  economy  and  national 
defense. In terms of value-added it may be the largest U.S. manufacturing industry, 
and semiconductors are a key enabling technology for a broad range of other indus-
tries,  including  computers,  consumer  electronics,  motor  vehicles,  telecommuni-
cations, and aviation. The U.S. semiconductor industry is currently the world leader 
both  in  terms  of  level  of  technology  and  market  share,  with  about  50  percent  of 
world sales. However, it faces significant challenges to its leadership which arise out 
of  foreign  government  policies  that  are  designed  to  alter  the  terms  of  competition. 
These  policies  represent  promotional  strategies  that  fall  into  two  broad  categories, 
‘‘leadership’’ and ‘‘close followership.’’ 

Leadership  strategies.  Japan  and  the  European  Union,  the  longstanding  rivals  of 
the  U.S.  in  microelectronics,  are  pursuing  promotional  strategies  designed  to  cap-
ture  the  leadership  position  from  the  United  States  with  respect  to  market  share 
and level of technology. 

• Japan  and  the  EU  are  implementing  large  scale,  long  range,  industry-govern-
ment  R&D  projects  aimed  at  developing  leading  edge  commercial  technologies 
and  state-of-the-art  manufacturing  facilities.  Commonly  these  projects  involve 
hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  in  government  funding,  more  than  anything  we 
currently see in the United States. 
• The  strategy  in  both  Japan  and  Europe  is  to  build  on  a  perceived  leadership 
position  in  cell-phone  technologies  and  develop  leading  edge  semiconductors 
with  cell  phone  applications,  as  opposed  to  PC-based  chips  in  which  the  U.S. 
holds the lead. The Japanese and European strategy is based on the belief that 
in  the  21st  century,  most  people,  particularly  in  the  developing  world,  will  ac-
cess  the  Internet  through  cell  phones  and  similar  hand-held  devices,  not  desk-
top PCs. 

It is unclear that these foreign efforts will result in a loss of U.S. market or tech-
nological leadership—in the past many large-scale government-funded R&D projects 
in  microelectronics  have  fallen  short  of  their  goals  or  failed  completely.  But  others 
have  significantly  affected  the  competitive  balance.  The  EU’s  JESSI  project,  for  ex-
ample  (1988–1996),  is  widely  credited  with  contributing  substantially  to  Europe’s 
current  strong  position  in  cell  phone  technology.  Japan’s  joint  R&D  projects  have 
played a major role in establishing the Japanese industry’s strong competitive posi-
tion  in  microelectronics.  And  while  Japan  and  the  EU  have  substantially  increased 
the  level  of  government  spending  on  microelectronics  R&D,  in  pursuit  of  this  strat-
egy, the U.S. is moving in the opposite direction. U.S. Government funding of micro-
electronics R&D has been declining for a number of years and is projected to decline 
further  in  the  coming  decade.  But  the  most  complex  challenge  confronting  the  U.S. 
in  microelectronics  is  not  coming  from  Japan  or  the  EU,  but  from  China/Taiwan, 
who are pursuing a ‘‘close followership’’ strategy. 

‘‘Close  followership’’  strategies.  Under  ‘‘close  followership’’  strategies  governments 
do not seek to achieve market or technological leadership but rather to integrate the 
operations  of  their  own  industries  with  those  of  U.S.  companies,  and,  by  so  doing, 
not only remain one step behind the leaders but also capture high value-added tech-
nology-intensive  industrial  and  research  functions  for  their  own  economies.  Taiwan 
has  been  the  most  successful  practitioner  of  this  strategy  but  it  is  now  being  emu-
lated  in  countries  such  as  Malaysia,  Singapore,  Thailand,  Israel,  and  most  signifi-
cantly, China. 

The  ‘‘close  followership’’  strategy  actually  enhances  the  competitiveness  of  indi-
vidual  U.S.  companies  by  providing  low  cost,  high  quality  production  and  design 
services  to  them.  But  it  may  pose  a  greater  challenge  to  U.S.  leadership  over  the 
long run because it is drawing offshore important parts of the U.S. microelectronics 
infrastructure, particularly in the area of semiconductor manufacturing. The danger 
is that over the longer term other key functions associated with semiconductor pro-
duction,  such  as  R&D  and  design,  will  follow  the  manufacturing  functions  to  East 
Asia. At some point a substantial part of the education infrastructure that supports 
the industry could migrate there as well. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

At present, roughly 77 percent of U.S.-owned semiconductor manufacturing is still 
located here in the United States. But much of this capacity is or will become obso-
lete  over  the  next  several  years,  and  the  trend  is  toward  establishment  of  a  larger 
proportion of the next generation of fabs outside the U.S. Earlier this year an execu-
tive  at  Applied  Materials,  one  of  the  most  important  producers  of  semiconductor 
manufacturing  equipment,  indicated  that  30  new  fabs  will  be  built  in  China  in  the 
next 3 years. During the same time frame, the same executive stated that there will 
be  6  built  in  the  United  States.  In  part  this  trend  reflects  the  fact  that  China  is 
the fastest-growing market for semiconductors in the world, with an estimated com-
pound  annual  growth  rate  of  20–27  percent  in  2002–2008,  versus  about  7  percent 
for  the  U.S.  But  relative  regional  market  growth  does  not  explain  investment 
trends. 

Nor  do  comparative  costs  explain  current  investment  trends.  The  migration  of 
some types of high tech manufacturing to Asia, such as assembly of electronics prod-
ucts  incorporating  semiconductors,  reflects  comparative  cost  advantages  attainable 
by  manufacturing  in  certain  Asian  countries.  But  the  movement  of  semiconductor 
manufacturing  to  Asia  is  not  being  driven  by  comparative  costs—that  is,  if  govern-
ment  measures  taken  to  modify  those  costs  are  removed  from  the  equation.  The 
same equipment and processes are used everywhere to make semiconductors. Mate-
rials  and  other  costs  do  not  vary  greatly  from  region  to  region.  Direct  and  indirect 
labor costs are much lower in China and Taiwan than in the U.S., but because labor 
costs  are  such  a  small  proportion  of  manufacturing  cost,  the  total  cost  differentials 
are  not  that  great.  If  the  manufacturing  costs  for  a  90nm,  300mm  wafer  fab  in  the 
U.S.  is  given  a  factor  of  100,  the  comparable  cost  in  Taiwan  would  be  93  and  in 
China, 90. But the picture changes when the impact of government policy measures 
is factored in. 

To  begin  with,  consider  the  size  of  the  investment  required  to  establish  a  single 
state-of-the-art  wafer  fab—currently  between  $2  and  $3  billion  for  a  facility  that 
may  be  obsolete  in  3–4  years.  Only  a  handful  of  companies  are  in  a  position  to  un-
dertake  such  investments,  and  given  the  volatility  of  the  industry,  an  increasing 
number of companies understandably have reached the conclusion that risks associ-
ated  with  such  large  investments  outweigh  any  potential  for  gain.  How  do  govern-
ments  affect  this  equation?  In  some  countries  governments  have  put  up  a  substan-
tial  part  of  the  total  investment  cost  to  establish  a  state-of-the-art  fab.  The  world’s 
first 300mm fab, for example, was built in Dresden, Germany with substantial fund-
ing from regional governments. But other forms of government support are probably 
more important than direct funding. 

One of the most important forms of government measure has been support for the 
establishment of semiconductor foundries, a phenomenon that occurred first in Tai-
wan  but  has  spread  to  Singapore,  Malaysia,  Israel,  and,  most  importantly,  China. 
Under  the  foundry  model  foreign  producers,  usually  with  substantial  government 
backing,  in  effect  say  ‘‘we’ll  assume  the  costs  and  risks  of  building  a  fab.  Give  us 
your  designs,  and  we’ll  make  them  for  you,  in  return  for  a  service  fee.’’  This  is  a 
very  attractive  proposition  for  a  company  trying  to  decide  whether  or  not  it  can 
make  a  $3  billion  investment  to  manufacture  its  designs.  An  increasing  number  of 
U.S.  semiconductor  firms  are  ‘‘fabless’’  and  outsource  all  of  their  designs  to  found-
ries,  while  others  are  ‘‘fab-lite,’’  outsourcing  a  significant  part  of  their  total  produc-
tion.  In  other  words,  the  chip  is  designed  here  in  the  U.S.,  manufactured  in  China 
or Taiwan, and in many cases incorporated into an end product somewhere in Asia. 
The U.S. ‘‘fabless’’ company does not take any of the risks normally associated with 
building  a  $2–$3  billion  facility.  But  the  facilities  themselves,  and  the  skills  to  run 
them, increasingly reside elsewhere. 

The  first  pure  play  foundry  in  the  world,  TSMC,  was  established  on  the  basis  of 
an equity investment by a special fund administered by the government of Taiwan. 
The investment would not have been attempted by the private sector because it was 
seen  as  too  risky.  Today  I  am  not  aware  of  a  foundry  anywhere  in  Asia  that  does 
not  enjoy  significant  government  support.  In  a  number  of  cases  governments  have 
taken  equity  shares  in  foundries.  Because  the  number  of  purely  private,  unsub-
sidized companies in the U.S. or anywhere else that are willing to invest $2–$3 bil-
lion in a fab is declining, government-supported foundries are accounting for an in-
creasing share of global semiconductor production. Most of the new fabs being built 
in China will operate as foundries. 

Tax  policy  is  another  particularly  important  form  of  government  support.  The 
world’s  most  successful  foundries  are  TSMC  and  UMC,  both  located  in  Taiwan. 
They  control  nearly  two-thirds  of  world  semiconductor  foundry  manufacturing.  The 
government of Taiwan has implemented policies which ensure that these and other 
similar  Taiwan-based  semiconductor  enterprises  pay  no  taxes,  year  after  year.  In 
fact,  in  a  number  of  recent  years,  TSMC’s  after-tax  income  has  been  higher  than 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

its  pre-tax  income,  reflecting  the  application  of  accumulated  tax  credits.  China  has 
now  replicated  Taiwan’s  tax  holidays.  Paying  taxes,  in  jurisdictions  like  the  United 
States,  and  paying  no  taxes  in  China  and  Taiwan,  can  have  an  enormous  bottom- 
line  impact  and  may  constitute  a  very  significant  decisional  factor  in  determining 
where to open a new fab. 

Then there is infrastructure. The Silicon Valley phenomenon has been intensively 
studied abroad, and foreign governments have created their own versions of the Val-
ley in many countries. These seek to integrate research universities, high tech man-
ufacturing,  and  venture  capitalists  into  a  dynamic  relationship  that  promotes  inno-
vation  and  entrepreneurialism.  Perhaps  the  most  successful  version  has  been  Tai-
wan’s  Hsinchu  Science-Based  Industrial  Park,  which  has  become  a  magnet  for  for-
eign  and  domestic  semiconductor  investment.  In  addition  to  tax-free  status,  soft 
loans,  grants  and  other  forms  of  financial  support,  enterprises  located  in  the  Park 
enjoy extensive infrastructural support, nearby research universities, and superb in-
stitutes  of  applied  industrial  research.  China  is  now  creating  its  own  versions  of 
Hsinchu, and in some of the Chinese parks, semiconductor producers are reportedly 
receiving  free  land  and  free  structures  from  regional  and  municipal  governments. 
They  also  receive  preferential  rates  on  electricity,  water,  and  specialty  gases,  all  of 
which lower their operating costs. 

Then  there  are  government  incentives  to  individuals.  One  of  the  key  advantages 
enjoyed  by  TSMC  and  UMC  has  been  their  ability  to  attract  and  hold  many  of  the 
highest  quality  managers  and  engineers  in  the  industry—it  said  that  ‘‘they  get  the 
best  people.’’  A  key  factor  in  the  competition  for  such  talent  is  Taiwan’s  tax  treat-
ment  of  company  stock  and  stock  options  given  as  compensation  to  individuals. 
Shares  are  taxed  on  their  par  value  rather  than  on  their  actual  market  value  at 
the  time  received,  which  may  be  many  times  par  value.  In  addition,  when  the 
shares are sold, there is no tax on the income received (apart from a nominal trans-
action tax) because Taiwan has no capital gains tax. As a result, Taiwanese compa-
nies  have  been  able  to  offer  highly  talented  Taiwanese  and  foreign  engineers  the 
prospect of rapid accrual of substantial personal wealth. Taiwan has become a ‘‘tal-
ent  magnet.’’  Chinese  tax  policy,  while  not  identical,  seeks  to  replicate  such  incen-
tives to individuals. 

Finally  the  location  of  new  investments  can  be  driven  by  government  investment 
incentives  such  as  China’s  preferential  value-added  tax  (VAT),  which  was  revoked 
in  April  of  this  year  after  strong  objections  from  the  U.S.  Government,  Japan,  the 
EU and Mexico. In 2000, the Chinese government established a preferential rate of 
value-added taxation (VAT) for domestically based semiconductor design and manu-
facture. While all imported devices are subject to a 17 percent VAT, under the new 
policy  domestic  designers  and  manufacturers  of  semiconductors  received  a  rebate, 
resulting  in  an  effective  VAT  rate  of  3  percent.  The  preferential  VAT  policy  effec-
tively  enabled  China  to  ‘‘capture’’  a  portion  of  Taiwan’s  semiconductor  capability. 
Foreign  investors,  predominantly  Taiwanese,  rushed  to  the  mainland  and  estab-
lished  new  wafer  fabs  in  order  to  benefit  from  the  VAT  preference.  A  talent  rush 
to  the  mainland  of  experienced  Taiwanese  managers  and  engineers  occurred.  By 
2003 roughly 20 new Taiwanese-owned fabs had begun operations on the mainland, 
were under construction, or were planned to become operational by 2008, all of them 
foundries.  Executives  at  these  new  foundries  cited  the  VAT  preference,  which  gave 
them an ‘‘unbeatable’’ edge over imported devices, as the principal factor underlying 
their new operations. While China’s preferential VAT has been revoked, it has argu-
ably  already  achieved  its  objective  of  a  massive  drawing  in  of  capital,  technology 
and talent, enabling China to establish a modern semiconductor industry. 

It has been suggested by some that the migration of semiconductor manufacturing 
to  Asia  represents  a  natural  division  of  labor  with  more  advanced  countries,  and 
that  the  high-end  functions—R&D  and  design—will  remain  in  the  United  States, 
Europe and Japan. But over the long term the design functions are likely to migrate 
to  where  the  action  is,  which  is  where  the  manufacturing  is  located.  This  is  hap-
pening  already  in  Taiwan,  in  particular,  which  is  now  using  its  strength  in  manu-
facturing  to  build  a  strong  design  industry,  with  extensive  government  support. 
China, too, is following this path, although it is at an earlier stage of development. 
The  long  run  danger  is  that  so  large  a  proportion  of  leading  edge  semiconductor 
manufacturing  and  design  functions  come  to  reside  outside  the  United  States  that 
the  top  graduates  from  engineering  schools  see  their  future  not  in  the  U.S.,  but  in 
China  and  Taiwan  and  other  parts  of  the  world.  They  will  seek  to  build  their  ca-
reers  there,  not  here.  At  that  point,  it  would  be  very  difficult  to  reestablish  U.S. 
leadership. 

It  is  not  in  our  national  interest  to  see  the  entire  infrastructure  for  the  design 
and  manufacture  of  semiconductors  to  migrate  outside  of  the  United  States.  A  re-
cent  report  by  a  Defense  Science  Board  task  force  concluded  that  the  migration  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

U.S.  capabilities  in  semiconductors  outside  the  U.S.  posed  ‘‘long  term  national  eco-
nomic  concerns.’’  Given  that  semiconductors  are  at  the  core  of  virtually  all  critical 
defense  systems,  the  national  security  concerns  are  obvious.  The  problem  we  con-
front  is  that  the  commercial  realities  of  the  semiconductor  business  are  leading  to 
a relocation of design and manufacturing functions outside of the United States. 

Identifying  a  comprehensive  set  of  recommendations  for  addressing  this  problem 
effectively would take a sustained industry-government dialogue of the kind we saw 
in the 1980s in connection with the challenge from Japan. I would like to offer sev-
eral preliminary suggestions: 

First,  it  should  be  recognized  that  the  present  offshore  movement  of  semicon-
ductor  production  is  being  driven  by  deliberate  government  measures  as  well  as  by 
commercial  imperatives.  Therefore,  the  U.S.  Government  should  continue  to  place 
a  priority  on  the  elimination  of  trade  and  investment  distorting  measures  like  Chi-
na’s  preferential  value  added  tax  that  violate  international  rules.  China’s  use  of  a 
WTO-inconsistent measure to attract inward investment that would not have other-
wise  occurred  was  a  serious  market  distortion  in  a  strategic  industry.  The  U.S. 
acted properly in placing a priority on the elimination of this measure. At the same 
time  it  should  be  recognized  that  many  of  the  incentives  used  by  governments  to 
attract  high  technology  investment  do  not  clearly  violate  any  WTO  or  other  inter-
national rules, so there is a limit to what can be achieved by invoking existing rules. 
Over  the  longer  term  it  will  be  necessary  to  negotiate  the  establishment  of  inter-
national norms on the use of government incentives for high tech investment. 

Second,  the  U.S.  Government  needs  to  examine  domestic  tax  polices  that  affect 
U.S.-based  manufacturing  in  light  of  foreign  tax  policies  that  are  functioning  like 
a  magnet  for  manufacturing  investment.  While  I  do  not  recommend  any  particular 
tax measure, the fact is that U.S. measures are needed to offset the effects of foreign 
tax holidays in some way. 

Finally, we must recognize that competition in this industry is increasingly a com-
petition for a limited pool of talented people, whether U.S. or foreign born. The U.S. 
has  the  lead  in  this  area,  and  we  shouldn’t  allow  ourselves  to  lose  it.  This  means 
above  all  maintaining  our  excellent  system  of  research  universities  and  ensuring 
that  the  world’s  leading  edge  R&D  continues  to  take  place  here  in  the  United 
States.  Specifically  we  should  increase,  not  curtail  Federal  spending  on  university- 
based,  leading-edge  R&D  and  other  forms  of  support  for  U.S.  research  universities. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Well,  I  thank  the  panel.  I  think  this  panel  of 
witnesses,  along  with  our  first  witness,  is  raising  some  very,  very 
important  points  that  we,  as  policymakers,  need  to  consider  as  we 
go forward. 

I  want  to  start  my  questions  with  Dr.  Clough,  especially  with 
your  experience  in  education.  Education  was—you  know,  we’ve 
heard  so  much  about  education.  From  your  perspective  at  Georgia 
Tech, what can we do to get more people to pursue careers in engi-
neering? Virtually every high-tech company tells me that they have 
job openings for computer software engineers. They just don’t have 
enough  engineers  to  hire  out  there.  Should  we  give  more  financial 
incentives  to  those  who  pursue  careers  in  engineering,  math  and 
science,  to  make  it  easier  for  people  to  select  such  careers?  Obvi-
ously, I mentioned in my questioning of Assistant Secretary Frink, 
kind of, jokingly, that the United States graduates a lot more law-
yers  than  China,  but  we  graduate  a  lot  fewer  engineers.  I  mean, 
do  we  need  to  create  more  incentives  and  direct  those  dollars  that 
we  have  to  those  who  are  becoming  engineers?  We’re  in  tight  bud-
get  times,  but  do  we  need  to  direct  the  dollars  more  toward  those 
types of people and incentivize them? 

Dr. CLOUGH. Good point. I think, first, we need to recognize we’re 
in a different environment today. We are in an environment where 
we need to recruit from all segments of our population. And, frank-
ly, engineering and science were probably at fault for not being ag-
gressive about including women and minorities. Because that’s the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

majority  of  the  population.  So,  we  need  to  be  able  to  recruit  from 
that sector. 

We  need  to  do  a  better  job,  as  was  mentioned  earlier,  of  mar-
keting  that  and  letting  them  know—I  think  universities  have  a 
stake in this. In other words, we have a role to play—— 

Senator ENSIGN. When you say ‘‘we,’’ who’s ‘‘we’’? 
Dr. CLOUGH. I’m thinking of universities, for the moment. 
Senator ENSIGN. OK. 
Dr. CLOUGH. In the sense that about—if you look at the national 
statistics, 50 percent of the students who start in engineering drop 
out. That’s not an acceptable number. We’ve worked hard at Geor-
gia  Tech,  and  we’ve  gotten  it  now  up  to  75  percent  now  graduate, 
who start. We believe we can do a better job of that. 

So, I think we need to make engineering a more interesting field. 
That’s  what  this  program  that  I  described  briefly  at  the  National 
Academy  of  Engineering  was  about,  the  Engineer  2020.  How  can 
you  make  engineering  an  attractive  field  for  young  people  to  go 
into,  given  that  they  have  lots  of  alternatives?  And  so,  I  think  we 
need to work on that, as well. 

There  are  financial  issues,  clearly.  Engineering  is  not—or 
science—is  not  a  simple  area  to  go  into,  and  not  a  cheap  area  to 
offer  the  education  in  that  area.  I  think  Representatives  Wolf, 
Boehlert,  and  Ehlers,  for  example,  have  offered  a  program,  or  pro-
posed  a  program,  of  forgivable  loans  to  young  people  who  will  un-
dertake the curricula that are necessary to get degrees in this area, 
both,  perhaps,  in  high  school,  as  well  as  at  the  university  level. 
And I think we should consider that. 

In my day, when we started out in engineering—and I’m a first- 
generation college graduate; my parents were not able to go to col-
lege,  because  of  the  Depression  and  the  times  in  South  Georgia, 
where I grew up—we had the National Defense Education Act, and 
it was a wonderful program that encouraged young people, not only 
at  the  bachelor  level—to  take  bachelors-level  studies,  but  also 
master’s-  and  Ph.D.-level  studies.  That  program  went  away.  Some 
of  the  reports  that  we’ve  referenced  out  of  PCAST,  as  well  as  out 
of  the  National  Innovation  Initiative,  refer  to  the  possibility  of  re-
storing that. It’s not a terribly expensive program, but one, I think, 
that  would  be  very  crucial.  I  think  you’ve  got  to  address  it  all  the 
way from high school straight all the way through to Ph.D. 

Senator ENSIGN. Could you repeat that? 
Senator ALLEN. What was that one, again? 
Dr.  CLOUGH.  The  National  Defense  Education  Act.  And  you’ll 
find  many  of  the  people  who  are  working  in  government  today,  or 
nonprofits or at universities or in industry, had the benefit of that 
kind of support. And it makes a statement about the Federal Gov-
ernment’s interest in this area. 

I  think  the  notion  of  balance  in  this  portfolio—and  our  research 
portfolio is very important, because support for engineering and the 
physical  sciences  has  been  flat  or  has  declined,  while  other  areas 
have  gone  up.  Now,  there  are  good  reasons  for  NIH  funding  to  go 
up,  so  I’m  not  begrudging  them  that  increase,  but  the  signal,  very 
clearly, to engineering and the physical sciences, and students who 
might consider those areas, not as important. There’s not many re-
search  assistanceships  in  that  area.  And  Senator  Allen  talked 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

about  NASA;  that’s  another  good  example  where  there  have  been 
some  cutbacks  in  the  kind  of  basic  support  that  we  need.  And,  as 
you  may  know,  we  participate  in  several  of  the  things  at  Langley, 
with  Virginia  Tech—I  taught  at  Virginia  Tech  for  a  number  of 
years.  So,  I  think  we  need  to  look  at  areas  where  we  can,  in  fact, 
balance  that  portfolio,  and,  in  doing  so,  make  a  statement,  again, 
that these areas are important to the future of our country. 

Senator ENSIGN. Great. 
Mr.  Murray,  just  really  quickly  on  the  Manufacturing  Extension 
Partnership.  I  think  it’s  great  to  hear  how  the  New  Jersey  Manu-
facturing Extension Partnership program has worked for you. Simi-
lar  programs  may  be  working  in  other  places  around  the  country. 
What I would ask of you—and you don’t have to answer it today— 
but,  could  you  provide  specifics  on  how  it  worked  for  you.  One  of 
the  things  that  we  have  to  do  up  here,  as  policymakers,  is  assess 
the success or failure of the programs that we fund. The MEP may 
have  worked  for  you  in  New  Jersey,  but  it  may  not  be  working  in 
other  parts  of  the  country.  I  mentioned  the  word  ‘‘metrics’’  before, 
and,  we  need  to  have  good  metrics  to  determine  if  we  are  having 
successes some places, and not others. We should never legislate by 
anecdote. It is a nice anecdote that we have of your company today, 
but  we  need  to  have  verifiable  statistics  to  show  what  it  costs  and 
what the benefits are. We do that cost-benefit analysis, because we 
are the stewards of the taxpayer dollars. So, if I could get from you, 
in  writing,  specifically  how  the  MEP  benefited  your  company.  You 
mentioned  some  of  the  benefits  of  MEP,  briefly  today,  but  if  we 
could  obtain  a  more  detailed  account  of  your  experience,  we  could 
then  ask  some  of  the  other  MEPs  across  the  country  if  they  are 
doing  the  same  kinds  of  things  that  actually  worked  in  a  real-life 
situation. 

Mr. MURRAY. Oh, absolutely. 
Senator ENSIGN. Thank you. 
Mr.  MURRAY.  I’ll  be  happy  to  put  that  in  writing  to  you,  Mr. 

Chairman.* But, just briefly, we would be out of business today. 

Senator ENSIGN. Right. 
Mr.  MURRAY.  150–160  jobs  would  be  lost  to  Asia  if  MEP  didn’t 
exist.  And  people  have  said  to  us,  ‘‘Well,  why  MEP?  Why  not  turn 
to  a  private-industry  group?  Why  not  turn  to  a  turn-around  man-
agement  group?’’  And  the  reason  is,  first  of  all,  it  would  have  cost 
us  much,  much  more.  The  MEP  cost  to  us  was  about  $140– 
$150,000.  It  would  have  cost  us  three  or  four  times  that  if  we  had 
turned  to  private  industry.  Plus,  during  our  most  dire  times,  we— 
the banks and our vendors worked with us, because they knew we 
were  working  with  an  agency  like  MEP,  and  they  knew  that  MEP 
is  a  government  organization.  And,  plus,  the  individuals  that  we 
worked  with  at  MEP,  many  of  them  are  former  business  owners 
and  have  gone  through  the  same  kind  of  troubles  and  problems 
that we faced. 

So,  our  company  would  not  exist  if  it  weren’t  for  MEP.  MEP 
forced us to change how we thought and how we ran our business. 
We questioned every purchase, every cost, and we established very, 
very—you  mentioned  ‘‘metrics,’’  Mr.  Chairman—we  established 

* The information referred to can be found in the Appendix of this hearing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

very specific metrics on how to guide us and how to help us restore 
our company to profitability and increase our sales. 

Senator ENSIGN. Great. 
Mr. Howell, I’m going to call on Senator Allen next, and it’s—I’ve 
heard  the  same  thing  from  the  chip  manufacturers,  exactly  the 
same kind of experiences. Texas Instruments, because of our Invest 
in  the  USA  Act  last  year,  they’re  actually  going  to  be  building  a 
plant  in  Texas,  simply  because  of  that.  We  always  hear  the  dif-
ference in labor costs. Well, with chip manufacturers, that’s not the 
biggest  determining  factor.  So,  we  have  to  examine  all  of  these 
other factors when we are looking at competitiveness issues. 

Senator Allen? 
Senator  ALLEN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  You  asked  most  of 
the questions of Dr. Clough that I was going to ask, and I was tak-
ing notes. Please stay in touch with me, because I think one of the 
greatest  future  challenges  of  this  country  is  to  make  sure  we  have 
the  best  minds  who  are  capable  to  design  the  innovations  and  in-
ventions of the future. And I appreciate your comments. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Senator  Allen,  I’m  going  to  have  to  excuse  my-
self.  I  have  to  attend  a  press  conference  over  on  the  House  side. 
Please take over, and then just turn it over to Senator Kerry. 

Thank you. 
Senator ALLEN. [presiding] Fine. Got it. 
Let me ask you just one thing. On nanotechnology, the Nanotech-
nology  Initiative  that  I  mentioned  earlier,  sponsored  with  Senator 
Wyden.  We  have  the  Nanotech  Caucus  here—one  of  the  key  areas 
of it is to work with universities—colleges and universities, as well 
as the private sector and a number of Federal agencies involved in 
nanotech,  everyone  from  Energy  to  Defense  and  others.  Do  you 
have any specific suggestions on how we can better help? Have you 
seen  this  initiative?  It’s  fairly  new  since  the  President  signed  the 
bill, in 2003. Do you have any specific recommendations—— 

Dr. CLOUGH. I’ll be glad to comment on it. And I was there when 
the  President  signed  the  bill.  And,  of  course,  it’s  essentially  a  $4 
billion  investment,  significant  investment—I  think,  a  very  impor-
tant  one.  On  PCAST,  Congress  actually  granted  PCAST  the  chal-
lenge,  if  you  will,  of  oversight  for  the  expenditures  to  gather  intel-
ligence, so we could get the sense that we’re making a balanced in-
vestment  in  nanotechnology  in  the  many  different  areas.  There’s 
also  an  interagency  group  that’s  looking  at  that,  as  well,  and  we 
just  issued  a  report  to  Congress  on  that.  I  think  it  was  to  the 
Science  Committee,  on  the  House  side.  It’s  an  excellent  report.  It’s 
on  their  website.  I  think  it  documents  very  clearly  where  we  are 
relative  to  our  competition.  And,  in  this  field,  the  evidence  is  that 
we  are  staying  on  a  level  playing  field  with  the  competition  in 
Japan,  the  European  Union,  and  others.  We  are  making  at  least 
similar investments, if not larger investments to those countries. 

So, I feel very positive about the National Nanotechnology Initia-
tive. I think it was a stroke of genius to go into this area, because 
it’s  so  broad-based.  We,  at  Georgia  Tech,  are  very  active  in  this 
area,  and  it’s  exciting.  And  Senator  Kerry  talked  about  the  many 
ways that it can impact the world. And you’ve talked about it. And 
it’s all very true. 

Senator ALLEN. All right. Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

Now,  Mr.  Howell,  when  I  was  Governor  of  Virginia,  I  worked 
very  hard  to  attract  semiconductor  investment  fabs  into  Virginia. 
In  fact,  I’ve  got  a  change  to  the  name,  according  to  U.S.  News  & 
World  Report,  to  the  Silicon  Dominion,  where  Siemens  and  Motor-
ola invested at White Oak, and Toshiba and IBM, up at Manassas. 
They’re  now  owned  by  Infineon  and  Micron.  And  so,  I  really  do 
think  the  semiconductor  industry,  just  for  jobs,  when  you  look  at 
the  indirect  jobs—the  suppliers,  the  vendors,  the  contractors,  the 
toolmakers.  I  always  liked  to  see  what  Applied  Materials  was 
doing, because you can determine what the next fabs will be. Once 
they  can  develop  the  300  millimeters  wafers,  they  can  then  deter-
mine  whether  they  want  to  invest  billions  of  dollars  to  upgrade 
from the 200-millimeter wafers. And, in fact, there’s probably no— 
other than the automotive industry, there’s no other kind of manu-
facturing  that  creates  so  many  additional  jobs  from  all  those  sup-
pliers  and  vendors  and  contractors.  And  I’m  glad  the  Administra-
tion  eventually  got  around  to  getting  after  China  on  the  VAT  tax. 
Another  thing  that  happened  was,  with  Hynix—and  you’re  talk-
ing  about  countries  subsidizing—and  to  the  extent  we  can—and 
any  recommendations  you  may  have,  where  countries  are  sub-
sidizing  in  an  illegal  way,  we  need  to  crack  down  on  them.  Hynix 
was subsidized unfairly and illegally by the South Korean Govern-
ment.  They  were  focused  on  DRAMs,  or  dynamic  random  access 
memory chips. And that’s exactly what’s fabricated in these two fa-
cilities in Virginia. And, by doing that, they’re just dumping on the 
world market—and, in fact, in not just the U.S., but the rest of the 
world—and countervailing duties were imposed upon them. 

As  far  as  incentives,  the  way  I  see  this  country—and  I  see  this, 
again, from my days as Governor—what we did was, created a Per-
formance  Grant  Incentive  Program  to  get  those  fabs—German, 
Japanese,  U.S.—partnerships  together,  and  they  would  get  credits 
based  upon  the  number—the  amount  of  their  production.  It  was  a 
good business approach, that if they did not invest and produce the 
chips,  they  wouldn’t  be  getting  these  performance  grants.  And  all 
that’s  legal.  And  it’s  one  way  that  at  least  Virginia  became  attrac-
tive  and  beat  out  California  or  Texas  or  other  states  for  these  in-
vestments. 

You’re saying that what Taiwan’s doing, what China’s doing, it’s 
not—in  some  cases,  it’s  not  a  violation  of  WTO  rules.  Therefore, 
what should we do—and you did not specify this specifically—what 
should  we  do,  as  the  United  States,  as  far  as  our  tax  policies—or 
should it be just left to the states to come up with these approaches 
so  that  we  can  compete?  When  you  look  at  the  number  of  fabs,  in 
your testimony, being proposed in China, compared to this country, 
it’s 20 to 1, almost, or maybe it’s 10 to 1. And it’s not just because 
of those costs, as you said, as far as labor costs; it’s because of the 
land,  it’s  because  of  the  industrial  parks,  tax-free  for  the  worker 
somehow,  building  these  fabs  as  foundries  for  them.  What  can  we 
do, as a country, as far as our policies—tax policies or otherwise— 
so  that  those  fabs  are  built  here?  And  I  agree  with  you,  it’s  a  na-
tional security issue, as well. So, I’d like to hear your views, Coun-
selor, on that. 

Mr. HOWELL. Senator, first, I think that Virginia is a good exam-
ple  of  state  programs  that  are  actually  very  dynamic,  designed  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

attract  semiconductor  investment  to  the  states.  And  I  think  you’ll 
find  that  most  semiconductor  fabs  are  located  in  states  that  have 
sought  them  through  proactive  programs—California,  North  Caro-
lina, Massachusetts—probably ten states where most of the manu-
facturing is. And you see the same thing internationally, that coun-
tries  that  have  not  sought  to  create  the  semiconductor  industry 
within  their  borders  don’t  typically  have  one—Australia,  Canada, 
those  countries  that  have  not  pursued  them.  Abroad,  they’ve  been 
essentially created by governments. 

States can do so much, in terms of providing incentives. They can 
provide tax exemptions and a variety of other things to industries. 
And I think most of those things do not violate international trade 
rules. As subunits of a Federal system they cannot close the border 
the  way  China  did  with  its  VAT—or  they  didn’t  close  the  border, 
but  they  raised  a  border  restriction.  A  state  can’t  do  that.  States 
can’t  affect  Federal  tax  policy,  either,  so  there’s  a  limit  to  what 
they can do. They can do a lot, but they can’t do everything. 

The first question is a threshold question, before one looks at so-
lutions to the differentials in taxes. What’s the actual impact on lo-
cational  decisions  between,  say,  the  U.S.  and  China  or  Taiwan,  of 
the various Federal-level tax differentials? It has never really been 
studied. You can’t apply the tax differentials to ten companies and 
say,  ‘‘Here’s  the  impact.’’  It’s  definitely  a  dramatic  impact  on  some 
companies. I think there’s one U.S. company that said about a bil-
lion dollars per fab, in terms of cost savings, is attributable to that 
tax differential. 

The  first  question,  then,  is,  what’s  the  real  impact,  and  who  is 
impacted  by  it?  And  then,  I  don’t  think  it’s  necessary  to  say  that 
we’ve got to replicate everything that’s being done in China or Tai-
wan. I don’t think it’s feasible. There are equity issues, or fairness 
issues,  as  well,  that  have  to  be  considered.  And,  in  fact,  the  tax 
holidays  are  very  controversial  in  Taiwan.  Other  industries  think 
they’re  unfair.  But  I  think  if  we  knew  the  impact  a  little  more,  or 
had  a  better  metric,  as  it  were,  on  the  impact  of  the  tax  differen-
tials,  it  would  be  possible,  then,  to  devise  measures  that  would  at 
least  bring  us  to  within  a  level  of  competitiveness  as  a  location 
with those countries that is closer than it is now. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Let  me  try  to  distill  what  you’ve  said.  Granted, 
the states can do things. Obviously, you work with the localities on 
the  land,  and  prompt  permitting,  air  permits  matter,  to  get  those. 
In  fact,  the  folks  with—what  was  White  Oak,  now  Infineon,  were 
very  pleased  that  they  got  their  air  permit  in  28  days,  which  was 
a  third  better  than  in  Texas,  and  monumentally  better  than  Cali-
fornia,  from  their  testimony,  or  their  speeches.  And  I  think  the 
states also—we created a new engineering school, and I made sure 
that  they  had  a  focus  in  the  engineering  school  at  VCU  in  micro-
electronics, and they have a state-of-the-art clean room. That’s im-
portant  for  training.  That’s  something,  all  that  we  did  as  a  state. 
We  can  analyze  various  things  of  what  other  governments  are 
doing.  And  I  still  need  to—for  us—I’m  not  at  the  Federal  level— 
I’m  trying  to  figure  out,  all  right,  what  can  we  do,  as  a  nation,  to 
make  sure  that  we  recognize  that  competition?  I’m  not  saying  the 
Federal Government goes and condemns land in Georgia or Massa-
chusetts and says, ‘‘Here, you can have this land free, because this 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

is in our national interest.’’ We, obviously, have a different form of 
government than those countries. But if there’s any tax policy that 
we  may  have  on  research  and  development,  or  investment,  or,  in 
some  cases,  say,  earnings  stripping,  which  is  forced  on  foreign  in-
vestors into this country—if a company from Great Britain or Ger-
many  or  Japan  invests  in  this  country,  they  get  a  different  tax 
treatment for their capital investment than does a U.S.-based com-
pany—are any of those sort of ideas worthy of consideration? 

Mr. HOWELL. Well, I’d say, yes, they are. It’s not just a question 
of comparative tax policies. I think that there are reasons that the 
United  States  is  superior  to  either  China  or  any  other  Asian  loca-
tions for building a semiconductor fab. And they include better pro-
tection of intellectual property here, less likely to lose your designs 
or  secrets  than  over  there,  political  stability.  It’s  also  that  people 
want  to  live  here,  and  you  can  attract  people  here  now  from  all 
over the world, still, to work in the fabs and in the research units, 
and so on. 

So, it’s not a question of being able to match them dollar for dol-
lar, in terms of tax benefits. The idea, I think, would be to narrow 
the differential in that area and build on our strengths. One of the 
ways  to  do  that  is  to  make  sure  that  the  leading-edge  R&D  con-
tinues  to  be  done  here,  and  not  there.  And  a  way  that  can  be  pro-
moted,  both  at  the  state  and  the  Federal  level,  is  by  increasing 
spending  on  basic  R&D  in  the  universities.  The  smartest  people 
want  to  come  to  where  the  cutting-edge  work  is  being  done.  Right 
now, that’s here. But that will change over time if we don’t do any-
thing  about  it.  Right  now,  we  are  cutting  back  on  that  kind  of 
spending, and it’s being increased—not just in the Far East, but in 
Europe. The governments are saying, ‘‘We’d like to have that infra-
structure  of  learning  and  spinoffs  of  commercial  companies,  build-
ing  on  the  learning,  to  happen  there.’’  And  that’s  something  that 
probably  doesn’t  have  as  big  of  a  fiscal  impact,  as  a  tax  holiday, 
or  whatever,  but  has  a  dramatic  impact  on  where  people  want  to 
live and work, and especially the best people. 

It  is,  to  some  extent,  a  zero-sum  competition  worldwide  for  get-
ting  those  best  people.  Those  help-wanted  signs  exist,  certainly,  in 
the  high-tech  area.  There’s  a  competition  for  the  best,  most-tal-
ented people, and one way for us to compete with that is by build-
ing on our excellent university system, and spending more. 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you, Mr. Howell. That fits right in the be-

ginning of my questions. 

And I’ll turn it over to Senator Kerry. 
Senator KERRY. Thank you, Senator. Thank you very much. 
Dr.  Clough,  a  lot  of  people  argue  that  trying  to  keep  low-wage 
manufacturing  jobs  in  our  country  is,  sort  of,  a  losing  proposition, 
unless  you  can  out-compete,  which  means  innovating.  Would  you 
agree with that? 

Dr. CLOUGH. Yes. 
Senator KERRY. OK. I do, too. So, you’ve got to innovate. The key 
to innovation, obviously, to staying ahead, is basic research. Is that 
correct? 

Dr. CLOUGH. That’s correct. That’s one of the elements. 
Senator KERRY. And basic research depends on a commitment of 
the  Federal  Government,  in  this  case,  because  the  private-sector 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

has,  in  many  cases,  either  refused  to  or  pulled  out  of  it,  isn’t  that 
accurate? 

Dr. CLOUGH. They’re short-term oriented. 
Senator KERRY. So, the key is the Federal Government’s commit-
ment  to  NSF,  to  NASA,  to  the  Department  of  Energy,  Office  of 
Science, and so forth. Right? 

Dr. CLOUGH. Correct. 
Senator  KERRY.  In  your  testimony,  you  said,  ‘‘We  need  to  find  a 

balance in funding.’’ 
Dr. CLOUGH. Yes. 
Senator KERRY. I would presume, therefore, we do not have that 

balance today. Is that accurate? 
Dr. CLOUGH. Yes, that’s true. 
Senator  KERRY.  OK.  And  that  is  because  the  Federal  Govern-

ment is making other choices. 
Dr. CLOUGH. That’s correct. 
Senator  KERRY.  And  the  choice  is  to  use  its  revenue  in  other 

forms, correct? 

Dr. CLOUGH. I presume so. 
Senator KERRY. Well, a tax cut, a tax expenditure, is an expendi-
ture. We have X amount of revenue; we can put it here in a spend-
ing or investment program, or we can put it here in a tax expendi-
ture, which is revenue foregone. Accurate? 

Dr. CLOUGH. I assume so. I assume Congress also could make de-
cisions  within  the  existing  budget  to  make  some  of  these  adjust-
ments. 

Senator KERRY. Well, we could. For instance—Mr. Frink is gone, 
but—I  didn’t  get  a  chance  to  go  back  to  him  on  it,  but  he  pointed 
out  in  his  testimony—I  don’t  have  it  in  front  of  me  now.  Do  you 
have  his  statement?  He  pointed  out,  in  his  testimony,  that  we’ve 
increased  significantly—I  think  it  was  a  45  percent  increase,  if  I 
recall—yes,  here  it  is.  ‘‘This  represents  a  45—the  Federal  budget 
is—includes a record $132 billion for Federal research and develop-
ment, a 45 percent increase, compared to 2001’s $91.3 billion.’’ But 
when  you  look  inside  of  that,  that  money  is  not  going  to  competi-
tiveness or job creation research, it’s going largely to weapons—de-
fense research, very specifically, the Defense Department research. 
So, again, these are choices that we’re making: Where are we going 
to put our money? 

If  we’re  going  to  compete  effectively,  which  we  all  want  to  do— 
and, I mean, the long-term health of our country, the national secu-
rity our country, will depend on the health of our economy. 

Dr. CLOUGH. Right. 
Senator  KERRY.  And  if  we’re  not  able  to  create  the  next  wave  of 
jobs,  and  the  next  wave  of  high-value-added  sector,  we’re  going  to 
be in trouble. 

So,  let  me  ask  you:  What  is  the  most  important  thing  that  you 
think  we  can  do,  in  your  judgment,  that  will  have  a  direct  impact 
on  what  you’re  struggling  with  at  Georgia  Tech,  and  what  they’re 
struggling  with  at  MIT  and  Carnegie  Mellon,  and  all  these  other 
great  universities  and  colleges—what  do  we  need  to  do  in  our 
spending  choices  here  to  have  the  greatest  impact  on  what  you’re 
trying to do? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

Dr.  CLOUGH.  Well,  I  think  we  need  to  look  at  the  research  port-
folio  as  an  entity.  And  it  tends  to  be  hard  to  do,  because  a  lot  of 
it  comes  out  of  agencies.  In  other  words,  we  know—and  you  well 
know—that DOE, for example, funds about 40 percent of the basic 
science  research  in  the  country,  not  the  National  Science  Founda-
tion. The National Science Foundation clearly funds a lot of science 
research,  but  DOE  does,  as  well.  The  Department  of  Defense—it’s 
not  well  understood,  I  think—in  many  cases,  has,  for  many  years, 
been  the  primary  funder  for  electrical  engineering,  mechanical  en-
gineering  and  chemical  engineering  in  this  country.  And,  as  they 
have  had  to  cut  back  on  6.1/6.2  research,  that  funding  has  gone 
down,  and  that’s  where  we’ve  lost  some  significant  funding,  long- 
term funding for those critical areas in engineering. 

Similarly,  in  some  of  the  other  areas,  where,  again,  it’s  spread 
across a spectrum. So, that makes it a little bit more difficult than 
saying,  for  example,  ‘‘We’re  going  to  improve  health  research,  and 
so  we’ll  double  NIH’s  budget,’’  which  was  a  simpler  proposition 
than  it  was.  Some  of  the  increase  you  referred  to  did,  indeed,  go 
to NIH; and that was a positive thing, in my personal perspective, 
because that’s a big economic driver, I believe, in the future. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  again,  that  was  a  conscious  decision  that 

we did make. 

Dr. CLOUGH. It was. And it was a good one. 
Senator KERRY. We said, ‘‘We’re going to put X amount more into 

NIH,’’ and so we grew that. 

Dr.  CLOUGH.  But  I  think  we—I  think  you,  in  Congress,  need  to 
get very serious about watching how the flow of these funds comes 
from the different agencies, so that the portfolio is balanced. Clear-
ly—and  this  is  not  just  PCAST,  or  it’s  not  just  other—there  are  a 
number  of  entities  that  have  commented  on  this,  with  clear  statis-
tics  that  the  funding  for  engineering  and  the  physical  sciences,  if 
not  flat,  has  gone  down  at  a  time  when  that  big  budget  for  R&D 
was going up. And that’s not good balance. 

Senator KERRY. What’s the long-term implication of, as you said, 
our  competitor  nations  out-competing  us  at  the  moment,  in  terms 
of production of engineers and basic science? 

Dr.  CLOUGH.  The  long-term  implication  is  that,  obviously,  we 
won’t be competitive in that part of the economic spectrum that ac-
tually has generated 50 percent of the economic growth in the last 
decade. And that’s what’s frightening. We need to be in that space. 
We need to give all the young people in this country an opportunity 
to share in the possibilities that are in that space. 

Senator  KERRY.  Would  you  say  there  is  both  a  national-security 
and  national-priority  urgency  in  the  fact  that,  in  1975,  70  percent 
of America’s economic base was manufacturing and 30 percent was 
service. Today, it is reversed—70 percent is service, and 30 percent 
is manufacturing, and declining. 

Dr. CLOUGH. Right. 
Senator  KERRY.  What  are  the  long-term  security  implications  of 

Dr.  CLOUGH.  Well,  there  are  certain  areas  in  manufacturing, 
clearly,  we  need  to  maintain  in  this  country,  regardless  of  all  the 
competitiveness  issues  that  we  have.  For  example,  semiconductors 
or  nanotechnology,  some  of  the  areas  are  going  to  underline  our— 

that? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

underlie  our  ability  to  be  secure,  as  a  nation,  in  a  threatening 
world. In addition, it will also affect economic competitiveness. 

So,  we  need  to  decide,  I  think,  as  a  country,  where  we  really 

want to maintain a capability, under any circumstance. 

Senator KERRY. And you also cited the workforce training compo-
nent  of  this,  which  everybody  understands  is  critical.  There  again, 
we’re cutting, we’re not growing, correct? 

Dr. CLOUGH. Yes, that’s true. 
Senator KERRY. So, it’s another wrong choice. 
Dr. CLOUGH. Well, I think it’s a choice we need to think very se-

riously about today. 

Senator KERRY. Well, if we’re cutting, and you think we shouldn’t 

be cutting, we’re not doing the right thing, correct? 

Dr. CLOUGH. True. 
Senator  KERRY.  Mr.  Howell,  your  comments  about  the  90  per-
cent,  versus  93  percent  and  100  percent,  seem  to  be  stating  the 
case  that  wages,  per  se,  are  not  the  biggest  factor  in  the  non-
competitiveness of our playing field. Is that correct? 

Mr. HOWELL. That’s correct. At least in semiconductors. 
Senator KERRY. Does that apply to other sectors, would you say? 
Mr. HOWELL. The higher the technology level, and the more auto-
mated  the  production  process,  the  more  applicable  that  same  logic 
is. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  now,  we  all  understand  that  other  coun-
tries  are  engaging  in  illegal  trade  practices,  and  that  puts  us  at  a 
significant  disadvantage,  in  intellectual  property.  For  instance,  I 
think  we’re  losing  something  like  24  billion  bucks  a  year  that  we 
can  measure,  and  that’s  obviously  unmeasurable,  just  as  an  exam-
ple. So, in order to level the playing field, you’ve got to enforce the 
WTO rules and use the rules available to you. And yet, the Import 
Administration, or the Commerce Department, International Trade 
Administration,  which  investigates  dumping  and  countervailing 
duty  cases,  is  going  to  be  cut  by  5  percent  under  the  President’s 
budget. The U.S. Trade Representative, who is responsible for rep-
resenting  the  United  States  in  cases  brought  to  the  WTO,  is  going 
to see a 7 percent cut. How are these cuts going to affect our ability 
to be able to create a fair playing field for our companies and stand 
up, since we’re already behind the curve in that? 

Mr.  HOWELL.  Well,  they’re  going  to  hurt,  obviously.  And  let  me 
take  USTR,  for  example.  They  are  the  agency  that  enforces  the 
WTO  rules.  They  bring  the  dispute  settlement  cases  to  Geneva. 
They  are—and  some  former  people  that  used  to  work  for  me  are 
over  there  now—in  my  opinion,  they  are  understaffed  already. 
They haven’t got enough lawyers, and they haven’t got enough sen-
ior  lawyers  to  bring  the  number  of  cases  that  need  to  be  brought. 
And they, in most cases, are up against litigators on the other side 
who have got more people, more senior people, more expertise, and 
so on. And they ought to be expanding that capability, adding fund-
ing, adding people, building, if you will—in the same way that the 
antitrust  division  was  expanded  in  the  1930s  to  make  it  a  really 
effective  enforcement  agency.  We  ought  to  be  building  USTR,  not 
cutting it. And I would say the same applies for the Import Admin-
istration.  That’s  a  very  important  part  of  our  overall  trade  policy 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

structure, the ability to bring those cases. And if that’s eroded, it’s 
going to affect manufacturing. There’s no question about that. 

Senator  KERRY.  Let  me  just  summarize  by  making  a  point  that 
is fairly obvious. I led off with it in my early questioning, but budg-
eting  is  a  zero-sum  game.  And  these  choices  are  staring  us  in  the 
face,  and  they  have  been  for  years  now.  I’ve  been  here  22  years, 
and  I  am  tired  of  listening  to  the  same  old  arguments.  It’s  the 
same-old/same-old  every  year.  And  the  fact  is  that  we  are  locked 
into  a  paradigm  on  the  budget,  where  43  percent  of  the  deficit  is 
due to a choice Congress has made to forego revenue, to have a tax 
cut.  The  average  American  is  seeing  their  costs  go  up,  and  their 
total  tax  burden  has  gone  up.  I  don’t  know  anybody  who  has  been 
reading,  but  they  should  be,  the  New  York  Times  and  Wall  Street 
Journal  series  on  what’s  happening  in  America  to  this  have  and 
have-not divide that’s growing. It is deadly serious, in terms of the 
policy choices we’re making here. 

And  I’d  say  to  my  friends  on  the  other  side  of  the  aisle,  if  we’re 
going to give meaning to these words and these hearings and these 
efforts  by  people—after  all,  here’s  a  person,  Mr.  Murray,  who  has 
just  told  us  that,  if  it  weren’t  for  the  MEP,  his  company  wouldn’t 
be  in  existence  today.  We  would  have  lost  another  160  manufac-
turing  jobs.  That’s  repeated  all  over  the  country.  And  yet,  here  we 
are with a budget that wants to cut it. I don’t get it, just as a mat-
ter  of  good  old  American  common  sense  and,  sort  of,  basic  values. 
So,  we  can  cut  off  our  nose  to  spite  our  face,  and  it  will  do  a  lot 
more  than  that,  the  way  we’re  heading,  in  terms  of  these  budget 
choices that we’re making, or we can take this to heart. 

So, I regret that I’ve got a meeting that I’m already late for, and 
I  would  like  to  have  drawn  this  record  out  a  little  more.  And, 
again,  I  hope  that,  as  a  Committee,  we  can  try  to  force  some  of 
these  better  choices  here.  And  I  thank  each  of  you  for  taking  time 
to be here. 

Senator ALLEN. The record will remain open for 7 days for Mem-

bers to submit statements, or they may ask you questions. 

Let me say, in concluding this hearing, this is one I care a great 
deal about. There are dynamics, there are impacts, to the decisions 
we  make.  Tax  policy  matters.  And  having  lower  taxes  will  help 
spur investment in this country. And, in fact, a strong economy will 
get  more  revenues  in.  Then  one  needs  to  determine,  what  are  the 
priorities  in  spending?  And  I  think  mostly  in  this  proposed  budget 
from the President, clearly homeland security and national defense 
are  important.  There  will  be  differences,  insofar  as  some  of  the 
other  budgetary  matters.  And  I  think  that  we  do  need  to  spend 
money. It’s a wise investment in aeronautics, in nanotechnology, in 
research and development. And we can look at probably the great-
est  invention,  in  my  view,  since  the  Gutenberg  press,  which  is  the 
Internet,  as  an  example,  a  real  objective  lesson  for  us  all.  The 
Internet was developed—Federal program, DARPA—then it got ap-
plied  to  the  private  sector.  It  is  a  great  vehicle  for  individual  em-
powerment.  It’s  an  individualized  empowerment  zone,  so  to  speak. 
And it is the best since the Gutenberg press. If it wasn’t the Guten-
berg press, Martin Luther’s 95 theses on the Church of Wittenberg 
would  have  been  read  by  very  few  people.  And  look  at  how 
broadband  has  expanded  opportunities  for  people  all  across  this 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

country.  The  policy  of  this  country  is  to  leave  the  Internet  free  of 
taxation.  I’ve  worked  to  make  sure  that  avaricious  state  and  local 
tax  commissars  don’t  impose  18  percent  access  taxes  on  the  Inter-
net, to help bridge that economic digital divide and make sure that 
there’s  investment  for  the  Internet  or  broadband  into  small  towns 
and  rural  areas.  And  whether  that’s  by  cable  or  telephone  lines  or 
even—now  they’re  talking  about  over  power  lines,  and  eventually 
on Super WiMax, as well, wireless, and satellites, eventually. 

So, you know, Ronald Reagan said there was a policy of the Fed-
eral  Government,  if  it  moved,  tax  it;  if  it  kept  moving,  regulate  it; 
and if it stopped moving, subsidize it. Well, in the Internet, we left 
that free, and look at how that’s improved our lives for information 
and for communications, allowing Mr. Murray to have his business 
communicate all over the world. It is important for telemedicine. It 
is important for education. You undoubtedly have distance learning 
at  Virginia  Tech—or,  excuse  me,  at  Georgia  Tech,  as  does  Old  Do-
minion  and  other  universities  across  the  country.  So,  these  deci-
sions, leaving investors to keep more of what they earn, does have 
a  positive  impact,  but  we  do  have  to  remember  to  make  the  right 
decisions in budgeting. 

And  from  the  President  of  Georgia  Tech—and  I  know  you’re  a 
good  ACC  school—you  know  what—one  of  the  things  you  men-
tioned,  as  far  as  what  we  need  to  do  in  recruiting  women  and  mi-
norities,  more  minorities,  into  engineering  and  science  technology, 
the  analogy  I  give  is  that  if  you  were  a  head  coach  and  a  general 
manager looking to the NFL draft, and you said, ‘‘We’re only going 
to  draft  players  from  40  percent  of  the  country,’’  and  you’d  only 
draft them from the Ivy League and the Big Ten, the result would 
be, you’d lose, and you’d get fired. And, as a practical matter, when 
you  see  women  being  a  little  over  10  percent  of  the  engineering 
schools—Latinos,  the  fastest-growing  group  in  this  country,  in  sin-
gle  digits,  are  around  10  percent,  10  percent  for  African  Ameri-
cans—we really are only recruiting or incenting or enticing 40 per-
cent  or  less  of  our  country  to  get  interested  in  engineering.  So,  we 
need  to  make  sure  all  Americans  recognize  the  great  opportunities 
for  jobs,  good-paying  jobs  in  this  country.  It’s  good  for  them,  a  ful-
filling  life  for  them  and  their  families,  but  it’s  also  important  for 
the competitiveness of our country. 

So,  I  want  to  thank  all  our  witnesses  here  today  for  appearing, 
and  for  your  insight.  Your  commentary  and  views  will  be  used  by 
many  of  us  as  bolstering  our  arguments.  And  I  very  much  appre-
ciate your shared concern, not just for your own institutions—your 
firm,  your  company,  your  wonderful  university—but  also  for  your 
care for the future of this country. 

So, I thank you all, and this hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:25 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Manufacturing  is  a  critical  component  of  this  country’s  economic  security.  It 
drives growth and accounted for over 77 percent of the Nation’s exports since 2000. 
However,  our  manufacturing  base  is  quickly  eroding.  The  recession  took  its  toll  on 
the economy as a whole, yet while other sectors have rebounded, manufacturing jobs 
have not recovered. 

Some economists cite the country’s strong productivity numbers as proof that the 
United States continues to maintain its manufacturing competitiveness, but the fact 
of  the  matter  is  that  we  have  lost  over  2  million  manufacturing  jobs  in  the  past  4 
years. And these are high paying jobs that average over $63,000 per year. 

The  trade  situation  is  an  even  greater  dilemma.  The  United  States  experienced 
the  largest  monthly  trade  deficit  this  past  February  as  we  imported  over  $161  bil-
lion  worth  of  goods  and  services  while  exporting  $101  billion.  This  left  us  with  a 
monthly  trade  deficit  of  over  $60  billion,  the  highest  in  history.  Furthermore,  this 
year’s  first  quarter  deficit  was  $174  billion,  well  ahead  of  last  year’s  first  quarter 
deficit  of  $139  billion,  which  ultimately  resulted  in  a  new  record  annual  deficit  of 
$617 billion. These are not the kind of dubious records we want to be setting. 

Instead  we  should  be  setting  new  records  in  innovation  and  advancing  the  state- 
of-the-art  with  our  research  and  development  capability.  In  order  for  this  country 
to  compete  economically,  we  need  to  make  the  necessary  investments  in  basic  re-
search.  Basic  research  is  the  foundation  upon  which  entrepreneurs  build  the  next 
great  products  that  enrich  our  lives,  improve  our  health,  and  provide  for  our  secu-
rity. Given this need, I find it perplexing that the President has provided such ane-
mic  funding  for  the  National  Science  Foundation,  the  Nation’s  pre-eminent  science 
research agency. 

Other  countries  understand  that  R&D  is  the  fuel  that  propels  economic  growth. 
Our industries are facing competition from both shores. The aerospace industry, one 
of  our  few  leading  export  industries,  is  under  attack  from  Airbus  as  market  share 
has  fallen  from  over  70  percent  in  the  mid-1980s  to  slightly  more  than  half  today. 
In their European Aeronautics 2020 report, the European Commission is calling for 
an  investment  of  100  billion  Euros.  From  the  other  side  of  the  Pacific,  our  hi-tech 
industries  are  being  enticed  to  build  new  multi-billion  dollar  facilities  in  China, 
India, and Malaysia. U.S. manufacturers are facing increasing pressure from global 
competitors  who  are  able  to  win  business  through  lower  operating  costs  and  dis-
criminating  trade  practices.  I  know  that  I  am  not  alone  on  this  Committee,  or  in 
the Senate, when I call for greater enforcement of our trade agreements. 

The  government  needs  to  take  action  and  respond  to  the  challenge  to  our  eco-
nomic livelihood. I applaud the President for creating a new position within the De-
partment  of  Commerce  to  deal  with  some  of  these  issues.  Mr.  Al  Frink,  who  is  be-
fore us today, was confirmed as the first Assistant Secretary for Manufacturing and 
Services. I look forward to hearing about what he has been doing over the past year 
and  learning  about  what  steps  the  Administration  is  taking  to  improve  the  outlook 
for this country’s manufacturing capability. 

I  also  look  forward  to  hearing  more  about  the  Hollings  Manufacturing  Extension 
Partnership. MEP is one of the few programs that we have to assist small and me-
dium-sized companies to better compete in today’s global economy. In fact last year 
alone,  MEP  helped  companies  retain  or  create  fifty  thousand  manufacturing  jobs. 
However,  MEP,  even  with  its  track  record  of  success,  has  not  seen  the  Adminis-
tration’s support. This is particularly disturbing given that now is when these com-
panies need assistance the most. In Fiscal Years 2003 and 2004, the Administration 
requested  only  $13  million  each  year  for  a  $107  million  program.  This  fiscal  year’s 
request is $46.8 million, which is still less than half the amount required to support 
the network of centers. I hope we can work to correct this imbalance. 

The  government  can,  and  must,  take  positive  action  toward  addressing  the  con-
cerns I have outlined thus far. Other foreign governments are making the necessary 
investments in their infrastructure and workforce. If we continue to ignore the great 

(53) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

capabilities that have so far been the heart of America’s competitive advantage, we 
risk falling behind. 

54 

FPI THERMOPLASTIC TECHNOLOGIES 

Morristown, NJ 

Hon. JOHN ENSIGN, 
Chairman, 
Senate Subcommittee on Technology, Innovation, and Competitiveness, 
Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senator: 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  the  U.S.  Senate  Committee  on 
Science,  Commerce,  and  Transportation,  Subcommittee  on  Technology  Innovation 
and  Competitiveness  at  the  recent  hearing  on  Manufacturing  Competitiveness  in 
the High-Tech Era. Not only did I enjoy sharing my experience with the Committee, 
I welcomed your comments and questions on the Manufacturing Extension Partner-
ship (MEP) which I spoke so highly about. 

SEBASTIAN MURRAY, 

President and CEO. 

As you know, the NIST Manufacturing Extension Partnership is a nationwide net-
work  of  resources  helping  small  manufacturers  become  more  competitive.  At  the 
heart of the MEP are manufacturing extension centers locally positioned throughout 
the  U.S.  to  address  the  critical  and  often  unique  needs  of  small  manufacturers.  Al-
though  my  experience  has  only  been  with  my  local  center,  the  New  Jersey  MEP, 
all MEP centers create significant impact for their local small manufacturers. In my 
testimony,  I  stated  the  incredible  impact  my  local  center  has  had  on  the  manufac-
turers  of  New  Jersey  and  more  specifically,  FPI.  In  your  comments  and  questions, 
you  had  requested  more  information  on  the  impact  that  other  MEP  Centers  have 
had  on  their  local  manufacturers.  I  have  since  contacted  NIST  MEP  and  obtained 
the  enclosed  information  regarding  the  impact  of  their  services  on  their  clients.  As 
you will see, the program is not only a success in New Jersey, but is creating signifi-
cant impact on the manufacturers nationwide. 

Please  let  me  know  if  you  have  any  additional  questions  regarding  the  program 
or  its  impact  following  your  review  of  the  enclosed  materials.  Thank  you  again  for 
the opportunity to testify and for your continued support of the American manufac-
turing  industrial  base.  Manufacturers  such  as  myself,  would  not  be  in  existence  if 
not for your support of programs such as MEP. 

Respectfully, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

MANUFACTURING EXTENSION PARTNERSHIP—MAKING A DIFFERENCE FOR AMERICA’S 

MANUFACTURERS 

MANUFACTURING EXTENSION PARTNERSHIP 

‘‘. . .  an  important  resource  for  helping  small  manufacturers  achieve  the  kinds 
of world-class gains formerly limited to larger companies. Their focus on value- 
adding  activity  on  the  shop  floor  is  exactly  right.  The  MEP  network  gets  re-
sults—quickly  and  affordably.’’—Richard  Schonberger,  author,  World  Class 
Manufacturing: The Next Decade. 

Small Manufacturers: The Foundation of American Industry 

Manufacturing  creates  wealth  for  our  Nation:  wealth  in  the  form  of  economic 
growth,  increased  jobs  and  robust  trade  in  world  markets.  Productivity  improve-
ments by U.S. manufacturers are leading the Nation. Between 1992 and 2001, man-
ufacturing  productivity  grew  at  double  the  rate  of  the  entire  economy:  manufac-
turing productivity rose by nearly 36 percent compared to a 18 percent increase for 
the  non-farm  business  sector.  Approximately  350,000,  small  manufacturers  account 
for  over  half  the  total  value  of  U.S.  production  and  represent  98.6  percent  of  all 
manufacturing  establishments.  They  employ  nearly  11  million  people  and  account 
for  two-thirds  of  all  U.S.  manufacturing  employment.  These  jobs  are  high-skilled 
and high-wage, with production employees earning 50 percent more than retail em-
ployees per hour. 
The Challenge for Small Manufacturers: Bridging the Productivity Gap 

As  critical  as  small  manufacturers  are  to  the  economy,  the  productivity  gap  be-
tween  large  and  small  firms  is  widening.  Between  1992  and  1997,  productivity  for 
large manufacturers grew by 22.6 percent versus 15.5 percent for small manufactur-
ers.  And  as  large  manufacturers  increase  their  dependence  on  suppliers  for  parts 
and services, the performance and capabilities of small manufacturers become even 
more  critical  to  the  competitiveness  of  all  manufacturers  and  to  the  health  of  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
r
u
m

56 

U.S. economy. Yet, according to a National Research Council report, ‘‘Many of these 
smaller firms, however, are operating far below their potential. Their use of modern 
manufacturing  equipment,  methodologies  and  management  practices  is  inadequate 
to ensure that American manufacturing will be globally competitive.’’ 

Limited budgets, lack of in-house expertise, and lack of access to the newest tech-
nologies are but a few of the significant barriers faced by small manufacturers—bar-
riers that MEP aims to help them overcome. 
How MEP Is Making a Difference 
Manufacturing Extension Centers 

MEP is a national network of affiliated manufacturing extension centers and field 
offices  located  throughout  all  50  states  and  Puerto  Rico.  Created  in  1988,  today’s 
network  delivers  services  to  firms  across  the  country  and  in  Puerto  Rico.  Centers 
are funded by Federal, state, local and private resources to serve small manufactur-
ers. 

Each center works directly with area manufacturers to provide expertise and serv-
ices  tailored  to  their  most  critical  needs,  which  range  from  process  improvements 
and  worker  training  to  business  practices  and  information  technology  applications. 
Solutions  are  offered  through  a  combination  of  direct  assistance  from  center  staff 
and  assistance  from  outside  consultants.  Centers  often  help  small  firms  overcome 
barriers in locating and obtaining private-sector resources. 
Partnerships 

MEP provides small and mid-sized manufacturers with access to a wealth of tools, 
techniques and other resources through thousands of public and private affiliations. 
Initiatives  with  the  U.S.  Departments  of  Labor,  EPA,  National  Association  of  State 
Development Agencies, the State Science and Technology Institute, the National As-
sociation  of  Manufacturers,  state  and  local  employment  training  organizations  and 
hundreds  of  universities  and  community  colleges  are  a  few  examples  of  how  MEP 
leverages  public  and  private  resources  to  make  a  comprehensive  range  of  technical 
services and assistance available to small manufacturers. 

Each  year,  MEP  helps  thousands  of  manufacturers  solve  problems,  increase  pro-
ductivity  and  achieve  higher  profits.  Through  continuous  assessment  and  improve-
ment  of  our  products,  services  and  service-delivery  approaches,  MEP  is  committed 
to  meeting  the  strategic  needs  of  small  and  mid-sized  manufacturers  as  they  nego-
tiate the New Economy of the 21st century. 
For More Information 

For a list of centers and other information about MEP, contact: 

Manufacturing Extension Partnership 
100 Bureau Drive, Stop 4800 
Building 301, Suite C100 
National Institute of Standards and Technology 
Gaithersburg, MD 20899–4800 
E-mail: mepinfo@mep.nist.gov—Or visit our website at www.mep.nist.gov 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

RESULTS: WHAT THE DATA SHOWS 

FY 2004 MEP Activities 

IMPACT: INDEPENDENT STUDIES 

‘‘Systematic  evaluation  studies  have  confirmed  that  the  MEP  is  having  a  posi-
tive  effect  on  businesses  and  the  economy . . . has  achieved  national  coverage 
and established local service partnerships . . . and most important . . . MEP 
services  are  leading  to  desired  business  and  economic  goals . . . ’’—Philip 
Shapira,  Ph.D.,  Issues  in  Science  and  Technology,  Spring,  1998,  ‘‘Extending 
Manufacturing Extension’’ 

Benefits to GA Manufacturers 

Georgia  MEP  clients  surveyed  reported  manufacturing  benefits  in  the  following 

areas: 

• improvements to an existing process 
• improvements in management skills 
• improvements in employee skills 
• improvements in an existing product or service 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
r
u
m

58 

Furthermore,  comparing  Georgia  MEP  clients  with  nonclients  found  that  assist-
ance  from  the  Georgia  MEP  increased  the  value-added  of  the  average  client  plant 
by up to $443,000 between 1999 and 2001. 1 
PA Manufacturers Post Positive Productivity Gains 

A  study  of  Pennsylvania’s  Industrial  Resource  Centers  (IRC)  found  that  the  pro-
gram boosted the labor productivity of IRC clients by an average of between 3.6 and 
5.0 percentage points per year. The study found that these productivity gains raised 
gross  state  product  by  about  $1.9  billion.  Finally,  the  study  found  that  for  every 
state  dollar  invested  in  the  program,  the  program  generated  almost  $22  of  addi-
tional income to the state economy. 2 
Higher Productivity Growth for MEP Clients 

Researchers at The Center for Economic Studies, U.S. Census Bureau, found that 
manufacturing  extension  clients  experienced  between  3.4  and  16  percent  more 
growth  in  labor  productivity  over  a  five-year  period  than  similar  non-client  firms. 
The  productivity  growth  of  the  1,559  firms  studied  translates  into  $484  million  in 
additional value-added at client firms. 3 

Based  on  these  results,  a  second  study  estimated  that  this  value-added  increase 
translates  into  $1.3  billion  in  additional  economic  output  over  5  years,  leading  to 
$213 million in additional Federal revenues and a $4.47 increase in real disposable 
income per capita. 4 
Value-Added Income and Jobs for NY 

A  New  York  Manufacturing  Extension  Partnership  study  found  that  the  state’s 
$5.3  million  investment  in  the  program  between  July  1995  and  March  1997,  com-
bined  with  the  Federal  investment,  generated  an  additional  $227  million  of  value- 
added  income  in  New  York  State.  This  growth,  in  turn,  led  to  the  creation  of  2,600 
jobs. 5 
GAO Survey Positive 

An  independent  survey  of  MEP  clients  by  the  General  Accounting  Office  found 

MEP had a positive effect on a firms performance in the areas of: 6 

• profits 
• sales 
• product quality 
• workplace technology 
• worker productivity 
• customer satisfaction 

Æ 

1 Georgia Tech Policy Project on Industrial Modernization. December 2002. 
2 ‘‘The  Pennsylvania  Industrial  Resource  Center:  Assessing  The  Record  and  Charting  the  Fu-

ture,’’ By Nexus Association for the Ben Franklin/IRC Partnership Board. October 1999. 

3 Journal  of  Policy  Analysis  and  Management,  ‘‘Evaluating  the  Impact  of  Manufacturing  Ex-

tension on Productivity Growth,’’ by Ronald S. Jarmin, Winter 1999. 

4 ‘‘Estimating Economic Impacts of Government Technology Programs: Manufacturing Studies 
Using  the  REMI  Model,’’  by  M.A.  Ehlen  and  S.F.  Weber,  economists  for  the  National  Institute 
of Standards and Technology, 1997. 

5 ‘‘Evaluation of the New York Manufacturing Extension Partnership,’’ by Nexus Associates for 

New York State Science and Technology Foundation/Empire State Development, 1997. 

6 ‘‘Manufacturing  Extension  Programs:  Manufacturers’  Views  of  Services,’’  U.S.  General  Ac-

counting Office, Report GAO/GGK–95–216BR, August, 1995. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:46 Nov 04, 2010 Jkt 061908 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61908.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

